ELDEST 


Book Two of Inheritance 


Christopher Paolini 





CHRISTOPHER PAOLINI 


As always, this book is for my family. 
And also to my incredible fans. You made this adventure possible. 


Sé onr sverdar sitja hvass! 


Synopsis of Eragon, 


Book One of Inheritance 





Eragon—a fifteen-year-old farmboy—is shocked when a polished blue 
stone appears before him in the range of mountains known as the Spine. 
Eragon takes the stone to the farm where he lives with his uncle, Gar- 
row, and his cousin, Roran. Garrow and his late wife, Marian, have raised 
Eragon. Nothing is known of his father; his mother, Selena, was Garrow’s 
sister and has not been seen since Eragon’s birth. 


Later, the stone cracks open and a baby dragon emerges. When Eragon 
touches her, a silvery mark appears on his palm, and an irrevocable bond 
is forged between their minds, making Eragon one of the legendary 
Dragon Riders. 


The Dragon Riders were created thousands of years earlier in the af- 
termath of the elves’ great war with the dragons, in order to ensure that 
hostilities would never again afflict their two races. The Riders became 
peacekeepers, educators, healers, natural philosophers, and the greatest of 
spellweavers—since being joined with a dragon makes one a magician. 
Under their guidance and protection, the land enjoyed a golden age. 


When humans arrived in Alagaésia, they too were added to this elite 
order. After many years of peace, the monstrous and warlike Urgals killed 
the dragon of a young human Rider named Galbatorix. Driven mad by 
the loss and by his elders’ refusal to provide him with another dragon, 
Galbatorix set out to topple the Riders. 


He stole another dragon—whom he named Shruikan and forced to 
serve him through certain black spells—and gathered around himself a 
group of thirteen traitors: the Forsworn. With the help of those cruel dis- 
ciples, Galbatorix threw down the Riders; killed their leader, Vrael; and 
declared himself king over Alagaésia. In this, Galbatorix was only partly 
successful, for the elves and dwarves remain autonomous in their secret 
haunts, and some humans have established an independent country, 
Surda, in the south of Alagaésia. A stalemate has existed between these 
factions for twenty years, preceded by eighty years of open conflict 
brought about by the destruction of the Riders. 


It is into this fragile political situation, then, that Eragon is thrust. He 
fears he is in mortal danger—it is common knowledge that Galbatorix 
killed every Rider who would not swear loyalty to him—and so Eragon 
hides the dragon from his family as he raises her. During this time, Eragon 


3 


names the creature Saphira, after a dragon mentioned by the village story- 
teller, Brom. Soon Roran leaves the farm for a job that will allow him to 
earn enough money to marry Katrina, the butcher’s daughter. 


When Saphira stands taller than Eragon, two menacing, beetle-like 
strangers called the Ra’zac arrive in Carvahall, searching for the stone that 
was her egg. Frightened, Saphira kidnaps Eragon and flies into the Spine. 
Eragon manages to convince her to turn back, but by then his home has 
been obliterated by the Ra’zac. Eragon finds Garrow in the wreckage, tor- 
tured and badly wounded. 


Garrow dies soon afterward, and Eragon vows to track down and kill 
the Ra’zac. Eragon is accosted by Brom, who knows of Saphira’s existence 
and asks to accompany Eragon for reasons of his own. After Eragon 
agrees, Brom gives him the sword Zar’roc, which was once a Rider's 
blade, though he refuses to say how he acquired it. 


Eragon learns much from Brom during their travels, including how to 
fight with swords and use magic. Eventually, they lose the Ra’zac’s trail 
and visit the city of Teirm, where Brom believes his old friend Jeod can 
help locate their lair. 


In Teirm, the eccentric herbalist Angela tells Eragon’s fortune, predict- 
ing mighty powers struggling to control his destiny; an epic romance with 
one of noble birth; the fact that he will one day leave Alagaésia, never to 
return; and a betrayal from within his family. Her companion, the were- 
cat Solembum, also gives him some words of advice. Then Eragon, Brom, 
and Saphira depart for Dras-Leona, where they hope to find the Ra’zac. 


Brom finally reveals that he is an agent of the Varden—a rebel group 
dedicated to overthrowing Galbatorix—and that he had been hiding in 
Eragon’s village, waiting for a new Dragon Rider to appear. Brom also ex- 
plains that twenty years ago, he and Jeod stole Saphira’s egg from Galba- 
torix. In the process, Brom killed Morzan, first and last of the Forsworn. 
Only two other dragon eggs still exist, both of which remain in Galba- 
torix’s possession. 


Near Dras-Leona, the Ra’zac waylay Eragon and his companions, and 
Brom is mortally wounded while protecting Eragon. The Ra’zac are 
driven away by a mysterious young man named Murtagh, who says he’s 
been tracking the Ra’zac. Brom dies the following night. With his last 
breath, he confesses that he was once a Rider and his slain dragon was 
also named Saphira. Eragon buries Brom in a tomb of sandstone, which 
Saphira transmutes into pure diamond. 


Without Brom, Eragon and Saphira decide to join the Varden. By ill 
chance, Eragon is captured at the city of Gil’ead and brought to the Shade 
Durza, Galbatorix’s right-hand man. With Murtagh’s help, Eragon escapes 
from prison, bringing along with him the unconscious elf Arya, another 
captive. By this point, Eragon and Murtagh have become great friends. 


With her mind, Arya tells Eragon that she has been ferrying Saphira’s 
egg between the elves and the Varden, in the hopes that it might hatch 
for one of their children. However, during her last trip, she was am- 
bushed by Durza and forced to send the egg elsewhere with magic, 
which is how it came to Eragon. Now Arya is seriously wounded and re- 
quires the Varden’s medical help. Using mental images, she shows Eragon 
how to find the rebels. An epic chase ensues. Eragon and his friends trav- 
erse almost four hundred miles in eight days. They are pursued by a con- 
tingent of Urgals, who trap them in the towering Beor Mountains. 
Murtagh, who had not wanted to go to the Varden, is forced to tell Er- 
agon that he is the son of Morzan. 


Murtagh, however, has denounced his father’s deeds and fled Galba- 
torix’s patronage to seek his own destiny. He shows Eragon a great scar 
across his back, inflicted when Morzan threw his sword, Zar’roc, at him 
when he was just a child. Thus, Eragon learns his sword once belonged to 
Murtagh’s father, he who betrayed the Riders to Galbatorix and slaugh- 
tered many of his former comrades. 


Just before they are overwhelmed by the Urgals, Eragon and his friends 
are rescued by the Varden, who seem to appear out of the very stone. It 
turns out that the rebels are based in Farthen Dar, a hollow mountain ten 
miles high and ten miles across. It is also home to the dwarves’ capital, 
Tronjheim. Once inside, Eragon is taken to Ajihad, leader of the Varden, 
while Murtagh is imprisoned because of his parentage. Ajihad explains 
many things to Eragon, including that the Varden, elves, and dwarves had 
agreed that when a new Rider appeared, he or she would initially be 
trained by Brom and then sent to the elves to complete the instruction. 
Eragon must now decide whether to follow this course. 


Eragon meets with the dwarf king, Hrothgar, and Ajihad’s daughter, 
Nasuada; is tested by the Twins, two bald and rather nasty magicians 
who serve Ajihad; spars with Arya once she has recovered; and again en- 
counters Angela and Solembum, who have joined the Varden. Eragon 
and Saphira also bless one of the Varden’s orphan babies. 


Eragon’s stay is disrupted by news of an Urgal army approaching 


through the dwarves’ tunnels. In the battle that follows, Eragon is sepa- 
rated from Saphira and forced to fight Durza alone. Far stronger than any 
human, Durza easily defeats Eragon, slashing open his back from shoulder 
to hip. At that moment, Saphira and Arya break the roof of the cham- 
ber—a sixty-foot-wide star sapphire—distracting Durza long enough for 
Eragon to stab him through the heart. Freed from Durza’s spells, the Ur- 
gals are driven back into the tunnels. 


While Eragon lies unconscious after the battle, he is telepathically con- 
tacted by a being who identifies himself as Togira Ikonoka—the Cripple 
Who Is Whole. He offers answers to all of Eragon’s questions and urges 
Eragon to seek him in Ellesméra, where the elves live. 


When Eragon wakes, he finds that, despite Angela’s best efforts, he has 
been left with a huge scar similar to Murtagh’s. Dismayed, he also realizes 
that he only slew Durza through sheer luck and that he desperately needs 
more training. 


And at the end of Book One, Eragon decides that, yes, he will find this 
Togira Ikonoka and learn from him. For gray-eyed Destiny now weaves 
apace, the first resounding note of war echoes across the land, and the 
time fast approaches when Eragon shall have to step forth and confront 
his one, true enemy: King Galbatorix. 


A TWIN DISASTER 





The songs of the dead are the lamentations of the living. 


So thought Eragon as he stepped over a twisted and hacked Urgal, lis- 
tening to the keening of women who removed loved ones from the 
blood-muddied ground of Farthen Dar. Behind him Saphira delicately 
skirted the corpse, her glittering blue scales the only color in the gloom 
that filled the hollow mountain. 


It was three days since the Varden and dwarves had fought the Urgals 
for possession of Tronjheim, the mile-high, conical city nestled in the 
center of Farthen Dar, but the battlefield was still strewn with carnage. 
The sheer number of bodies had stymied their attempts to bury the dead. 
In the distance, a mountainous fire glowed sullenly by Farthen Ddar’s wall 
where the Urgals were being burned. No burial or honored resting place 
for them. 


Since waking to find his wound healed by Angela, Eragon had tried 
three times to assist in the recovery effort. On each occasion he had been 
racked by terrible pains that seemed to explode from his spine. The heal- 
ers gave him various potions to drink. Arya and Angela said that he was 
perfectly sound. Nevertheless, he hurt. Nor could Saphira help, only 
share his pain as it rebounded across their mental link. 


Eragon ran a hand over his face and looked up at the stars showing 
through Farthen Dar’s distant top, which were smudged with sooty 
smoke from the pyre. Three days. Three days since he had killed Durza; 
three days since people began calling him Shadeslayer; three days since 
the remnants of the sorcerer’s consciousness had ravaged his mind and he 
had been saved by the mysterious Togira Ikonoka, the Cripple Who Is 
Whole. He had told no one about that vision but Saphira. Fighting Durza 
and the dark spirits that controlled him had transformed Eragon; although 
for better or for worse he was still unsure. He felt fragile, as if a sudden 
shock would shatter his reconstructed body and consciousness. 


And now he had come to the site of the combat, driven by a morbid 
desire to see its aftermath. Upon arriving, he found nothing but the un- 
comfortable presence of death and decay, not the glory that heroic songs 
had led him to expect. 


Before his uncle, Garrow, was slain by the Ra’zac months earlier, the 
brutality that Eragon had witnessed between the humans, dwarves, and 


5 


Urgals would have destroyed him. Now it numbed him. He had realized, 
with Saphira’s help, that the only way to stay rational amid such pain was 
to do things. Beyond that, he no longer believed that life possessed inher- 
ent meaning—not after seeing men torn apart by the Kull, a race of giant 
Urgals, and the ground a bed of thrashing limbs and the dirt so wet with 
blood it soaked through the soles of his boots. If any honor existed in 
war, he concluded, it was in fighting to protect others from harm. 


He bent and plucked a tooth, a molar, from the dirt. Bouncing it on his 
palm, he and Saphira slowly made a circuit through the trampled plain. 
They stopped at its edge when they noticed Jormundur—Ajihad’s second 
in command in the Varden—hurrying toward them from Tronjheim. 
When he came near, Jormundur bowed, a gesture Eragon knew he would 
never have made just days before. 


‘I’m glad I found you in time, Eragon.” He clutched a parchment note 
in one hand. “Ajihad is returning, and he wants you to be there when he 
arrives. The others are already waiting for him by Tronjheim’s west gate. 
Well have to hurry to get there in time.” 


Eragon nodded and headed toward the gate, keeping a hand on Saphira. 
Ajihad had been gone most of the three days, hunting down Urgals who 
had managed to escape into the dwarf tunnels that honeycombed the 
stone beneath the Beor Mountains. The one time Eragon had seen him 
between expeditions, Ajihad was in a rage over discovering that his 
daughter, Nasuada, had disobeyed his orders to leave with the other 
women and children before the battle. Instead, she had secretly fought 
among the Varden’s archers. 


Murtagh and the Twins had accompanied Ajihad: the Twins because it 
was dangerous work and the Varden’s leader needed the protection of 
their magical skills, and Murtagh because he was eager to continue prov- 
ing that he bore the Varden no ill will. It surprised Eragon how much 
people’s attitudes toward Murtagh had changed, considering that 
Murtagh’s father was the Dragon Rider Morzan, who had betrayed the 
Riders to Galbatorix. Even though Murtagh despised his father and was 
loyal to Eragon, the Varden had not trusted him. But now, no one was 
willing to waste energy on a petty hate when so much work remained. 
Eragon missed talking with Murtagh and looked forward to discussing all 
that had happened, once he returned. 


As Eragon and Saphira rounded Tronjheim, a small group became visi- 
ble in the pool of lantern light before the timber gate. Among them were 
Orik—the dwarf shifting impatiently on his stout legs—and Arya. The 


white bandage around her upper arm gleamed in the darkness, reflecting 
a faint highlight onto the bottom of her hair. Eragon felt a strange thrill, 
as he always did when he saw the elf. She looked at him and Saphira, 
green eyes flashing, then continued watching for Ajihad. 


By breaking Isidar Mithrim—the great star sapphire that was sixty feet 
across and carved in the shape of a rose—Arya had allowed Eragon to kill 
Durza and so win the battle. Still, the dwarves were furious with her for 
destroying their most prized treasure. They refused to move the sap- 
phire’s remains, leaving them in a massive circle inside Tronjheim’s cen- 
tral chamber. Eragon had walked through the splintered wreckage and 
shared the dwarves’ sorrow for all the lost beauty. 


He and Saphira stopped by Orik and looked out at the empty land that 
surrounded Tronjheim, extending to Farthen Ditr’s base five miles away 
in each direction. “Where will Ajihad come from?” asked Eragon. 


Orik pointed at a cluster of lanterns staked around a large tunnel open- 
ing a couple of miles away. “He should be here soon.” 


Eragon waited patiently with the others, answering comments directed 
at him but preferring to speak with Saphira in the peace of his mind. The 
quiet that filled Farthen Dar suited him. 


Half an hour passed before motion flickered in the distant tunnel. A 
group of ten men climbed out onto the ground, then turned and helped 
up as many dwarves. One of the men—Eragon assumed it was Ajihad— 
raised a hand, and the warriors assembled behind him in two straight 
lines. At a signal, the formation marched proudly toward Tronjheim. 


Before they went more than five yards, the tunnel behind them 
swarmed with a flurry of activity as more figures jumped out. Eragon 
squinted, unable to see clearly from so far away. 


Those are Urgals! exclaimed Saphira, her body tensing like a drawn 
bowstring. 


Eragon did not question her. “Urgals!” he cried, and leaped onto Saphira, 
berating himself for leaving his sword, Zar’roc, in his room. No one had 
expected an attack now that the Urgal army had been driven away. 


His wound twinged as Saphira lifted her azure wings, then drove them 
down and jumped forward, gaining speed and altitude each second. Be- 
low them, Arya ran toward the tunnel, nearly keeping apace with 


Saphira. Orik trailed her with several men, while Jormundur sprinted 
back toward the barracks. 


Eragon was forced to watch helplessly as the Urgals fell on the rear of 
Ajihad’s warriors; he could not work magic over such a distance. The 
monsters had the advantage of surprise and quickly cut down four men, 
forcing the rest of the warriors, men and dwarves alike, to cluster around 
Ajihad in an attempt to protect him. Swords and axes clashed as the 
groups pressed together. Light flashed from one of the Twins, and an Ur- 
gal fell, clutching the stump of his severed arm. 


For a minute, it seemed the defenders would be able to resist the Ur- 
gals, but then a swirl of motion disturbed the air, like a faint band of mist 
wrapping itself around the combatants. When it cleared, only four warri- 
ors were standing: Ajihad, the Twins, and Murtagh. The Urgals converged 
on them, blocking Eragon’s view as he stared with rising horror and fear. 


No! No! No! 


Before Saphira could reach the fight, the knot of Urgals streamed back 
to the tunnel and scrambled underground, leaving only prone forms be- 


hind. 


The moment Saphira touched down, Eragon vaulted off, then faltered, 
overcome by grief and anger. I can’t do this. It reminded him too much of 
when he had returned to the farm to find his uncle Garrow dying. Fight- 
ing back his dread with every step, he began to search for survivors. 


The site was eerily similar to the battlefield he had inspected earlier, 
except that here the blood was fresh. 


In the center of the massacre lay Ajihad, his breastplate rent with nu- 
merous gashes, surrounded by five Urgals he had slain. His breath still 
came in ragged gasps. Eragon knelt by him and lowered his face so his 
tears would not land on the leader’s ruined chest. No one could heal such 
wounds. Running up to them, Arya paused and stopped, her face trans- 
formed with sorrow when she saw that Ajihad could not be saved. 


“Eragon.” The name slipped from Ajihad’s lips—no more than a whis- 
per. 


“Yes, I am here.” 


“Listen to me, Eragon.... I have one last command for you.” Eragon 


10 


leaned closer to catch the dying man’s words. “You must promise me 
something: promise that you... won't let the Varden fall into chaos. They 
are the only hope for resisting the Empire.... They must be kept strong. 
You must promise me.” 


“I promise.” 


“Then peace be with you, Eragon Shadeslayer....” With his last breath, 
Ajihad closed his eyes, setting his noble face in repose, and died. 


Eragon bowed his head. He had trouble breathing past the lump in his 
throat, which was so hard it hurt. Arya blessed Ajihad in a ripple of the 
ancient language, then said in her musical voice, “Alas, his death will 
cause much strife. He is right, you must do all you can to avert a struggle 
for power. I will assist where possible.” 


Unwilling to speak, Eragon gazed at the rest of the bodies. He would 
have given anything to be elsewhere. Saphira nosed one of the Urgals and 
said, This should not have happened. It is an evil doing, and all the worse 
for coming when we should be safe and victorious. She examined another 
body, then swung her head around. Where are the Twins and Murtagh? 
They're not among the dead. 


Eragon scanned the corpses. You’re right! Elation surged within him as 
he hurried to the tunnel’s mouth. There pools of thickening blood filled 
the hollows in the worn marble steps like a series of black mirrors, glossy 
and oval, as if several torn bodies had been dragged down them. The Ur- 
gals must have taken them! But why? They don’t keep prisoners or hostages. 
Despair instantly returned. It doesn’t matter. We can’t pursue them without 
reinforcements; you wouldn’t even fit through the opening. 


They may still be alive. Would you abandon them? 

What do you expect me to do? The dwarf tunnels are an endless maze! I 
would only get lost. And I couldn't catch Urgals on foot, though Arya might 
be able to. 

Then ask her to. 

Arya! Eragon hesitated, torn between his desire for action and his loath- 
ing to put her in danger. Still, if any one person in the Varden could han- 


dle the Urgals, it was she. With a groan, he explained what they had 
found. 


11 


Arya’s slanted eyebrows met in a frown. “It makes no sense.” 
“Will you pursue them?” 


She stared at him for a heavy moment. “Wiol ono.” For you. Then she 
bounded forward, sword flashing in her hand as she dove into the earth’s 


belly. 


Burning with frustration, Eragon settled cross-legged by Ajihad, keeping 
watch over the body. He could barely assimilate the fact that Ajihad was 
dead and Murtagh missing. Murtagh. Son of one of the Forsworn—the 
thirteen Riders who had helped Galbatorix destroy their order and anoint 
himself king of Alagaésia—and Eragon’s friend. At times Eragon had 
wished Murtagh gone, but now that he had been forcibly removed, the 
loss left an unexpected void. He sat motionless as Orik approached with 
the men. 


When Orik saw Ajihad, he stamped his feet and swore in Dwarvish, 
swinging his ax into the body of an Urgal. The men only stood in shock. 
Rubbing a pinch of dirt between his callused hands, the dwarf growled, 
“Ah, now a hornet’s nest has broken; we'll have no peace among the 
Varden after this. Barziln, but this makes things complicated. Were you 
in time to hear his last words?” 


Eragon glanced at Saphira. “They must wait for the right person before 
I'll repeat them.” 


“I see. And where’d be Arya?” 

Eragon pointed. 

Orik swore again, then shook his head and sat on his heels. 

Jérmundur soon arrived with twelve ranks of six warriors each. He mo- 
tioned for them to wait outside the radius of bodies while he proceeded 
onward alone. He bent and touched Ajihad on the shoulder. “How can 
fate be this cruel, my old friend? I would have been here sooner if not for 
the size of this cursed mountain, and then you might have been saved. 


Instead, we are wounded at the height of our triumph.” 


Eragon softly told him about Arya and the disappearance of the Twins 
and Murtagh. 


“She should not have gone,” said Jormundur, straightening, “but we can 


12 


do naught about it now. Guards will be posted here, but it will be at least 
an hour before dwarf guides can be found for another expedition into the 
tunnels.” 


‘Td be willing to lead it,” offered Orik. 


Jérmundur looked back at Tronjheim, his gaze distant. “No, Hrothgar 
will need you now; someone else will have to go. I’m sorry, Eragon, but 
everyone important must stay here until Ajihad’s successor is chosen. 
Arya will have to fend for herself... We could not overtake her anyway.” 


Eragon nodded, accepting the inevitable. 


Jérmundur swept his gaze around before saying so all could hear, “Aji- 
had has died a warrior’s death! Look, he slew five Urgals where a lesser 
man might have been overwhelmed by one. We will give him every 
honor and hope his spirit pleases the gods. Bear him and our companions 
back to Tronjheim on your shields... and do not be ashamed to let your 
tears be seen, for this is a day of sorrow that all will remember. May we 
soon have the privilege of sheathing our blades in the monsters who have 
slain our leader!” 


As one, the warriors knelt, baring their heads in homage to Ajihad. 
Then they stood and reverently lifted him on their shields so he lay be- 
tween their shoulders. Already many of the Varden wept, tears flowing 
into beards, yet they did not disgrace their duty and allow Ajihad to fall. 
With solemn steps, they marched back to Tronjheim, Saphira and Eragon 
in the middle of the procession. 


13 


THE COUNCIL OF ELDERS 





Eragon roused himself and rolled to the edge of the bed, looking about 
the room, which was suffused with the dim glow of a shuttered lantern. 
He sat and watched Saphira sleep. Her muscled sides expanded and con- 
tracted as the great bellows of her lungs forced air through her scaled 
nostrils. Eragon thought of the raging inferno that she could now sum- 
mon at will and send roaring out of her maw. It was an awesome sight 
when flames hot enough to melt metal rushed past her tongue and ivory 
teeth without harming them. Since she first breathed fire during his fight 
with Durza—while plunging toward them from the top of Tronjheim— 
Saphira had been insufferably proud of her new talent. She was con- 
stantly releasing little jets of flame, and she took every opportunity to 
light objects ablaze. 


Because Isidar Mithrim was shattered, Eragon and Saphira had been un- 
able to remain in the dragonhold above it. The dwarves had given them 
quarters in an old guardroom on Tronjheim’s bottom level. It was a large 
room, but with a low ceiling and dark walls. 


Anguish gripped Eragon as he remembered the events of the previous 
day. Tears filled his eyes, spilling over, and he caught one on his hand. 
They had heard nothing from Arya until late that evening, when she 
emerged from the tunnel, weary and footsore. Despite her best efforts— 
and all her magic—the Urgals had escaped her. “I found these,” she said. 
Then she revealed one of the Twins’ purple robes, torn and bloodied, and 
Murtagh’s tunic and both his leather gauntlets. “They were strewn along 
the edge of a black chasm, the bottom of which no tunnel reaches. The 
Urgals must have stolen their armor and weapons and thrown the bodies 
into the pit. I scryed both Murtagh and the Twins, and saw naught but 
the shadows of the abyss.” Her eyes met Eragon’s. “I’m sorry; they are 
gone.” 


Now, in the confines of his mind, Eragon mourned Murtagh. It was a 
dreadful, creeping feeling of loss and horror made worse by the fact that 
he had grown ever more familiar with it in past months. 


As he stared at the tear in his hand—a small, glistening dome—he de- 
cided to scry the three men himself. He knew it was a desperate and fu- 
tile prospect, but he had to try in order to convince himself that Murtagh 
was really gone. Even so, he was uncertain if he wanted to succeed where 
Arya had failed, if it would make him feel any better to catch a glimpse 
of Murtagh lying broken at the base of a cliff deep below Farthen Dar. 


14 


He whispered, “Draumr k6pa.” Darkness enveloped the liquid, turning 
it into a small dot of night on his silver palm. Movement flickered 
through it, like the swish of a bird across a clouded moon... then nothing. 


Another tear joined the first. 


Eragon took a deep breath, leaned back, and let calm settle over him. 
Since recovering from Durza’s wound, he had realized—humbling as it 
was—that he had prevailed only through sheer luck. If I ever face another 
Shade, or the Ra’zac, or Galbatorix, I must be stronger if I expect to win. 
Brom could have taught me more, I know he could have. But without him, I 
have but one choice: the elves. 


Saphira’s breathing quickened, and she opened her eyes, yawning ex- 
pansively. Good morning, little one. 


Is it? He looked down and leaned on his hands, compressing the mat- 
tress. It’s terrible... Murtagh and Ajihad... Why didn’t sentries in the tun- 
nels warn us of the Urgals? They shouldn’t have been able to trail Ajihad’s 
group without being noticed.... Arya was right, it doesn’t make sense. 


We may never know the truth, said Saphira gently. She stood, wings 
brushing the ceiling. You need to eat, then we must discover what the 
Varden are planning. We can’t waste time; a new leader could be chosen 
within hours. 


Eragon agreed, thinking of how they had left everyone yesterday: Orik 
rushing off to give King Hrothgar the tidings, Jormundur taking Ajihad’s 
body to a place where it would rest until the funeral, and Arya, who 
stood alone and watched the goings-on. 


Eragon rose and strapped on Zar’roc and his bow, then bent and lifted 
Snowfire’s saddle. A line of pain sheared through his torso, driving him to 
the floor, where he writhed, scrabbling at his back. It felt like he was be- 
ing sawed in half. Saphira growled as the ripping sensation reached her. 
She tried to soothe him with her own mind but was unable to alleviate 
his suffering. Her tail instinctually lifted, as if to fight. 


It took minutes before the fit subsided and the last throb faded away, 
leaving Eragon gasping. Sweat drenched his face, making his hair stick and 
his eyes sting. He reached back and gingerly fingered the top of his scar. It 
was hot and inflamed and sensitive to touch. Saphira lowered her nose 
and touched him on the arm. Oh, little one.... 


15 


It was worse this time, he said, staggering upright. She let him lean 
against her as he wiped off the sweat with a rag, then he tentatively 
stepped toward the door. 


Are you strong enough to go? 


We have to. We’re obliged as dragon and Rider to make a public choice 
regarding the next head of the Varden, and perhaps even influence the selec- 
tion. I won't ignore the strength of our position; we now wield great authority 
within the Varden. At least the Twins aren't here to grab the position for 
themselves. That’s the only good in the situation. 


Very well, but Durza should suffer a thousand years of torture for what he 
did to you. 


He grunted. Just stay close to me. 


Together they made their way through Tronjheim, toward the nearest 
kitchen. In the corridors and hallways, people stopped and bowed to 
them, murmuring “Argetlam” or “Shadeslayer.” Even dwarves made the 
motions, though not as often. Eragon was struck by the somber, haunted 
expressions of the humans and the dark clothing they wore to display 
their sadness. Many women were dressed entirely in black, lace veils cov- 
ering their faces. 


In the kitchen, Eragon brought a stone platter of food to a low table. 
Saphira watched him carefully in case he should have another attack. 
Several people tried to approach him, but she lifted a lip and growled, 
sending them scurrying away. Eragon picked at his food and pretended to 
ignore the disturbances. Finally, trying to divert his thoughts from 
Murtagh, he asked, Who do you think has the means to take control of the 
Varden now that Ajihad and the Twins are gone? 


She hesitated. It’s possible you could, if Ajihad’s last words were inter- 
preted as a blessing to secure the leadership. Almost no one would oppose 
you. However, that does not seem a wise path to take. I see only trouble in 
that direction. 


I agree. Besides, Arya wouldn’t approve, and she could be a dangerous 
enemy. Elves can’t lie in the ancient language, but they have no such inhibi- 
tion in ours—she could deny that Ajihad ever uttered those words if it 
served her purposes. No, I don’t want the position.... What about Jérmun- 
dur? 


16 


Ajihad called him his right-hand man. Unfortunately, we know little 
about him or the Varden'’s other leaders. Such a short time has passed since 
we came here. We will have to make our judgment on our feelings and im- 
pressions, without the benefit of history. 


Eragon pushed his fish around a lump of mashed tubers. Don’t forget 
Hrothgar and the dwarf clans; they won’t be quiet in this. Except for Arya, 
the elves have no say in the succession—a decision will be made before 
word of this even reaches them. But the dwarves can’t be—won’t be— 
ignored. Hrothgar favors the Varden, but if enough clans oppose him, he 
might be maneuvered into backing someone unsuited for the command. 


And who might that be? 


A person easily manipulated. He closed his eyes and leaned back. It 
could be anyone in Farthen Dir, anyone at all. 


For a long while, they both considered the issues facing them. Then 
Saphira said, Eragon, there is someone here to see you. I can’t scare him 
away. 


Eh? He cracked his eyes open, squinting as they adjusted to the light. A 
pale-looking youth stood by the table. The boy eyed Saphira like he was 
afraid she would try to eat him. “What is it?” asked Eragon, not unkindly. 


The boy started, flustered, then bowed. “You have been summoned, 
Argetlam, to speak before the Council of Elders.” 


“Who are they?” 

The question confused the boy even more. “The—the council is... are... 
people we—that is, the Varden—choose to speak on our behalf to Aji- 
had. They were his trusted advisers, and now they wish to see you. It is a 
great honor!” He finished with a quick smile. 

“Are you to lead me to them?” 

“Yes, I am.” 

Saphira looked at Eragon questioningly. He shrugged and left the un- 


eaten food, motioning for the boy to show the way. As they walked, the 
boy admired Zar’roc with bright eyes, then looked down shyly. 


7 


“What are you called?” asked Eragon. 
“Jarsha, sir.” 


“That’s a good name. You carried your message well; you should be 
proud.” Jarsha beamed and bounced forward. 


They reached a convex stone door, which Jarsha pushed open. The 
room inside was circular, with a sky blue dome decorated with constella- 
tions. A round marble table, inlaid with the crest of Dtrgrimst Ingei- 
tum—an upright hammer ringed by twelve stars—stood in the center of 
the chamber. Seated there were Jormundur and two other men, one tall 
and one broad; a woman with pinched lips, close-set eyes, and elaborately 
painted cheeks; and a second woman with an immense pile of gray hair 


above a matronly face, belied by a dagger hilt peeking out of the vast hills 
of her bodice. 


“You may go,” said Jormundur to Jarsha, who quickly bowed and left. 


Conscious that he was being watched, Eragon surveyed the room, then 
seated himself in the middle of a swath of empty chairs, so that the 
council members were forced to turn in their seats in order to look at 
him. Saphira hunkered directly behind him; he could feel her hot breath 
on the top of his head. 


Jérmundur got halfway up to make a slight bow, then reseated himself. 
“Thank you for coming, Eragon, even though you have suffered your own 
loss. This is Umérth,” the tall man; “Falberd,” the broad one; “and Sabrae 
and Elessari,” the two women. 


Eragon inclined his head, then asked, “And what of the Twins, were 
they part of this council?” 


Sabrae shook her head sharply and tapped a long fingernail on the table. 
“They had naught to do with us. They were slime—worse than slime— 
leeches that worked only for their own benefit. They had no desire to 
serve the Varden. Thus, they had no place in this council.” Eragon could 
smell her perfume all the way on the other side of the table; it was thick 
and oily, like a rotting flower. He hid a smile at the thought. 


“Enough. We're not here to discuss the Twins,” said Jormundur. “We 
face a crisis that must be dealt with quickly and effectively. If we don’t 
choose Ajihad’s successor, someone else will. Hrothgar has already con- 
tacted us to convey his condolences. While he was more than courteous, 


18 


he is sure to be forming his own plans even as we speak. We must also 
consider Du Vrangr Gata, the magic users. Most of them are loyal to the 
Varden, but it’s difficult to predict their actions even in the best of times. 
They might decide to oppose our authority for their own advantage. That 
is why we need your assistance, Eragon, to provide the legitimacy re- 
quired by whoever is to take Ajihad’s place.” 


Falberd heaved himself up, planting his meaty hands on the table. “The 
five of us have already decided whom to support. There is no doubt 
among us that it is the right person. But,” he raised a thick finger, “before 
we reveal who it is, you must give us your word of honor that whether 
you agree or disagree with us, nothing of our discussion will leave this 
room.” 


Why would they want that? Eragon asked Saphira. 


I don’t know, she said, snorting. It might be a trap.... It’s a gamble you'll 
have to take. Remember, though, they haven't asked me to pledge anything. 
I can always tell Arya what they say, if needed. Silly of them, forgetting 
that I’m as intelligent as any human. 


Pleased with the thought, Eragon said, “Very well, you have my word. 
Now, who do you want to lead the Varden?” 


“Nasuada.” 


Surprised, Eragon dropped his gaze, thinking quickly. He had not con- 
sidered Nasuada for the succession because of her youth—she was just a 
few years older than Eragon. No real reason existed, of course, for her not 
to lead, but why would the Council of Elders want her to? How would 
they benefit? He remembered Brom’s advice and tried to examine the 
issue from every angle, knowing that he had to decide swiftly. 


Nasuada has steel in her, observed Saphira. She would be like her father. 

Maybe, but what's their reason for picking her? 

To gain time, Eragon asked, “Why not you, Joérmundur? Ajihad called 
you his right-hand man. Doesn't that mean you should take his place now 
that he’s gone?” 

A current of unease ran through the council: Sabrae sat even straighter, 


hands clasped before her; Umérth and Falberd glanced at each other 
darkly, while Elessari just smiled, the dagger hilt jiggling on her chest. 


19 


“Because,” said Jormundur, selecting his words with care, “Ajihad was 
speaking of military matters then, nothing more. Also, I am a member of 
this council, which only has power because we support one another. It 
would be foolish and dangerous for one of us to raise himself above the 
rest.” The council relaxed as he finished, and Elessari patted Jormundur 
on the forearm. 


Ha! exclaimed Saphira. He probably would have taken power if it were 
possible to force the others to back him. Just look how they eye him. He’s 
like a wolf in their midst. 


A wolf in a pack of jackals, perhaps. 
“Does Nasuada have enough experience?” inquired Eragon. 


Elessari pressed herself against the table’s edge as she leaned forward. “I 
had already been here for seven years when Ajihad joined the Varden. 
I've watched Nasuada grow up from a darling girl to the woman she is. A 
trifle light-headed occasionally, but a good figure to lead the Varden. The 
people will love her. Now I,” she patted herself affectionately on the 
bosom, “and my friends will be here to guide her through these troubled 
times. She will never be without someone to show her the way. Inexpe- 
rience should be no barrier to her taking her rightful position.” 


Understanding flooded Eragon. They want a puppet! 


“Ajihad’s funeral will be held in two days,” broke in Umérth. “Directly 
afterward, we plan to appoint Nasuada as our new leader. We have yet 
to ask her, but she will surely agree. We want you to be present at the 
appointing—no one, not even Hrothgar, can complain about it then— 
and to swear fealty to the Varden. That will give back the confidence 
Ajihad’s death has stolen from the people, and prevent anyone from try- 
ing to splinter this organization.” 


Fealty! 


Saphira quickly touched Eragon’s mind. Notice, they don’t want you to 
swear to Nasuada—just to the Varden. 


Yes, and they want to be the ones to appoint Nasuada, which would indi- 
cate that the council is more powerful than she. They could have asked 
Arya or us to appoint her, but that would mean acknowledging whoever did 
it as above everyone in the Varden. This way, they assert their superiority 


20 


over Nasuada, gain control over us through fealty, and also get the benefit 
of having a Rider endorse Nasuada in public. 


“What happens,” he asked, “if I decide not to accept your offer?” 


“Offer?” Falberd asked, seeming puzzled. “Why, nothing, of course. 
Only it would be a terrible slight if you’re not present when Nasuada is 
chosen. If the hero of the battle of Farthen Dtr ignores her, what can she 
think but that a Rider has spited her and found the Varden unworthy to 
serve? Who could bear such a shame?” 


The message could have been no clearer. Eragon clenched Zar’roc’s 
pommel under the table, yearning to scream that it was unnecessary to 
force him to support the Varden, that he would have done it anyway. 
Now, however, he instinctively wanted to rebel, to elude the shackles 
they were trying to place on him. “Since Riders are so highly thought of, I 
could decide that my efforts would be best spent guiding the Varden 
myself.” 


The mood in the room hardened. “That would be unwise,” stated Sa- 
brae. 


Eragon combed his mind for a way to escape the situation. With Ajihad 
gone, said Saphira, it may be impossible to remain independent of every 
group, as he wanted us to. We cannot anger the Varden, and if this council 
is to control it once Nasuada is in place, then we must appease them. Re- 
member, they act as much out of self-preservation as we do. 


But what will they want us to do once we are in their grasp? Will they re- 
spect the Varden's pact with the elves and send us to Ellesméra for training, 
or command otherwise? Jormundur strikes me as an honorable man, but the 
rest of the council? I can’t tell. 


Saphira brushed the top of his head with her jaw. Agree to be at this 
ceremony with Nasuada; that much I think we must do. As for swearing fe- 
alty, see if you can avoid acquiescing. Perhaps something will occur between 
now and then that will change our position... Arya may have a solution. 


Without warning, Eragon nodded and said, “As you wish; I shall attend 
Nasuada’s appointment.” 


Jérmundur looked relieved. “Good, good. Then we have only one more 


matter to deal with before you go: Nasuada’s acceptance. There’s no rea- 
son to delay, with all of us here. I'll send for her immediately. And Arya 


21 


too—we need the elves’ approval before making this decision public. It 
shouldn’t be difficult to procure; Arya cannot go against our council and 
you, Eragon. She will have to agree with our judgment.” 


“Wait,” commanded Elessari, a steely glint in her eyes. “Your word, 
though, Rider. Will you give it in fealty at the ceremony?” 


“Yes, you must do that,” agreed Falberd. “The Varden would be dis- 
graced if we couldn't provide you every protection.” 


A nice way to put it! 
It was worth a try, said Saphira. I fear you have no choice now. 
They wouldn’t dare harm us if I refused. 


No, but they could cause us no end of grief. It is not for my own sake that 
I say accept, but for yours. Many dangers exist that I cannot protect you 
from, Eragon. With Galbatorix set against us, you need allies, not enemies, 
around you. We cannot afford to contend with both the Empire and the 
Varden. 


Finally, “I'll give it.” All around the table were signs of relaxation—even 
a poorly concealed sigh from Umérth. They're afraid of us! 


As well they should be, sniped Saphira. 


Jérmundur called for Jarsha, and with a few words sent the boy scam- 
pering off for Nasuada and Arya. While he was gone, the conversation 
fell into an uncomfortable silence. Eragon ignored the council, focusing 
instead on working a way out of his dilemma. None sprang to mind. 


When the door opened again, everyone turned expectantly. First came 
Nasuada, chin held high and eyes steady. Her embroidered gown was the 
deepest shade of black, deeper even than her skin, broken only by a slash 
of royal purple that stretched from shoulder to hip. Behind her was Arya, 
her stride as lithe and smooth as a cat’s, and an openly awestruck Jarsha. 


The boy was dismissed, then Jormundur helped Nasuada into a seat. 
Eragon hastened to do the same for Arya, but she ignored the proffered 
chair and stood at a distance from the table. Saphira, he said, let her know 
all that’s happened. I have a feeling the council won't inform her that 
they've compelled me to give the Varden my loyalty. 


22 


“Arya,” acknowledged J6rmundur with a nod, then concentrated on 
Nasuada. “Nasuada, Daughter of Ajihad, the Council of Elders wishes to 
formally extend its deepest condolences for the loss you, more than any- 
one else, have suffered...” In a lower voice, he added, “You have our per- 
sonal sympathies as well. We all know what it is like to have a family 
member killed by the Empire.” 


“Thank you,” murmured Nasuada, lowering her almond eyes. She sat, 
shy and demure, and with an air of vulnerability that made Eragon want 
to comfort her. Her demeanor was tragically different from that of the 
energetic young woman who had visited him and Saphira in the dragon- 


hold before the battle. 


“Although this is your time of mourning, a quandary exists that you 
must resolve. This council cannot lead the Varden. And someone must 
replace your father after the funeral. We ask that you receive the posi- 
tion. As his heir, it is rightfully yours—the Varden expect it of you.” 


Nasuada bowed her head with shining eyes. Grief was plain in her 
voice when she said, “I never thought I would be called upon to take my 
father’s place so young. Yet... if you insist it is my duty... I will embrace 
the office.” 


23 


TRUTH AMONG FRIENDS 





The Council of Elders beamed with triumph, pleased that Nasuada had 
done what they wanted. “We do insist,” said Jormundur, “for your own 
good and the good of the Varden.” The rest of the elders added their ex- 
pressions of support, which Nasuada accepted with sad smiles. Sabrae 
threw an angry glance at Eragon when he did not join in. 


Throughout the exchange, Eragon watched Arya for any reaction to ei- 
ther his news or the council’s announcement. Neither revelation caused 
her inscrutable expression to change. However, Saphira told him, She 
wishes to talk with us afterward. 


Before Eragon could reply, Falberd turned to Arya. “Will the elves find 
this agreeable?” 


She stared at Falberd until the man fidgeted under her piercing gaze, 
then lifted an eyebrow. “I cannot speak for my queen, but I find nothing 
objectionable to it. Nasuada has my blessing.” 


How could she find it otherwise, knowing what we’ve told her? thought 
Eragon bitterly. We’re all backed into corners. 


Arya’s remark obviously pleased the council. Nasuada thanked her and 
asked Joérmundur, “Is there anything else that must be discussed? For I am 
weary.” 


Jérmundur shook his head. “We will make all the arrangements. | 
promise you won't be troubled until the funeral.” 


“Again, thank you. Would you leave me now? I need time to consider 
how best to honor my father and serve the Varden. You have given me 
much to ponder.” Nasuada splayed her delicate fingers on the dark cloth 
on her lap. 


Umérth looked like he was going to protest at the council being dis- 
missed, but Falberd waved a hand, silencing him. “Of course, whatever 
will give you peace. If you need help, we are ready and willing to serve.” 
Gesturing for the rest of them to follow, he swept past Arya to the door. 

“Eragon, will you please stay?” 


Startled, Eragon lowered himself back into his chair, ignoring alert looks 


24 


from the councilors. Falberd lingered by the door, suddenly reluctant to 
depart, then slowly went out. Arya was the last to go. Before she closed 
the door, she looked at Eragon, her eyes revealing worry and apprehen- 
sion that had been concealed before. 


Nasuada sat partially turned away from Eragon and Saphira. “So we 
meet again, Rider. You haven't greeted me. Have I offended you?” 


“No, Nasuada; I was reluctant to speak for fear of being rude or foolish. 
Current circumstances are unkind to hasty statements.” Paranoia that 
they might be eavesdropped on gripped him. Reaching through the bar- 
rier in his mind, he delved into the magic and intoned: “Atra nosu waise 
vardo fra eld hornya.... There, now we may speak without being over- 
heard by man, dwarf, or elf.” 


Nasuada’s posture softened. “Thank you, Eragon. You don’t know what 
a gift that is.” Her words were stronger and more self-assured than before. 


Behind Eragon’s chair, Saphira stirred, then carefully made her way 
around the table to stand before Nasuada. She lowered her great head un- 
til one sapphire eye met Nasuada’s black ones. The dragon stared at her 
for a full minute before snorting softly and straightening. Tell her, said 
Saphira, that I grieve for her and her loss. Also that her strength must be- 
come the Varden's when she assumes Ajihad's mantle. They will need a 
sure guide. 


Eragon repeated the words, adding, “Ajihad was a great man—his name 
will always be remembered.... There is something I must tell you. Before 
Ajihad died, he charged me, commanded me, to keep the Varden from 
falling into chaos. Those were his last words. Arya heard them as well. 


“I was going to keep what he said a secret because of the implications, 
but you have a right to know. I’m not sure what Ajihad meant, nor ex- 
actly what he wanted, but I am certain of this: I will always defend the 
Varden with my powers. I wanted you to understand that, and that I’ve 
no desire to usurp the Varden’s leadership.” 


Nasuada laughed brittlely. “But that leadership isn’t to be me, is it?” Her 
reserve had vanished, leaving behind only composure and determination. 
“I know why you were here before me and what the council is trying to 
do. Do you think that in the years I served my father, we never planned 
for this eventuality? I expected the council to do exactly what it did. 
And now everything is in place for me to take command of the Varden.” 


25 


“You have no intention of letting them rule you,” said Eragon with 
wonder. 


“No. Continue to keep Ajihad’s instruction secret. It would be unwise 
to bandy it about, as people might take it to mean that he wanted you to 
succeed him, and that would undermine my authority and destabilize the 
Varden. He said what he thought he had to in order to protect the 
Varden. I would have done the same. My father...” She faltered briefly. 
“My father’s work will not go unfinished, even if it takes me to the grave. 
That is what I want you, as a Rider, to understand. All of Ajihad’s plans, 
all his strategies and goals, they are mine now. I will not fail him by being 
weak. The Empire will be brought down, Galbatorix will be dethroned, 
and the rightful government will be raised.” 


By the time she finished, a tear ran down her cheek. Eragon stared, ap- 
preciating how difficult her position was and recognizing a depth of char- 
acter he had not perceived before. “And what of me, Nasuada? What 
shall I do in the Varden?” 


She looked directly into his eyes. “You can do whatever you want. The 
council members are fools if they think to control you. You are a hero to 
the Varden and the dwarves, and even the elves will hail your victory 
over Durza when they hear of it. If you go against the council or me, we 
will be forced to yield, for the people will support you wholeheartedly. 
Right now, you are the most powerful person in the Varden. However, if 
you accept my leadership, I will continue the path laid down by Ajihad: 
you will go with Arya to the elves, be instructed there, then return to the 
Varden.” 


Why is she so honest with us? wondered Eragon. If she’s right, could we 
have refused the council’s demands? 


Saphira took a moment to answer. Either way, it’s too late. You have al- 
ready agreed to their requests. I think Nasuada is honest because your spell 


lets her be, and also because she hopes to win our loyalty from the elders. 


An idea suddenly came to Eragon, but before sharing it, he asked, Can 
we trust her to hold to what she’s said? This is very important. 


Yes, said Saphira. She spoke with her heart. 
Then Eragon shared his proposal with Saphira. She consented, so he 


drew Zar’roc and walked to Nasuada. He saw a flash of fear as he ap- 
proached; her gaze darted toward the door, and she slipped a hand into a 


26 


fold in her dress and grasped something. Eragon stopped before her, then 
knelt, Zar’roc flat in his hands. 


“Nasuada, Saphira and I have been here for only a short while. But in 
that time we came to respect Ajihad, and now, in turn, you. You fought 
under Farthen Dir when others fled, including the two women of the 
council, and have treated us openly instead of with deception. Therefore, 
I offer you my blade... and my fealty as a Rider.” 


Eragon uttered the pronouncement with a sense of finality, knowing he 
would never have mouthed it before the battle. Seeing so many men fall 
and die around him had altered his perspective. Resisting the Empire was 
no longer something he did for himself, but for the Varden and all the 
people still trapped under Galbatorix’s rule. However long it would take, 
he had dedicated himself to that task. For the time being, the best thing 
he could do was serve. 


Still, he and Saphira were taking a terrible risk in pledging themselves 
to Nasuada. The council could not object because all Eragon had said was 
that he would swear fealty, but not to whom. Even so, he and Saphira 
had no guarantee that Nasuada would make a good leader. It’s better to be 
sworn to an honest fool than to a lying scholar, decided Eragon. 


Surprise flitted across Nasuada’s face. She grasped Zar’roc’s hilt and 
lifted it—staring at its crimson blade—then placed the tip on Eragon’s 
head. “I do accept your fealty with honor, Rider, as you accept all the re- 
sponsibilities accompanying the station. Rise as my vassal and take your 
sword.” 


Eragon did as he was bidden. He said, “Now I can tell you openly as my 
master, the council made me agree to swear to the Varden once you 
were appointed. This was the only way Saphira and I could circumvent 
them.” 


Nasuada laughed with genuine delight. “Ah, I see you have already 
learned how to play our game. Very well, as my newest and only vassal, 
will you agree to give your fealty to me again—in public, when the coun- 
cil expects your vow?” 


“Of course.” 
“Good, that will take care of the council. Now, until then, leave me. I 


have much planning to do, and I must prepare for the funeral... Remem- 
ber, Eragon, the bond we have just created is equally binding; I am as re- 


27 


sponsible for your actions as you are required to serve me. Do not dis- 
honor me.” 


“Nor you I.” 


Nasuada paused, then gazed into his eyes and added in a gentler tone: 
“You have my condolences, Eragon. I realize that others beside myself 
have cause for sorrow; while I have lost my father, you have also lost a 
friend. I liked Murtagh a great deal and it saddens me that he is gone... 
Goodbye, Eragon.” 


Eragon nodded, a bitter taste in his mouth, and left the room with 
Saphira. The hallway outside was empty along its gray length. Eragon put 
his hands on his hips, tilted back his head, and exhaled. The day had 
barely begun, yet he was already exhausted by all the emotions that had 
flooded through him. 


Saphira nosed him and said, This way. Without further explanation, 
she headed down the right side of the tunnel. Her polished claws clicked 
on the hard floor. 


Eragon frowned, but followed her. Where are we going? No answer. 
Saphira, please. She just flicked her tail. Resigned to wait, he said instead, 
Things have certainly changed for us. I never know what to expect from one 
day to the next—except sorrow and bloodshed. 


All is not bad, she reproached. We have won a great victory. It should be 
celebrated, not mourned. 


It doesn't help, having to deal with this other nonsense. 

She snorted angrily. A thin line of fire shot from her nostrils, singeing 
Eragon’s shoulder. He jumped back with a yelp, biting back a string of 
curses. Oops, said Saphira, shaking her head to clear the smoke. 

Oops! You nearly roasted my side! 

I didn’t expect it to happen. I keep forgetting that fire will come out if I’m 
not careful. Imagine that every time you raised your arm, lightning struck 
the ground. It would be easy to make a careless motion and destroy some- 


thing unintentionally. 


You’re right.... Sorry I growled at you. 


28 


Her bony eyelid clicked as she winked at him. No matter. The point I 
was trying to make is that even Nasuada can't force you to do anything. 


But I gave my word as a Rider! 


Maybe so, but if I must break it to keep you safe, or to do the right thing, I 
will not hesitate. It is a burden I could easily carry. Because I'm joined to 
you, my honor is inherent in your pledge, but as an individual, I’m not 
bound by it. If I must, I will kidnap you. Any disobedience then would be 
no fault of your own. 


It should never come to that. If we have to use such tricks to do what’s 
right, then Nasuada and the Varden will have lost all integrity. 


Saphira stopped. They stood before the carved archway of Tronjheim’s 
library. The vast, silent room seemed empty, though the ranks of back- 
to-back bookshelves interspersed with columns could conceal many peo- 
ple. Lanterns poured soft light across the scroll-covered walls, illuminat- 
ing the reading alcoves along their bases. 


Weaving through the shelves, Saphira led him to one alcove, where 
Arya sat. Eragon paused as he studied her. She seemed more agitated than 
he had ever seen her, though it manifested itself only in the tension of her 
movements. Unlike before, she wore her sword with the graceful cross- 
guard. One hand rested on the hilt. 


Eragon sat at the opposite side of the marble table. Saphira positioned 
herself between them, where neither could escape her gaze. 


“What have you done?” asked Arya with unexpected hostility. 
“How so?” 


She lifted her chin. “What have you promised the Varden? What have 
you done?” 


The last part even reached Eragon mentally. He realized just how close 
the elf was to losing control. A bit of fear touched him. “We only did 
what we had to. I’m ignorant of elves’ customs, so if our actions upset 
you, I apologize. There’s no cause to be angry.” 


“Fool! You know nothing about me. I have spent seven decades repre- 


senting my queen here—fifteen years of which I bore Saphira’s egg be- 
tween the Varden and the elves. In all that time, I struggled to ensure the 


29 


Varden had wise, strong leaders who could resist Galbatorix and respect 
our wishes. Brom helped me by forging the agreement concerning the 
new Rider—you. Ajihad was committed to your remaining independent 
so that the balance of power would not be upset. Now I see you siding 
with the Council of Elders, willingly or not, to control Nasuada! You 
have overturned a lifetime of work! What have you done?” 


Dismayed, Eragon dropped all pretenses. With short, clear words, he 
explained why he had agreed to the council’s demands and how he and 
Saphira had attempted to undermine them. 


When he finished, Arya stated, “So.” 


“So.” Seventy years. Though he knew elves’ lives were extraordinarily 
long, he had never suspected that Arya was that old, and older, for she 
appeared to be a woman in her early twenties. The only sign of age on 
her unlined face was her emerald eyes—deep, knowing, and most often 
solemn. 


Arya leaned back, studying him. “Your position is not what I would 
wish, but better than I had hoped. I was impolite; Saphira... and you... 
understand more than I thought. Your compromise will be accepted by 
the elves, though you must never forget your debt to us for Saphira. 
There would be no Riders without our efforts.” 


“The debt is burned into my blood and my palm,” said Eragon. In the si- 
lence that followed, he cast about for a new topic, eager to prolong their 
conversation and perhaps learn more about her. “You have been gone for 
such a long time; do you miss Ellesméra? Or did you live elsewhere?” 


“Ellesméra was, and always shall be, my home,” she said, looking be- 
yond him. “I have not lived in my family’s house since I left for the 
Varden, when the walls and windows were draped with spring’s first 
flowers. The times I’ve returned were only fleeting stays, vanishing flecks 
of memory by our measurement.” 


He noticed, once again, that she smelled like crushed pine needles. It 
was a faint, spicy odor that opened his senses and refreshed his mind. “It 
must be hard to live among all these dwarves and humans without any of 
your kind.” 


She cocked her head. “You speak of humans as if you weren't one.” 


“Perhaps...,” he hesitated, “perhaps I am something else—a mixture of 


30 


two races. Saphira lives inside me as much as I live in her. We share feel- 
ings, senses, thoughts, even to the point where we are more one mind 
than two.” Saphira dipped her head in agreement, nearly bumping the ta- 
ble with her snout. 


“That is how it should be,” said Arya. “A pact more ancient and power- 
ful than you can imagine links you. You won't truly understand what it 
means to be a Rider until your training is completed. But that must wait 
until after the funeral. In the meantime, may the stars watch over you.” 

With that she departed, slipping into the library’s shadowed depths. Er- 
agon blinked. Is it me, or is everyone on edge today? Like Arya—one mo- 
ment she’s angry, the next she’s giving me a blessing! 


No one will be comfortable until things return to normal. 


Define normal. 


31 


RORAN 





Roran trudged up the hill. 


He stopped and squinted at the sun through his shaggy hair. Five hours 
till sunset. I won't be able to stay long. With a sigh, he continued along the 
row of elm trees, each of which stood in a pool of uncut grass. 


This was his first visit to the farm since he, Horst, and six other men 
from Carvahall had removed everything worth salvaging from the de- 
stroyed house and burned barn. It had been nearly five months before he 
could consider returning. 


Once on the hilltop, Roran halted and crossed his arms. Before him lay 
the remains of his childhood home. A corner of the house still stood— 
crumbling and charred—but the rest had been flattened and was already 
covered with grass and weeds. Nothing could be seen of the barn. The 
few acres they had managed to cultivate each year were now filled with 
dandelions, wild mustard, and more grass. Here and there, stray beets or 
turnips had survived, but that was all. Just beyond the farm, a thick belt 
of trees obscured the Anora River. 


Roran clenched a fist, jaw muscles knotting painfully as he fought back 
a combination of rage and grief. He stayed rooted to the spot for many 
long minutes, trembling whenever a pleasant memory rushed through 
him. This place had been his entire life and more. It had been his past... 
and his future. His father, Garrow, once said, “The land is a special thing. 
Care for it, and it'll care for you. Not many things will do that.” Roran 
had intended to do exactly that up until the moment his world was rup- 
tured by a quiet message from Baldor. 


With a groan, he spun away and stalked back toward the road. The 
shock of that moment still resonated within him. Having everyone he 
loved torn away in an instant was a soul-changing event from which he 
would never recover. It had seeped into every aspect of his behavior and 
outlook. 


It also forced Roran to think more than ever before. It was as if bands 
had been cinched around his mind, and those bands had snapped, allow- 
ing him to ponder ideas that were previously unimaginable. Such as the 
fact that he might not become a farmer, or that justice—the greatest 
standby in songs and legends—had little hold in reality. At times these 
thoughts filled his consciousness to the point where he could barely rise 


32 


in the morning, feeling bloated with their heaviness. 


Turning on the road, he headed north through Palancar Valley, back to 
Carvahall. The notched mountains on either side were laden with snow, 
despite the spring greenery that had crept over the valley floor in past 
weeks. Overhead, a single gray cloud drifted toward the peaks. 


Roran ran a hand across his chin, feeling the stubble. Eragon caused all 
this—him and his blasted curiosity—by bringing that stone out of the Spine. 
It had taken Roran weeks to reach that conclusion. He had listened to 
everyone’s accounts. Several times he had Gertrude, the town healer, 
read aloud the letter Brom had left him. And there was no other explana- 
tion. Whatever that stone was, it must have attracted the strangers. For that 
alone, he blamed Garrow’s death on Eragon, though not in anger; he 
knew that Eragon had intended no harm. No, what roused his fury was 
that Eragon had left Garrow unburied and fled Palancar Valley, abandon- 
ing his responsibilities to gallop off with the old storyteller on some hare- 
brained journey. How could Eragon have so little regard for those left be- 
hind? Did he run because he felt guilty? Afraid? Did Brom mislead him 
with wild tales of adventure? And why would Eragon listen to such things at 
a time like that?... I don’t even know if he’s dead or alive right now. 


Roran scowled and rolled his shoulders, trying to clear his mind. Brom’s 
letter... Bah! He had never heard a more ridiculous collection of insinua- 
tions and ominous hints. The only thing it made clear was to avoid the 
strangers, which was common sense to begin with. The old man was 
crazy, he decided. 


A flicker of movement caused Roran to turn, and he saw twelve deer— 
including a young buck with velvet horns—trotting back into the trees. 
He made sure to note their location so he could find them tomorrow. He 
was proud that he could hunt well enough to support himself in Horst’s 
house, though he had never been as skilled as Eragon. 


As he walked, he continued to order his thoughts. After Garrow’s 
death, Roran had abandoned his job at Dempton’s mill in Therinsford and 
returned to Carvahall. Horst had agreed to house him and, in the follow- 
ing months, had provided him with work in the forge. Grief had delayed 
Roran’s decisions about the future until two days ago, when he finally 
settled upon a course of action. 


He wanted to marry Katrina, the butcher’s daughter. The reason he 


went to Therinsford in the first place was to earn money to ensure a 
smooth beginning to their life together. But now, without a farm, a home, 


33 


or means to support her, Roran could not in good conscience ask for 
Katrina’s hand. His pride would not allow it. Nor did Roran think Sloan, 
her father, would tolerate a suitor with such poor prospects. Even under 
the best of circumstances, Roran had expected to have a hard time con- 
vincing Sloan to give up Katrina; the two of them had never been 
friendly. And it was impossible for Roran to wed Katrina without her fa- 
ther’s consent, not unless they wished to divide her family, anger the vil- 
lage by defying tradition, and, most likely, start a blood feud with Sloan. 


Considering the situation, it seemed to Roran that the only option 
available to him was to rebuild his farm, even if he had to raise the house 
and barn himself. It would be hard, starting from nothing, but once his 
position was secured, he could approach Sloan with his head held high. 
Next spring is the soonest we might talk, thought Roran, grimacing. 


He knew Katrina would wait—for a time, at least. 


He continued at a steady pace until evening, when the village came 
into view. Within the small huddle of buildings, wash hung on lines 
strung from window to window. Men filed back toward the houses from 
surrounding fields thick with winter wheat. Behind Carvahall, the half- 
mile-high Igualda Falls gleamed in the sunset as it tumbled down the 
Spine into the Anora. The sight warmed Roran because it was so ordi- 
nary. Nothing was more comforting than having everything where it 


should be. 


Leaving the road, he made his way up the rise to where Horst’s house 
sat with a view of the Spine. The door was already open. Roran tromped 
inside, following the sounds of conversation into the kitchen. 


Horst was there, leaning on the rough table pushed into one corner of 
the room, his arms bare to the elbow. Next to him was his wife, Elain, 
who was nearly five months pregnant and smiling with quiet content- 
ment. Their sons, Albriech and Baldor, faced them. 


As Roran entered, Albriech said, “... and I still hadn't left the forge yet! 
Thane swears he saw me, but I was on the other side of town.” 


“What’s going on?” asked Roran, slipping off his pack. 
Elain exchanged a glance with Horst. “Here, let me get you something 
to eat.” She set bread and a bowl of cold stew before him. Then she 


looked him in the eye, as if searching for a particular expression. “How 
was it?” 


34 


Roran shrugged. “All of the wood is either burnt or rotting—nothing 
worth using. The well is still intact, and that’s something to be grateful 
for, I suppose. I'll have to cut timber for the house as soon as possible if 
I’m going to have a roof over my head by planting season. Now tell me, 
what's happened?” 


“Ha!” exclaimed Horst. “There’s been quite a row, there has. Thane is 
missing a scythe and he thinks Albriech took it.” 


“He probably dropped it in the grass and forgot where he left it,” 
snorted Albriech. 


“Probably,” agreed Horst, smiling. 


Roran bit into the bread. “It doesn’t make much sense, accusing you. If 
you needed a scythe, you could just forge one.” 


“I know,” said Albriech, dropping into a chair, “but instead of looking 
for his, he starts grousing that he saw someone leaving his field and that it 
looked a bit like me... and since no one else looks like me, I must have 
stolen the scythe.” 


It was true that no one looked like him. Albriech had inherited both 
his father’s size and Elain’s honey-blond hair, which made him an oddity 


in Carvahall, where brown was the predominant hair color. In contrast, 
Baldor was both thinner and dark-haired. 


‘I’m sure it'll turn up,” said Baldor quietly. “Try not to get too angry 
over it in the meantime.” 


“Easy for you to say.” 


As Roran finished the last of the bread and started on the stew, he 
asked Horst, “Do you need me for anything tomorrow?” 


“Not especially. I'll just be working on Quimby’s wagon. The blasted 
frame still won't sit square.” 


Roran nodded, pleased. “Good. Then I'll take the day and go hunting. 
There are a few deer farther down the valley that don’t look too scrawny. 


Their ribs weren't showing, at least.” 


Baldor suddenly brightened. “Do you want some company?” 


35 


“Sure. We can leave at dawn.” 


When he finished eating, Roran scrubbed his face and hands clean, then 
wandered outside to clear his head. Stretching leisurely, he strolled to- 
ward the center of town. 


Halfway there, the chatter of excited voices outside the Seven Sheaves 
caught his attention. He turned, curious, and made his way to the tavern, 
where an odd sight met him. Sitting on the porch was a middle-aged man 
draped in a patchwork leather coat. Beside him was a pack festooned 
with the steel jaws of the trappers’ trade. Several dozen villagers listened 
as he gestured expansively and said, “So when I arrived at Therinsford, I 
went to this man, Neil. Good, honest man; I help in his fields during the 
spring and summer.” 


Roran nodded. Trappers spent the winter squirreled away in the moun- 
tains, returning in the spring to sell their skins to tanners like Gedric and 
then to take up work, usually as farmhands. Since Carvahall was the 
northernmost village in the Spine, many trappers passed through it, 
which was one of the reasons Carvahall had its own tavern, blacksmith, 
and tanner. 


“After a few steins of ale—to lubricate my speaking, you understand, 
after a ’alf year with nary a word uttered, except perhaps for blaspheming 
the world and all beyond when losing a bear-biter—I come to Neil, the 
froth still fresh on my beard, and start exchanging gossip. As our transac- 
tion proceeds, I ask him all gregarious-like, what news of the Empire or 
the king—may he rot with gangrene and trench mouth. Was anyone born 
or died or banished that I should know of? And then guess what? Neil 
leaned forward, going all serious bout the mouth, and said that word is 
going around, there is, from Dras-Leona and Gil’ead of strange happen- 
ings here, there, and everywhere in Alagaésia. The Urgals have fair disap- 
peared from civilized lands, and good riddance, but not one man can tell 
why or where. ’Alf the trade in the Empire has dried up as a result of 
raids and attacks and, from what I heard, it isn’t the work of mere brig- 
ands, for the attacks are too widespread, too calculated. No goods are sto- 
len, only burned or soiled. But that’s not the end of it, oh no, not by the 
tip of your blessed grandmother’s whiskers.” 


The trapper shook his head and took a sip from his wineskin before 
continuing: “There be mutterings of a Shade haunting the northern terri- 


36 


tories. He’s been seen along the edge of Du Weldenvarden and near 
Gil’ead. They say his teeth are filed to points, his eyes are as red as wine, 
and his hair is as red as the blood he drinks. Worse, something seems to 
have gotten our fine, mad monarch’s dander up, so it has. Five days past, 
a juggler from the south stopped in Therinsford on his lonesome way to 
Ceunon, and he said that troops have been moving and gathering, though 
for what was beyond him.” He shrugged. “As my pap taught me when | 
was a suckling babe, where there’s smoke, there’s fire. Perhaps it’s the 
Varden. They’ve caused old Iron Bones enough pain in the arse over the 
years. Or perhaps Galbatorix finally decided he’s had enough of tolerating 
Surda. At least he knows where to find it, unlike those rebels. He’ll crush 
Surda like a bear crushes an ant, he will.” 


Roran blinked as a babble of questions exploded around the trapper. 
He was inclined to doubt the report of a Shade—it sounded too much 
like a story a drunk woodsman might invent—but the rest of it all 
sounded bad enough to be true. Surda... Little information reached Car- 
vahall about that distant country, but Roran at least knew that, although 
Surda and the Empire were ostensibly at peace, Surdans lived in constant 
fear that their more powerful neighbor to the north would invade them. 
For that reason, it was said that Orrin, their king, supported the Varden. 


If the trapper was right about Galbatorix, then it could mean ugly war 
crouched in the future, accompanied by the hardships of increased taxes 
and forced conscription. I would rather live in an age devoid of momentous 
events. Upheaval makes already difficult lives, such as ours, nigh impossi- 


ble. 


“What’s more, there have even been tales of...” Here the trapper paused 
and, with a knowing expression, tapped the side of his nose with his fore- 
finger. “Tales of a new Rider in Alagaésia.” He laughed then, a big, hearty 
laugh, slapping his belly as he rocked back on the porch. 


Roran laughed as well. Stories of Riders appeared every few years. They 
had excited his interest the first two or three times, but he soon learned 
not to trust such accounts, for they all came to naught. The rumors were 
nothing more than wishful thinking on the part of those who longed for a 
brighter future. 


He was about to head off when he noticed Katrina standing by the cor- 
ner of the tavern, garbed in a long russet dress decorated with green rib- 
bon. She gazed at him with the same intensity with which he gazed at 
her. Going over, he touched her on the shoulder and, together, they 
slipped away. 


37 


They walked to the edge of Carvahall, where they stood looking at the 
stars. The heavens were brilliant, shimmering with thousands of celestial 
fires. And arching above them, from north to south, was the glorious 
pearly band that streamed from horizon to horizon, like diamond dust 
tossed from a pitcher. 


Without looking at him, Katrina rested her head on Roran’s shoulder 
and asked, “How was your day?” 


“I returned home.” He felt her stiffen against him. 
“What was it like?” 


“Terrible.” His voice caught and he fell silent, holding her tightly. The 
scent of her copper hair on his cheek was like an elixir of wine and spice 
and perfume. It seeped deep inside him, warm and comforting. “The 
house, the barn, the fields, they’re all being overrun.... 1 wouldn't have 
found them if I didn’t know where to look.” 


She finally turned to face him, stars flashing in her eyes, sorrow on her 
face. “Oh, Roran.” She kissed him, lips brushing his for a brief moment. 
“You have endured so much loss, and yet your strength has never failed 
you. Will you return to your farm now?” 


“Aye. Farming is all I know.” 
“And what shall become of me?” 


He hesitated. From the moment he began to court her, an unspoken as- 
sumption that they would marry had existed between them. There had 
been no need to discuss his intentions; they were as plain as the day was 
long, and so her question unsettled him. It also felt improper to address 
the issue in such an open manner when he was not ready to tender an of- 
fer. It was his place to make the overtures—first to Sloan and then to 
Katrina—not hers. Still, he had to deal with her concern now that it had 
been expressed. “Katrina... | cannot approach your father as I had planned. 
He would laugh at me, and rightly so. We have to wait. Once I have a 
place for us to live and I’ve collected my first harvest, then he will listen 
to me.” 


She faced the sky once more and whispered something so faint, he 
could not make it out. “What?” 


38 


“I said, are you afraid of him?” 
“Of course not! I—’” 


“Then you must get his permission, tomorrow, and set the engagement. 
Make him understand that, though you have nothing now, you will give 
me a good home and be a son-in-law he can be proud of. There’s no rea- 
son we should waste our years living apart when we feel like this.” 


“I can’t do that,” he said with a note of despair, willing her to under- 
stand. “I can’t provide for you, I can’t—’” 


“Don't you understand ?” She stepped away, her voice strained with ur- 
gency. “I love you, Roran, and I want to be with you, but Father has other 
plans for me. There are far more eligible men than you, and the longer 
you delay, the more he presses me to consent to a match of which he ap- 
proves. He fears I will become an old maid, and I fear that too. I have 
only so much time or choice in Carvahall.... If I must take another, I will.” 
Tears glistened in her eyes as she gave him a searching glance, waiting for 
his response, then gathered up her dress and rushed back to the houses. 


Roran stood there, motionless with shock. Her absence was as acute for 
him as losing the farm—the world suddenly gone cold and unfriendly. It 


was as if part of himself had been torn away. 


It was hours before he could return to Horst’s and slip into bed. 


39 


THE HUNTED HUNTERS 





Dirt crunched under Roran’s boots as he led the way down the valley, 
which was cool and pale in the early hours of the overcast morning. Bal- 
dor followed close behind, both of them carrying strung bows. Neither 
spoke as they studied their surroundings for signs of the deer. 


“There,” said Baldor in a low voice, pointing at a set of tracks leading 
toward a bramble on the edge of the Anora. 


Roran nodded and started after the spoor. It looked about a day old, so 
he risked speaking. “Could I have your advice, Baldor? You seem to have 
a good understanding of people.” 


“Of course. What is it?” 


For a long time, the pad of their feet was the only noise. “Sloan wants 
to marry off Katrina, and not to me. Every day that passes increases the 
chance he will arrange a union to his liking.” 


“What does Katrina say of this?” 


Roran shrugged. “He is her father. She cannot continue to defy his will 
when no one she does want has stepped forward to claim her.” 


“That is, you.” 

“Aye.” 

“And that’s why you were up so early.” It was no question. 

In fact, Roran had been too worried to sleep at all. He had spent the 
entire night thinking about Katrina, trying to find a solution to their pre- 
dicament. “I can’t bear to lose her. But I don’t think Sloan will give us his 


blessing, what with my position and all.” 


“No, I don’t think he would,” agreed Baldor. He glanced at Roran out of 
the corner of his eye. “What is it you want my advice on, though?” 


A snort of laughter escaped Roran. “How can I convince Sloan other- 
wise? How can I resolve this dilemma without starting a blood feud?” He 


threw his hands up. “What should I do?” 


40 


“Have you no ideas?” 


“I do, but not of a sort I find pleasing. It occurred to me that Katrina 
and I could simply announce we were engaged—not that we are yet— 
and hang the consequences. That would force Sloan to accept our be- 
trothal.” 


A frown creased Baldor’s brow. He said carefully, “Maybe, but it would 
also create a slew of bad feelings throughout Carvahall. Few would ap- 
prove of your actions. Nor would it be wise to force Katrina to choose 
between you or her family; she might resent you for it in years to come.” 


“I know, but what alternative do I have?” 


“Before you take such a drastic step, I recommend you try to win Sloan 
over as an ally. There’s a chance you might succeed, after all, if it’s made 
clear to him that no one else will want to marry an angry Katrina. Espe- 
cially when you're around to cuckold the husband.” Roran grimaced and 
kept his gaze on the ground. Baldor laughed. “If you fail, well then, you 
can proceed with confidence, knowing that you have indeed exhausted 
all other routes. And people will be less likely to spit upon you for break- 
ing tradition and more likely to say Sloan’s bullheaded ways brought it 
upon himself.” 


“Neither course is easy.” 


“You knew that to begin with.” Baldor grew somber again. “No doubt 
there'll be harsh words if you challenge Sloan, but things will settle down 
in the end—perhaps not comfortably, but at least bearably. Aside from 
Sloan, the only people you'll really offend are prudes like Quimby, 
though how Quimby can brew such a hale drink yet be so starched and 
bitter himself is beyond me.” 


Roran nodded, understanding. Grudges could simmer for years in Car- 
vahall. “I’m glad we could talk. It’s been...” He faltered, thinking of all the 
discussions he and Eragon used to share. They had been, as Eragon once 
said, brothers in all but blood. It had been deeply comforting to know 
that someone existed who would listen to him, no matter the time or 
circumstances. And to know that person would always help him, no mat- 
ter the cost. 


The absence of such a bond left Roran feeling empty. 


Baldor did not press him to finish his sentence, but instead stopped to 


41 


drink from his waterskin. Roran continued for a few yards, then halted as 
a scent intruded on his thoughts. 


It was the heavy odor of seared meat and charred pine boughs. Who 
would be here besides us? Breathing deeply, he turned in a circle, trying to 
determine the source of the fire. A slight gust brushed past him from far- 
ther down the road, carrying a hot, smoky wave. The aroma of food was 
intense enough to make his mouth water. 


He beckoned to Baldor, who hurried to his side. “Smell that?” 


Baldor nodded. Together they returned to the road and followed it 
south. About a hundred feet away, it bent around a copse of cotton- 
woods and curved out of view. As they approached the turn, the rise and 
fall of voices reached them, muffled by the thick layer of morning fog 
over the valley. 


At the copse’s fringe, Roran slowed to a stop. It was foolish to surprise 
people when they too might be out hunting. Still, something bothered 
him. Perhaps it was the number of voices; the group seemed bigger than 
any family in the valley. Without thinking, he stepped off the road and 
slipped behind the underbrush lining the copse. 


“What are you doing?” whispered Baldor. 


Roran put a finger to his lips, then crept along, parallel to the road, 
keeping his footsteps as quiet as possible. As they rounded the bend, he 
froze. 


On the grass by the road was a camp of soldiers. Thirty helmets 
gleamed in a shaft of morning light as their owners devoured fowl and 
stew cooked over several fires. The men were mud splattered and travel 
stained, but Galbatorix’s symbol was still visible on their red tunics, a 
twisting flame outlined in gold thread. Underneath the tunics, they wore 
leather brigandines—heavy with riveted squares of steel—mail shirts, and 
then padded gambesons. Most of the soldiers bore broadswords, though 
half a dozen were archers and another half-dozen carried wicked-looking 


halberds. 


And hunched in their midst were two twisted black forms that Roran 
recognized from the numerous descriptions the villagers provided upon 
his return from Therinsford: the strangers who had destroyed his farm. 
His blood chilled. They’re servants of the Empire! He began to step for- 
ward, fingers already reaching for an arrow, when Baldor grabbed his jer- 


42 


kin and dragged him to the ground. 
“Don’t. You'll get us both killed.” 


Roran glared at him, then snarled. “That’s... they’re the bastards...” He 
stopped, noticing that his hands were shaking. “They’ve returned!” 


“Roran,” whispered Baldor intently, “you can’t do anything. Look, they 
work for the king. Even if you managed to escape, you'd be an outlaw 
everywhere, and you'd bring disaster on Carvahall.” 


“What do they want? What can they want?” The king. Why did Galba- 


torix countenance my father’s torture? 


“If they didn’t get what they needed from Garrow, and Eragon fled 
with Brom, then they must want you.” Baldor paused, letting the words 
sink in. “We have to get back and warn everyone. Then you have to hide. 
The strangers are the only ones with horses. We can get there first if we 


” 


run. 


Roran stared through the brush at the oblivious soldiers. His heart 
pounded fiercely for revenge, clamoring to attack and fight, to see those 
two agents of misfortune pierced with arrows and brought to their own 
justice. It mattered not that he would die as long as he could wash clean 
his pain and sorrow in one fell moment. All he had to do was break 
cover. The rest would take care of itself. 


Just one small step. 


With a choked sob, he clenched his fist and dropped his head. I can’t 
leave Katrina. He remained rigid—eyes squeezed shut—then with ago- 
nizing slowness dragged himself back. “Home then.” 


Without waiting for Baldor’s reaction, Roran slipped through the trees 
as fast as he dared. Once the camp was out of sight, he broke out onto 
the road and ran down the dirt track, channeling his frustration, anger, 
and even fear into speed. 


Baldor scrambled behind him, gaining on the open stretches. Roran 
slowed to a comfortable trot and waited for him to draw level before 
saying, “You spread the word. I'll talk with Horst.” Baldor nodded, and 
they pushed on. 


After two miles, they stopped to drink and rest briefly. When their 


43 


panting subsided, they continued through the low hills preceding Carva- 
hall. The rolling ground slowed them considerably, but even so, the vil- 
lage soon burst into view. 


Roran immediately broke for the forge, leaving Baldor to make his way 
to the center of town. As he pounded past the houses, Roran wildly con- 
sidered schemes to evade or kill the strangers without incurring the 
wrath of the Empire. 

He burst into the forge to catch Horst tapping a peg into the side of 
Quimby’s wagon, singing: 

.. hey O! 

And a ringing and a dinging 

Rang from old iron! Wily old iron. 

With a beat and a bang on the bones of the land, 

I conquered wily old iron! 

Horst stopped his mallet in midblow when he saw Roran. “What’s the 
matter, lad? Is Baldor hurt?” 

Roran shook his head and leaned over, gasping for air. In short bursts, 
he reiterated all they had seen and its possible implications, most impor- 
tantly that it was now clear the strangers were agents of the Empire. 

Horst fingered his beard. “You have to leave Carvahall. Fetch some 
food from the house, then take my mare—Ivor’s pulling stumps with 
her—and ride into the foothills. Once we know what the soldiers want, 
I'll send Albriech or Baldor with word.” 

“What will you say if they ask for me?” 

“That you're out hunting and we don’t know when you'll return. It’s 
true enough, and I doubt they'll chance blundering around in the trees for 


fear of missing you. Assuming it’s you they’re really after.” 


Roran nodded, then turned and ran to Horst’s house. Inside, he grabbed 
the mare’s tack and bags from the wall, quickly tied turnips, beets, jerky, 


44 


and a loaf of bread in a knot of blankets, snatched up a tin pot, and 
dashed out, pausing only long enough to explain the situation to Elain. 


The supplies were an awkward bundle in his arms as he jogged east 
from Carvahall to Ivor’s farm. Ivor himself stood behind the farmhouse, 
flicking the mare with a willow wand as she strained to tear the hairy 
roots of an elm tree from the ground. 


“Come on now!” shouted the farmer. “Put your back into it!” The horse 
shuddered with effort, her bit lathered, then with a final surge tilted the 
stump on its side so the roots reached toward the sky like a cluster of 
gnarled fingers. Ivor stopped her exertion with a twitch of the reins and 
patted her good-naturedly. “All right.... There we go.” 


Roran hailed him from a distance and, when they were close, pointed 
to the horse. “I need to borrow her.” He gave his reasons. 


Ivor swore and began unhitching the mare, grumbling, “Always the 
moment I get a bit of work done, that’s when the interruption comes. 
Never before.” He crossed his arms and frowned as Roran cinched the 
saddle, intent on his work. 


When he was ready, Roran swung onto the horse, bow in hand. “I am 
sorry for the trouble, but it can’t be helped.” 


“Well, don’t worry about it. Just make sure you aren't caught.” 
‘T'll do that.” 


As he set heels to the mare’s sides, Roran heard Ivor call, “And don’t be 
hiding up my creek!” 


Roran grinned and shook his head, bending low over the horse’s neck. 
He soon reached the foothills of the Spine and worked his way up to the 
mountains that formed the north end of Palancar Valley. From there he 
climbed to a point on the mountainside where he could observe Carva- 
hall without being seen. Then he picketed his steed and settled down to 
wait. 


Roran shivered, eyeing the dark pines. He disliked being this close to 
the Spine. Hardly anyone from Carvahall dared set foot in the mountain 


range, and those who did often failed to return. 


Before long Roran saw the soldiers march up the road in a double line, 


45 


two ominous black figures at their head. They were stopped at the edge 
of Carvahall by a ragged group of men, some of them with picks in hand. 
The two sides spoke, then simply faced each other, like growling dogs 
waiting to see who would strike first. After a long moment, the men of 
Carvahall moved aside and let the intruders pass. 


What happens now? wondered Roran, rocking back on his heels. 


By evening the soldiers had set up camp in a field adjacent to the vil- 
lage. Their tents formed a low gray block that flickered with weird shad- 
ows as sentries patrolled the perimeter. In the center of the block, a large 
fire sent billows of smoke into the air. 


Roran had made his own camp, and now he simply watched and 
thought. He always assumed that when the strangers destroyed his home, 
they got what they wanted, which was the stone Eragon brought from 
the Spine. They must not have found it, he decided. Perhaps Eragon man- 
aged to escape with the stone.... Perhaps he felt that he had to leave in order 
to protect it. He frowned. That would go a long way toward explaining 
why Eragon fled, but it still seemed far-fetched to Roran. Whatever the 
reason, that stone must be a fantastic treasure for the king to send so many 
men to retrieve it. I can’t understand what would make it so valuable. 
Maybe it’s magic. 


He breathed deeply of the cool air, listening to the hoot of an owl. A 
flicker of movement caught his attention. Glancing down the mountain, 
he saw a man approaching in the forest below. Roran ducked behind a 
boulder, bow drawn. He waited until he was sure it was Albriech, then 


whistled softly. 

Albriech soon arrived at the boulder. On his back was an overfull pack, 
which he dropped to the ground with a grunt. “I thought I’d never find 
you.” 

“I’m surprised you did.” 

“Can't say I enjoyed wandering through the forest after sundown. I kept 
expecting to walk into a bear, or worse. The Spine isn’t a fit place for 


men, if you ask me.” 


Roran looked back out at Carvahall. “So why are they here?” 


46 


“To take you into custody. They’re willing to wait as long as they have 
to for you to return from ‘hunting.’ ” 


Roran sat with a hard thump, his gut clenched with cold anticipation. 
“Did they give a reason? Did they mention the stone?” 


Albriech shook his head. “All they would say is that it’s the king’s busi- 
ness. The whole day they’ve been asking questions about you and Er- 
agon—it’s all they’re interested in.” He hesitated. “I’d stay, but they'll no- 
tice if ]am missing tomorrow. I brought plenty of food and blankets, plus 
some of Gertrude’s salves in case you injure yourself. You should be fine 
up here.” 


Summoning his energy, Roran smiled. “Thanks for the help.” 
“Anyone would do it,” said Albriech with an embarrassed shrug. He 


started to leave, then tossed over his shoulder, “By the way, the two 
strangers... they’re called the Ra’zac.” 


47 


SAPHIRA’S PROMISE 





The morning after meeting with the Council of Elders, Eragon was 
cleaning and oiling Saphira’s saddle—careful not to overexert himself— 
when Orik came to visit. The dwarf waited until Eragon finished with a 
strap, then asked, “Are you better today?” 


“A little.” 


“Good, we all need our strength. I came partly to see to your health and 
also because Hrothgar wishes to speak with you, if you are free.” 


Eragon gave the dwarf a wry smile. “I’m always free for him. He must 
know that.” 


Orik laughed. “Ah, but it’s polite to ask nicely.” As Eragon put down 
the saddle, Saphira uncoiled from her padded corner and greeted Orik 
with a friendly growl. “Morning to you as well,” he said with a bow. 


Orik led them through one of Tronjheim’s four main corridors, toward 
its central chamber and the two mirroring staircases that curved under- 
ground to the dwarf king’s throne room. Before they reached the cham- 
ber, however, he turned down a small flight of stairs. It took Eragon a 
moment to realize that Orik had taken a side passageway to avoid seeing 
the wreckage of Isidar Mithrim. 


They came to a stop before the granite doors engraved with a seven- 
pointed crown. Seven armored dwarves on each side of the entrance 
pounded the floor simultaneously with the hafts of their mattocks. With 
the echoing thud of wood on stone, the doors swung inward. 


Eragon nodded to Orik, then entered the dim room with Saphira. They 
advanced toward the distant throne, passing the rigid statues, hirna, of 
past dwarf kings. At the foot of the heavy black throne, Eragon bowed. 
The dwarf king inclined his silver-maned head in return, the rubies 
wrought into his golden helm glowing dully in the light like flecks of hot 
iron. Volund, the war hammer, lay across his mail-sheathed legs. 


Hrothgar spoke: “Shadeslayer, welcome to my hall. You have done 
much since last we met. And, so it seems, I have been proved wrong 
about Zar’roc. Morzan’s blade will be welcome in Tronjheim so long as 
you bear it.” 


48 


“Thank you,” said Eragon, rising. 


“Also,” rumbled the dwarf, “we wish you to keep the armor you wore 
in the battle of Farthen Dir. Even now our most skilled smiths are re- 
pairing it. The dragon armor is being treated likewise, and when it is re- 
stored, Saphira may use it as long as she wishes, or until she outgrows it. 
This is the least we can do to show our gratitude. If it weren't for the war 
with Galbatorix, there would be feasts and celebrations in your name... 
but those must wait until a more appropriate time.” 


Voicing both his and Saphira’s sentiment, Eragon said, “You are gener- 
ous beyond all expectations. We will cherish such noble gifts.” 


Clearly pleased, Hrothgar nevertheless scowled, bringing his snarled 
eyebrows together. “We cannot linger on pleasantries, though. I am be- 
sieged by the clans with demands that I do one thing or another about 
Ajihad’s successor. When the Council of Elders proclaimed yesterday that 
they would support Nasuada, it created an uproar the likes of which I 
haven't seen since I ascended to the throne. The chiefs had to decide 
whether to accept Nasuada or look for another candidate. Most have 
concluded that Nasuada should lead the Varden, but I wish to know 
where you stand on this, Eragon, before I lend my word to either side. 
The worst thing a king can do is look foolish.” 


How much can we tell him? Eragon asked Saphira, thinking quickly. 


He's always treated us fairly, but we can’t know what he may have prom- 
ised other people. We'd best be cautious until Nasuada actually takes 
power. 


Very well. 


“Saphira and I have agreed to help her. We won't oppose her ascension. 
And’—Eragon wondered if he was going too far—‘I plead that you do 
the same; the Varden can’t afford to fight among themselves. They need 
unity.” 

“Oei,” said Hrothgar, leaning back, “you speak with new authority. 
Your suggestion is a good one, but it will cost a question: Do you think 
Nasuada will be a wise leader, or are there other motives in choosing 


her?” 


It’s a test, warned Saphira. He wants to know why we've backed her. 


49 


Eragon felt his lips twitch in a half-smile. “I think her wise and canny 
beyond her years. She will be good for the Varden.” 


“And that is why you support her?” 


“Ves.” 


Hrothgar nodded, dipping his long, snowy beard. “That relieves me. 
There has been too little concern lately with what is right and good, and 
more about what will bring individual power. It is hard to watch such 
idiocy and not be angry.” 


An uncomfortable silence fell between them, stifling in the long throne 
room. To break it, Eragon asked, “What will be done with the dragon- 
hold? Will a new floor be laid down?” 


For the first time, the king’s eyes grew mournful, deepening the sur- 
rounding lines that splayed like spokes on a wagon wheel. It was the 
closest Eragon had ever seen a dwarf come to weeping. “Much talk is 
needed before that step can be taken. It was a terrible deed, what Saphira 
and Arya did. Maybe necessary, but terrible. Ah, it might have been bet- 
ter if the Urgals had overrun us before Isidar Mithrim was ever broken. 
The heart of Tronjheim has been shattered, and so has ours.” Hrothgar 
placed his fist over his breast, then slowly unclenched his hand and 
reached down to grasp Volund’s leather-wrapped handle. 


Saphira touched Eragon’s mind. He sensed several emotions in her, but 
what surprised him the most was her remorse and guilt. She truly regret- 
ted the Star Rose’s demise, despite the fact that it had been required. Lit- 
tle one, she said, help me. I need to speak with Hrothgar. Ask him: Do the 
dwarves have the ability to reconstruct Isidar Mithrim out of the shards? 


As he repeated the words, Hrothgar muttered something in his own 
language, then said, “The skill we have, but what of it? The task would 
take months or years, and the end result would be a ruined mockery of 
the beauty that once graced Tronjheim! It is an abomination I will not 
sanction.” 


Saphira continued to stare unblinkingly at the king. Now tell him: If Isi- 
dar Mithrim were put together again, with not one piece missing, I believe I 


could make it whole once more. 


Eragon gaped at her, forgetting Hrothgar in his astonishment. Saphira! 
The energy that would require! You told me yourself that you can’t use 


50 


magic at will, so what makes you sure you can do this? 


I can do it if the need is great enough. It will be my gift to the dwarves. 
Remember Brom’s tomb; let that wash your doubt away. And close your 
mouth—it’s unbecoming and the king is watching. 


When Eragon conveyed Saphira’s offer, Hrothgar straightened with an 
exclamation. “Is it possible? Not even the elves might attempt such a 
feat.” 


“She is confident in her abilities.” 


“Then we will rebuild Isidar Mithrim, no matter if it takes a hundred 
years. We will assemble a frame for the gem and set each piece into its 
original place. Not a single chip will be forgotten. Even if we must break 
the larger pieces to move them, it will be done with all our skill in work- 
ing stone, so that no dust or flecks are lost. You will come then, when we 
are finished, and heal the Star Rose.” 


“We will come,” agreed Eragon, bowing. 


Hrothgar smiled, and it was like the cracking of a granite wall. “Such 
joy you have given me, Saphira. I feel once more a reason to rule and live. 
If you do this, dwarves everywhere will honor your name for uncounted 
generations. Go now with my blessings while I spread the tidings among 
the clans. And do not feel bound to wait upon my announcement, for no 
dwarf should be denied this news; convey it to all whom you meet. May 
the halls echo with the jubilation of our race.” 


With one more bow, Eragon and Saphira departed, leaving the dwarf 
king still smiling on his throne. Out of the hall, Eragon told Orik what 
had transpired. The dwarf immediately bent and kissed the floor before 
Saphira. He rose with a grin and clasped Eragon’s arm, saying, “A wonder 
indeed. You have given us exactly the hope we needed to combat recent 
events. There will be drinking tonight, I wager!” 


“And tomorrow is the funeral.” 


Orik sobered for a moment. “Tomorrow, yes. But until then we shall 
not let unhappy thoughts disturb us! Come!” 


Taking Eragon’s hand, the dwarf pulled him through Tronjheim to a 


great feast hall where many dwarves sat at stone tables. Orik leaped onto 
one, scattering dishes across the floor, and in a booming voice proclaimed 


51 


the news of Isidar Mithrim. Eragon was nearly deafened by the cheers 
and shouts that followed. Each of the dwarves insisted on coming to 
Saphira and kissing the floor as Orik had. When that was finished, they 
abandoned their food and filled their stone tankards with beer and mead. 


Eragon joined the revelry with an abandon that surprised him. It helped 
to ease the melancholy gathered in his heart. However, he did try to resist 
complete debauchery, for he was conscious of the duties that awaited 
them the following day and he wanted to have a clear head. 


Even Saphira took a sip of mead, and finding that she liked it, the 
dwarves rolled out a whole barrel for her. Delicately lowering her mighty 
jaws through the cask’s open end, she drained it with three long draughts, 
then tilted her head toward the ceiling and belched a giant tongue of 
flame. It took several minutes for Eragon to convince the dwarves that it 
was safe to approach her again, but once he did, they brought her another 
barrel—overriding the cook’s protests—and watched with amazement as 
she emptied it as well. 


As Saphira became increasingly inebriated, her emotions and thoughts 
washed through Eragon with more and more force. It became difficult for 
him to rely upon the input of his own senses: her vision began to slip 
over his own, blurring movement and changing colors. Even the odors he 
smelled shifted at times, becoming sharper, more pungent. 


The dwarves began to sing together. Weaving as she stood, Saphira 
hummed along, punctuating each line with a roar. Eragon opened his 
mouth to join in and was shocked when, instead of words, out came the 
snarling rasp of a dragon’s voice. That, he thought, shaking his head, is go- 
ing too far.... Or am I just drunk? He decided it did not matter and pro- 
ceeded to sing boisterously, dragon’s voice or not. 


Dwarves continued to stream into the hall as word of Isidar Mithrim 
spread. Hundreds soon packed the tables, with a thick ring around Eragon 
and Saphira. Orik called in musicians who arranged themselves in a cor- 
ner, where they pulled slipcovers of green velvet off their instruments. 
Soon harps, lutes, and silver flutes floated their gilded melodies over the 
throng. 


Many hours passed before the noise and excitement began to calm. 
When it did, Orik once more climbed onto the table. He stood there, legs 
spread wide for balance, tankard in hand, iron-bound cap awry, and cried, 
“Hear, hear! At last we have celebrated as is proper. The Urgals are gone, 
the Shade is dead, and we have won!” The dwarves all pounded their ta- 


52 


bles in approval. It was a good speech—short and to the point. But Orik 
was not finished. “To Eragon and Saphira!” he roared, lifting the tankard. 
This too was well received. 


Eragon stood and bowed, which brought more cheers. Beside him, 
Saphira reared and swung a foreleg across her chest, attempting to dupli- 
cate his move. She tottered, and the dwarves, realizing their danger, 
scrambled away from her. They were barely in time. With a loud 
whoosh, Saphira fell backward, landing flat on a banquet table. 


Pain shot through Eragon’s back and he collapsed insensate by her tail. 


58 


REQUIEM 





“Wake, Knurlhiem! You cannot sleep now. We are needed at the 
gate—they won't start without us.” 


Eragon forced his eyes open, conscious of an aching head and sore body. 
He was lying on a cold stone table. “What?” He grimaced at the sick taste 
on his tongue. 


Orik tugged on his brown beard. “Ajihad’s procession. We must be pre- 
sent for it!” 


“No, what did you call me?” They were still in the banquet hall, but it 
was empty except for him, Orik, and Saphira, who lay on her side be- 
tween two tables. She stirred and lifted her head, looking around with 
bleary eyes. 


“Stonehead! I called you Stonehead because I’ve been trying to wake 
you for almost an hour.” 


Eragon pushed himself upright and slid off the table. Flashes of memory 
from the night before jumped through his mind. Saphira, how are you? he 
asked, stumbling to her. 


She swiveled her head, running her crimson tongue in and out over her 
teeth, like a cat that ate something unpleasant. Whole... I think. My left 
wing feels a bit strange; I think it’s the one I landed on. And my head is 
filled with a thousand hot arrows. 


“Was anyone hurt when she fell?” asked Eragon, concerned. 


A hearty chuckle exploded from the dwarf’s thick chest. “Only those 
who dropped off their seats from laughing so hard. A dragon getting 
drunk and bowing at that! I’m sure lays will be sung about it for decades.” 
Saphira shuffled her wings and looked away primly. “We thought it best 
to leave you here, since we couldn't move you, Saphira. It upset the head 
cook terribly—he feared you would drink more of his best stock than the 
four barrels you already did.” 


And you chastised me once for drinking! If I consumed four barrels, it 
would kill me! 


That’s why you're not a dragon. 


54 


Orik thrust a bundle of clothes into Eragon’s arms. “Here, put these on. 
They are more appropriate for a funeral than your own attire. But hurry, 
we have little time.” Eragon struggled into the items—a billowy white 
shirt with ties at the cuffs, a red vest decorated with gold braiding and 
embroidery, dark pants, shiny black boots that clacked on the floor, and a 
swirling cape that fastened under his throat with a studded brooch. In 
place of the usual plain leather band, Zar’roc was fastened to an ornate 


belt. 


Eragon splashed his face with water and tried to arrange his hair neatly. 
Then Orik rushed him and Saphira out of the hall and toward Tron- 
jheim’s south gate. “We must start from there,’ he explained, moving 
with surprising speed on his stocky legs, “because that is where the pro- 
cession with Ajihad’s body stopped three days ago. His journey to the 
grave cannot be interrupted, or else his spirit will find no rest.” 


An odd custom, remarked Saphira. 


Eragon agreed, noting a slight unsteadiness in her gait. In Carvahall, 
people were usually buried on their farm, or if they lived in the village, in 
a small graveyard. The only rituals that accompanied the process were 
lines recited from certain ballads and a death feast held afterward for rela- 
tives and friends. Can you make it through the whole funeral? he asked as 
Saphira staggered again. 


She grimaced briefly. That and Nasuada’s appointment, but then I'll 
need to sleep. A pox on all mead! 


Returning to his conversation with Orik, Eragon asked, “Where will 


Ajihad be buried?” 


Orik slowed and glanced at Eragon with caution. “That has been a mat- 
ter of contention among the clans. When a dwarf dies, we believe he 
must be sealed in stone or else he will never join his ancestors... It is 
complex and I cannot say more to an outsider... but we go to great 
lengths to assure such a burial. Shame falls on a family or clan if they al- 
low any of their own to lie in a lesser element. 


“Under Farthen Dar exists a chamber that is the home of all knurlan, 
all dwarves, who have died here. It is there Ajihad will be taken. He can- 
not be entombed with us, as he is human, but a hallowed alcove has been 
set aside for him. There the Varden may visit him without disturbing our 
sacred grottos, and Ajihad will receive the respect he is due.” 


55 


“Your king has done much for the Varden,” commented Eragon. 


“Some think too much.” 


Before the thick gate—drawn up on its hidden chains to reveal faint 
daylight drifting into Farthen Dar—they found a carefully arranged col- 
umn. Ajihad lay at the front, cold and pale on a white marble bier borne 
by six men in black armor. Upon his head was a helm strewn with pre- 
cious stones. His hands were clasped beneath his collarbone, over the 
ivory hilt of his bare sword, which extended from underneath the shield 
covering his chest and legs. Silver mail, like circlets of moonbeams, 
weighed down his limbs and fell onto the bier. 


Close behind the body stood Nasuada—grave, sable-cloaked, and strong 
in stature, though tears adorned her countenance. To the side was Hroth- 
gar in dark robes; then Arya; the Council of Elders, all with suitably re- 
morseful expressions; and finally a stream of mourners that extended a 
mile from Tronjheim. 


Every door and archway of the four-story-high hall that led to the cen- 
tral chamber of Tronjheim, half a mile away, was thrown open and 
crowded with humans and dwarves alike. Between the gray bands of 
faces, the long tapestries swayed as they were brushed with hundreds of 
sighs and whispers when Saphira and Eragon came into view. 


Jérmundur beckoned for them to join him. Trying not to disturb the 
formation, Eragon and Saphira picked through the column to the space 
by his side, earning a disapproving glare from Sabrae. Orik went to stand 
behind Hrothgar. 


Together they waited, though for what, Eragon knew not. 


All the lanterns were shuttered halfway so that a cool twilight suffused 
the air, lending an ethereal feel to the event. No one seemed to move or 
breathe: for a brief moment, Eragon fancied that they were all statues 
frozen for eternity. A single plume of incense drifted from the bier, wind- 
ing toward the hazy ceiling as it spread the scent of cedar and juniper. It 
was the only motion in the hall, a whiplash line undulating sinuously 
from side to side. 


Deep in Tronjheim, a drum gonged. Boom. The sonorous bass note 


56 


resonated through their bones, vibrating the city-mountain and causing it 
to echo like a great stone bell. 


They stepped forward. 


Boom. On the second note, another, lower drum melded with the first, 
each beat rolling inexorably through the hall. The force of the sound 
propelled them along at a majestic pace. It gave each step significance, a 
purpose and gravity suited to the occasion. No thought could exist in the 
throbbing that surrounded them, only an upwelling of emotion that the 
drums expertly beguiled, summoning tears and bittersweet joy at the 
same time. 


Boom. 


When the tunnel ended, Ajihad’s bearers paused between the onyx pil- 
lars before gliding into the central chamber. There Eragon saw the 
dwarves grow even more solemn upon beholding Isidar Mithrim. 


Boom. 


They walked through a crystal graveyard. A circle of towering shards 
lay in the center of the great chamber, surrounding the inlaid hammer 
and pentacles. Many pieces were larger than Saphira. The rays of the star 
sapphire still shimmered in the fragments, and on some, petals of the 
carved rose were visible. 


Boom. 


The bearers continued forward, between the countless razor edges. 
Then the procession turned and descended broad flights of stairs to the 
tunnels below. Through many caverns they marched, passing stone huts 
where dwarven children clutched their mothers and stared with wide 
eyes. 


Boom. 

And with that final crescendo, they halted under ribbed stalactites that 
branched over a great catacomb lined with alcoves. In each alcove lay a 
tomb carved with a name and clan crest. Thousands—hundreds of thou- 
sands—were buried here. The only light came from sparsely placed red 


lanterns, pale in the shadows. 


After a moment, the bearers strode to a small room annexed to the 


Sys 


main chamber. In the center, on a raised platform, was a great crypt open 
to waiting darkness. On the top was carved in runes: 


May all, Knurlan, Humans, and Elves, 
Remember 
This Man. 


For he was Noble, Strong, and Wise. 


Guntera Artina 


When the mourners were gathered around, Ajihad was lowered into 
the crypt, and those who had known him personally were allowed to ap- 
proach. Eragon and Saphira were fifth in line, behind Arya. As they as- 
cended the marble steps to view the body, Eragon was gripped by an 
overwhelming sense of sorrow, his anguish compounded by the fact that 
he considered this as much Murtagh’s funeral as Ajihad’s. 


Stopping alongside the tomb, Eragon gazed down at Ajihad. He ap- 
peared far more calm and tranquil than he ever did in life, as if death had 
recognized his greatness and honored him by removing all traces of his 
worldly cares. Eragon had known Ajihad only a short while, but in that 
time he had come to respect him both as a person and for what he repre- 
sented: freedom from tyranny. Also, Ajihad was the first person to grant 
safe haven to Eragon and Saphira since they left Palancar Valley. 


Stricken, Eragon tried to think of the greatest praise he could give. In 
the end, he whispered past the lump in his throat, “You will be remem- 
bered, Ajihad. I swear it. Rest easy knowing that Nasuada shall continue 
your work and the Empire will be overthrown because of what you ac- 
complished.” Conscious of Saphira’s touch on his arm, Eragon stepped off 
the platform with her and allowed Jérmundur to take his place. 


When at last everyone had paid their respects, Nasuada bowed over 
Ajihad and touched her father’s hand, holding it with gentle urgency. Ut- 
tering a pained groan, she began to sing in a strange, wailing language, fill- 


ing the cavern with her lamentations. 


Then came twelve dwarves, who slid a marble slab over Ajihad’s up- 


58 


turned face. And he was no more. 


59 


FEALTY 





Eragon yawned and covered his mouth as people filed into the under- 
ground amphitheater. The spacious arena echoed with a babble of voices 
discussing the funeral that had just concluded. 


Eragon sat on the lowest tier, level with the podium. With him were 
Orik, Arya, Hrothgar, Nasuada, and the Council of Elders. Saphira stood 
on the row of stairs that cut upward through the tiers. Leaning over, Orik 
said, “Ever since Korgan, each of our kings has been chosen here. It’s fit- 
ting that the Varden should do likewise.” 


It’s yet to be seen, thought Eragon, if this transfer of power will remain 
peaceful. He rubbed an eye, brushing away fresh tears; the funeral cere- 
mony had left him shaken. 


Lathered over the remnants of his grief, anxiety now twisted his gut. 
He worried about his own role in the upcoming events. Even if all went 
well, he and Saphira were about to make potent enemies. His hand 
dropped to Zar'roc and tightened on the pommel. 


It took several minutes for the amphitheater to fill. Then Jormundur 
stepped up to the podium. “People of the Varden, we last stood here fif- 
teen years ago, at Deynor’s death. His successor, Ajihad, did more to op- 
pose the Empire and Galbatorix than any before. He won countless bat- 
tles against superior forces. He nearly killed Durza, putting a scratch on 
the Shade’s blade. And greatest of all, he welcomed Rider Eragon and 
Saphira into Tronjheim. However, a new leader must be chosen, one 
who will win us even more glory.” 


Someone high above shouted, “Shadeslayer!” 


Eragon tried not to react—he was pleased to see that Jormundur did 
not even blink. He said, “Perhaps in years to come, but he has other du- 
ties and responsibilities now. No, the Council of Elders has thought long 
on this: we need one who understands our needs and wants, one who has 
lived and suffered alongside us. One who refused to flee, even when bat- 
tle was imminent.” 


At that moment, Eragon sensed comprehension rush through the lis- 
teners. The name came as a whisper from a thousand throats and was ut- 
tered by Jormundur himself: “Nasuada.” With a bow, Jormundur stepped 
aside. 


6o 


Next was Arya. She surveyed the waiting audience, then said, “The 
elves honor Ajihad tonight.... And on behalf of Queen Islanzadi, I recog- 
nize Nasuada’s ascension and offer her the same support and friendship 
we extended to her father. May the stars watch over her.” 


Hrothgar took the podium and stated gruffly, “I too support Nasuada, 
as do the clans.” He moved aside. 


Then it was Eragon’s turn. Standing before the crowd, with all eyes 
upon him and Saphira, he said, “We support Nasuada as well.” Saphira 
growled in affirmation. 


Pledges spoken, the Council of Elders lined themselves on either side of 
the podium, Jérmundur at their head. Bearing herself proudly, Nasuada 
approached and knelt before him, her dress splayed in raven billows. 
Raising his voice, Jormundur said, “By the right of inheritance and succes- 
sion, we have chosen Nasuada. By merit of her father’s achievements and 
the blessings of her peers, we have chosen Nasuada. I now ask you: Have 
we chosen well?” 


The roar was overwhelming. “Yes!” 


Jérmundur nodded. “Then by the power granted to this council, we 
pass the privileges and responsibilities accorded to Ajihad to his only de- 
scendant, Nasuada.” He gently placed a circlet of silver on Nasuada’s 
brow. Taking her hand, he lifted her upright and pronounced, “I give you 
our new leader!” 


For ten minutes, the Varden and dwarves cheered, thundering their 
approbation until the hall rang with the clamor. Once their cries sub- 
sided, Sabrae motioned to Eragon, whispering, “Now is the time to fulfill 
your promise.” 


At that moment, all noise seemed to cease for Eragon. His nervousness 
disappeared too, swallowed in the tide of the moment. Steeling himself 
with a breath, he and Saphira started toward Jérmundur and Nasuada, 
each step an eternity. As they walked, he stared at Sabrae, Elessari, 
Umérth, and Falberd—noting their half-smiles, smugness, and on Sabrae’s 
part, outright disdain. Behind the council members stood Arya. She nod- 
ded in support. 


We are about to change history, said Saphira. 


61 


We're throwing ourselves off a cliff without knowing how deep the water 
below is. 


Ah, but what a glorious flight! 


With a brief look at Nasuada’s serene face, Eragon bowed and kneeled. 
Slipping Zar’roc from its sheath, he placed the sword flat on his palms, 
then lifted it, as if to proffer it to Jormundur. For a moment, the sword 
hovered between Jérmundur and Nasuada, teetering on the wire edge of 
two different destinies. Eragon felt his breath catch—such a simple 
choice to balance a life on. And more than a life—a dragon, a king, an 
Empire! 


Then his breath rushed in, filling his lungs with time once again, and he 
swung to face Nasuada. “Out of deep respect... and appreciation of the 
difficulties facing you... I, Eragon, first Rider of the Varden, Shadeslayer 
and Argetlam, give you my blade and my fealty, Nasuada.” 


The Varden and dwarves stared, dumbstruck. In that same instant, the 
Council of Elders flashed from triumphant gloating to enraged impo- 
tence. Their glares burned with the strength and venom of those be- 
trayed. Even Elessari let outrage burst through her pleasant demeanor. 
Only Jérmundur—after a brief jolt of surprise—seemed to accept the 
announcement with equanimity. 


Nasuada smiled and grasped Zar’roc, placing the sword’s tip on Eragon’s 
forehead, just as before. “I am honored that you choose to serve me, 
Rider Eragon. I accept, as you accept all the responsibilities accompany- 
ing the station. Rise as my vassal and take your sword.” 


Eragon did so, then stepped back with Saphira. With shouts of ap- 
proval, the crowd rose to their feet, the dwarves stamping in rhythm 
with their hobnail boots while human warriors banged swords across 


shields. 

Turning to the podium, Nasuada gripped it on either side and looked 
up at all the people in the amphitheater. She beamed at them, pure joy 
shining from her face. “People of the Varden!” 

Silence. 

“As my father did before me, I give my life to you and our cause. I will 


never cease fighting until the Urgals are vanquished, Galbatorix is dead, 
and Alagaésia is free once more!” 


62 


More cheering and applause. 


“Therefore, I say to you, now is the time to prepare. Here in Farthen 
Dtr—after endless skirmishes—we won our greatest battle. It is our turn 
to strike back. Galbatorix is weak after losing so many forces, and there 
will never again be such an opportunity. 


“Therefore, I say again, now is the time to prepare so that we may once 
more stand victorious!” 


After more speeches by various personages—including a still-glowering 
Falberd—the amphitheater began to empty. As Eragon stood to leave, 
Orik grasped his arm, stopping him. The dwarf was wide-eyed. “Eragon, 
did you plan all that beforehand?” 


Eragon briefly considered the wisdom of telling him, then nodded. 
“Yes.” 


Orik exhaled, shaking his head. “That was a bold stroke, it was. You've 
given Nasuada a strong position to begin with. It was dangerous, though, 
if the reactions of the Council of Elders are anything to judge by. Did 
Arya approve of this?” 


“She agreed it was necessary.” 


The dwarf studied him thoughtfully. “I’m sure it was. You just altered 
the balance of power, Eragon. No one will underestimate you again be- 
cause of it... Beware the rotten stone. You have earned some powerful 
enemies today.” He slapped Eragon on the side and continued past. 


Saphira watched him go, then said, We should prepare to leave Farthen 


Dur. The council will be thirsty for revenge. The sooner we’re out of their 
reach, the better. 


63 


A SORCERESS, A SNAKE, AND A SCROLL 





That evening, as Eragon returned to his quarters from bathing, he was 
surprised to find a tall woman waiting for him in the hall. She had dark 
hair, startling blue eyes, and a wry mouth. Wound around her wrist was a 
gold bracelet shaped like a hissing snake. Eragon hoped that she wasn’t 
there to ask him for advice, like so many of the Varden. 


“Argetlam.” She curtsied gracefully. 

He inclined his head in return. “Can I help you?” 

“I hope so. I’m Trianna, sorceress of Du Vrangr Gata.” 
“Really? A sorceress?” he asked, intrigued. 


“And battle mage and spy and anything else the Varden deem neces- 
sary. There aren’t enough magic users, so we each end up with a half- 
dozen tasks.” She smiled, displaying even, white teeth. “That’s why I came 
today. We would be honored to have you take charge of our group. 
You're the only one who can replace the Twins.” 


Almost without realizing it, he smiled back. She was so friendly and 
charming, he hated to say no. “I’m afraid I can’t; Saphira and I are leaving 
Tronjheim soon. Besides, I’d have to consult with Nasuada first anyway.” 
And I don’t want to be entangled in any more politics... especially not where 
the Twins used to lead. 


Trianna bit her lip. “I’m sorry to hear that.” She moved a step closer. 
“Perhaps we can spend some time together before you have to go. I could 
show you how to summon and control spirits.... It would be educational 
for both of us.” 


Eragon felt a hot flush warm his face. “I appreciate the offer, but I’m 
really too busy at the moment.” 


A spark of anger flared within Trianna’s eyes, then vanished so quickly, 
he wondered whether he had seen it at all. She sighed delicately. “I un- 
derstand.” 


She sounded so disappointed—and looked so forlorn—Eragon felt 
guilty for rebuffing her. It can’t hurt to talk with her for a few minutes, he 
told himself. “I’m curious; how did you learn magic?” 


64 


Trianna brightened. “My mother was a healer in Surda. She had a bit of 
power and was able to instruct me in the old ways. Of course, I’m no- 
where near as powerful as a Rider. None of Du Vrangr Gata could have 
defeated Durza alone, like you did. That was a heroic deed.” 


Embarrassed, Eragon scuffed his boots against the ground. “I wouldn't 
have survived if not for Arya.” 


“You are too modest, Argetlam,” she admonished. “It was you who 
struck the final blow. You should be proud of your accomplishment. It’s 
a feat worthy of Vrael himself.” She leaned toward him. His heart quick- 
ened as he smelled her perfume, which was rich and musky, with a hint 
of an exotic spice. “Have you heard the songs composed about you? The 
Varden sing them every night around their fires. They say you’ve come to 
take the throne from Galbatorix!” 


“No,” said Eragon, quick and sharp. That was one rumor he would not 
tolerate. “They might, but I don’t. Whatever my fate may be, I don’t as- 
pire to rule.” 


“And it’s wise of you not to. What is a king, after all, but a man impris- 
oned by his duties? That would be a poor reward indeed for the last free 
Rider and his dragon. No, for you the ability to go and do what you will 
and, by extension, to shape the future of Alagaésia.” She paused. “Do you 
have any family left in the Empire?” 


What” Only a cousin.” 
“Then you're not betrothed?” 


The question caught him off guard. He had never been asked that be- 
fore. “No, I’m not betrothed.” 


“Surely there must be someone you care about.” She came another step 
closer, and her ribboned sleeve brushed his arm. 


“I wasn’t close to anyone in Carvahall,” he faltered, “and I’ve been trav- 
eling since then.” 


Trianna drew back slightly, then lifted her wrist so the serpent bracelet 
was at eye level. “Do you like him?” she inquired. Eragon blinked and 
nodded, though it was actually rather disconcerting. “I call him Lorga. 
He’s my familiar and protector.” Bending forward, she blew upon the 


65 


bracelet, then murmured, “Sé orim thornessa havr sharjalvi lifs.” 


With a dry rustle, the snake stirred to life. Eragon watched, fascinated, 
as the creature writhed around Trianna’s pale arm, then lifted itself and 
fixed its whirling ruby eyes upon him, wire tongue whipping in and out. 
Its eyes seemed to expand until they were each as large as Eragon’s fist. 
He felt as if he were tumbling into their fiery depths; he could not look 
away no matter how hard he tried. 


Then at a short command, the serpent stiffened and resumed its former 
position. With a tired sigh, Trianna leaned against the wall. “Not many 
people understand what we magic users do. But I wanted you to know 
that there are others like you, and we will help if we can.” 


Impulsively, Eragon put his hand on hers. He had never attempted to 
approach a woman this way before, but instinct urged him onward, dar- 
ing him to take the chance. It was frightening, exhilarating. “If you want, 
we could go and eat. There’s a kitchen not far from here.” 


She slipped her other hand over his, fingers smooth and cool, so differ- 
ent from the rough grips he was accustomed to. “I'd like that. Shall we—’ 
Trianna stumbled forward as the door burst open behind her. The sor- 
ceress whirled around, only to yelp as she found herself face to face with 
Saphira. 


Saphira remained motionless, except for one lip that slowly lifted to 
reveal a line of jagged teeth. Then she growled. It was a marvelous 
growl—richly layered with scorn and menace—that rose and fell through 
the hall for more than a minute. Listening to it was like enduring a blis- 
tering, hackle-raising tirade. 


Eragon glared at her the whole time. 

When it was over, Trianna was clenching her dress with both fists, 
twisting the fabric. Her face was white and scared. She quickly curtsied 
to Saphira, then, with a barely controlled motion, turned and fled. Acting 
as if nothing had happened, Saphira lifted a leg and licked a claw. It was 
nearly impossible to get the door open, she sniffed. 


Eragon could not contain himself any longer. Why did you do that? he 
exploded. You had no reason to interfere! 


You needed my help, she continued, unperturbed. 


66 


If I'd needed your help, I would have called! 


Don't yell at me, she snapped, letting her jaws click together. He could 
sense her emotions boiling with as much turmoil as his. I’ll not have you 
run around with a slattern who cares more for Eragon as Rider than you as 
a person. 


She wasn't a slattern, roared Eragon. He pounded the wall in frustra- 
tion. I’m a man now, Saphira, not a hermit. You can’t expect me to ignore... 
ignore women just because of who I am. And it’s certainly not your decision 
to make. At the very least, I might have enjoyed a conversation with her, 
anything other than the tragedies we've dealt with lately. You're in my head 
enough to know how I feel. Why couldn't you leave me alone? Where was 
the harm? 


You don’t understand. She refused to meet his eyes. 


Don’t understand! Will you prevent me from ever having a wife and chil- 
dren? What of a family? 


Eragon. She finally fixed one great eye on him. We are intimately 


linked. 
Obviously! 


And if you pursue a relationship, with or without my blessing, and be- 
come... attached... to someone, my feelings will become engaged as well. 
You should know that. Therefore—and I warn you only once—be careful 
who you choose, because it will involve both of us. 


He briefly considered her words. Our bond works both ways, however. If 
you hate someone, I will be influenced likewise.... I understand your con- 
cern. So you weren't just jealous? 


She licked the claw once more. Perhaps a little. 


Eragon was the one who growled this time. He brushed past her into 
the room, grabbed Zar’roc, then stalked away, belting on the sword. 


He wandered through Tronjheim for hours, avoiding contact with eve- 
ryone. What had occurred pained him, though he could not deny the 
truth of Saphira’s words. Of all the matters they shared, this was the most 
delicate and the one they agreed upon least. That night—for the first 
time since he was captured at Gil’ead—he slept away from Saphira, in 


67 


one of the dwarves’ barracks. 


Eragon returned to their quarters the following morning. By unspoken 
consent, he and Saphira avoided discussing what had transpired; further 
argument was pointless when neither party was willing to yield ground. 
Besides, they were both so relieved to be reunited, they did not want to 
risk endangering their friendship again. 


They were eating lunch—Saphira tearing at a bloody haunch—when 
Jarsha trotted up. Like before, he stared wide-eyed at Saphira, following 
her movements as she nibbled off the end of a leg bone. “Yes?” asked Er- 
agon, wiping his chin and wondering if the Council of Elders had sent for 
them. He had heard nothing from them since the funeral. 


Jarsha turned away from Saphira long enough to say, “Nasuada would 
like to see you, sir. She’s waiting in her father’s study.” 


Sir! Eragon almost laughed. Only a little while ago, he would have been 
calling people sir, not the other way around. He glanced at Saphira. “Are 
you done, or should we wait a few minutes?” 


Rolling her eyes, she fit the rest of the meat into her mouth and split 
the bone with a loud crack. I’m done. 


“All right,” said Eragon, standing, “you can go, Jarsha. We know the 


” 


way. 


It took almost half an hour to reach the study because of the city- 
mountain's size. As during Ajihad’s rule, the door was guarded, but in- 
stead of two men, an entire squad of battle-hardened warriors now stood 
before it, alert for the slightest hint of danger. They would clearly sacri- 
fice themselves to protect their new leader from ambush or attack. 
Though the men could not have failed to recognize Eragon and Saphira, 
they barred the way while Nasuada was alerted of her visitors. Only then 
were the two allowed to enter. 


Eragon immediately noticed a change: a vase of flowers in the study. 
The small purple blossoms were unobtrusive, but they suffused the air 
with a warm fragrance that—for Eragon—evoked summers of fresh- 
picked raspberries and scythed fields turning bronze under the sun. He 
inhaled, appreciating the skill with which Nasuada had asserted her indi- 
viduality without obliterating Ajihad’s memory. 


She sat behind the broad desk, still cloaked in the black of mourning. 


68 


As Eragon seated himself, Saphira beside him, she said, “Eragon.” It was a 
simple statement, neither friendly nor hostile. She turned away briefly, 
then focused on him, her gaze steely and intent. “I have spent the last few 
days reviewing the Varden’s affairs, such as they are. It was a dismal exer- 
cise. We are poor, overextended, and low on supplies, and few recruits 
are joining us from the Empire. I mean to change that. 


“The dwarves cannot support us much longer, as it’s been a lean year 
for farming and they’ve suffered losses of their own. Considering this, I 
have decided to move the Varden to Surda. It’s a difficult proposition, 
but one I believe necessary to keep us safe. Once in Surda, we will finally 
be close enough to engage the Empire directly.” 


Even Saphira stirred with surprise. The work that would involve! said Er- 
agon. It could take months to get everyone's belongings to Surda, not to men- 
tion all the people. And they'd probably be attacked along the way. “I 
thought King Orrin didn’t dare openly oppose Galbatorix,” he protested. 


Nasuada smiled grimly. “His stance has changed since we defeated the 
Urgals. He will shelter and feed us and fight by our side. Many Varden 
are already in Surda, mainly women and children who couldn't or 
wouldn't fight. They will also support us, else I will strip our name from 
them.” 


“How,” asked Eragon, “did you communicate with King Orrin so 
quickly?” 


“The dwarves use a system of mirrors and lanterns to relay messages 
through their tunnels. They can send a dispatch from here to the western 
edge of the Beor Mountains in less than a day. Couriers then transport it 
to Aberon, capital of Surda. Fast as it is, that method is still too slow 
when Galbatorix can surprise us with an Urgal army and give us less than 
a day’s notice. I intend to arrange something far more expedient between 
Du Vrangr Gata and Hrothgar’s magicians before we go.” 


Opening the desk drawer, Nasuada removed a thick scroll. “The 
Varden will depart Farthen Dar within the month. Hrothgar has agreed 
to provide us with safe passage through the tunnels. Moreover, he sent a 
force to Orthiad to remove the last vestiges of Urgals and seal the tunnels 
so no one can invade the dwarves by that route again. As this may not be 
enough to guarantee the Varden’s survival, I have a favor to ask of you.” 


Eragon nodded. He had expected a request or order. That was the only 
reason for her to have summoned them. “I am yours to command.” 


69 


“Perhaps.” Her eyes flicked to Saphira for a second. “In any case, this is 
not a command, and I want you to think carefully before replying. To 
help rally support for the Varden, I wish to spread word throughout the 
Empire that a new Rider—named Eragon Shadeslayer—and his dragon, 
Saphira, have joined our cause. I would like your permission before doing 
so, however.” 


It’s too dangerous, objected Saphira. 


Word of our presence here will reach the Empire anyway, pointed out Er- 
agon. The Varden will want to brag about their victory and Durza’s death. 
Since it'll happen with or without our approval, we should agree to help. 


She snorted softly. I’m worried about Galbatorix. Until now we haven't 
made it public where our sympathies lie. 


Our actions have been clear enough. 


Yes, but even when Durza fought you in Tronjheim, he wasn’t trying to 
kill you. If we become outspoken in our opposition to the Empire, Galbatorix 
won't be so lenient again. Who knows what forces or plots he may have kept 
in abeyance while he tried to gain hold of us? As long as we remain am- 
biguous, he won’t know what to do. 


The time for ambiguity has passed, asserted Eragon. We fought the Ur- 
gals, killed Durza, and I have sworn fealty to the leader of the Varden. No 
ambiguity exists. No, with your permission, I will agree to her proposal. 


She was silent for a long while, then dipped her head. As you wish. 
He put a hand on her side before returning his attention to Nasuada 
and saying, “Do what you see fit. If this is how we can best assist the 


Varden, so be it.” 


“Thank you. I know it is a lot to ask. Now, as we discussed before the 
funeral, I expect you to travel to Ellesméra and complete your training.” 


“With Arya?” 
“Of course. The elves have refused contact with both humans and 


dwarves ever since she was captured. Arya is the only being who can 
convince them to emerge from seclusion.” 


70 


“Couldn't she use magic to tell them of her rescue?” 


“Unfortunately not. When the elves retreated into Du Weldenvarden 
after the fall of the Riders, they placed wards around the forest that pre- 
vent any thought, item, or being from entering it through arcane means, 
though not from exiting it, if I understood Arya’s explanation. Thus, Arya 
must physically visit Du Weldenvarden before Queen Islanzadi will 
know that she is alive, that you and Saphira exist, and of the numerous 
events that have befallen the Varden these past months.” Nasuada 
handed him the scroll. It was stamped with a wax sigil. “This is a missive 
for Queen Islanzadi, telling her about the Varden’s situation and my own 
plans. Guard it with your life; it would cause a great deal of harm in the 
wrong hands. I hope that after all that’s happened, Islanzadi will feel 
kindly enough toward us to reinitiate diplomatic ties. Her assistance 
could mean the difference between victory and defeat. Arya knows this 
and has agreed to press our case, but I wanted you aware of the situation 
too, so you could take advantage of any opportunities that might arise.” 


Eragon tucked the scroll into his jerkin. “When will we leave?” 
“Tomorrow morning... unless you have something already planned?” 
“No.” 


“Good.” She clasped her hands. “You should know, one other person 
will be traveling with you.” He looked at her quizzically. “King Hrothgar 
insisted that in the interest of fairness there should be a dwarf representa- 
tive present at your training, since it affects their race as well. So he’s 
sending Orik along.” 


Eragon’s first reaction was irritation. Saphira could have flown Arya and 
him to Du Weldenvarden, thereby eliminating weeks of unnecessary 
travel. Three passengers, however, were too many to fit on Saphira’s 
shoulders. Orik’s presence would confine them to the ground. 


Upon further reflection, Eragon acknowledged the wisdom of Hroth- 
gars request. It was important for Eragon and Saphira to maintain a sem- 
blance of equality in their dealings with the different races. He smiled. 
“Ah, well, itll slow us down, but I suppose we have to placate Hrothgar. 
To tell the truth, I’m glad Orik is coming. Crossing Alagaésia with only 
Arya was a rather daunting prospect. She’s...” 


Nasuada smiled too. “She’s different.” 


71 


“Aye.” He grew serious again. “Do you really mean to attack the Em- 
pire? You said yourself that the Varden are weak. It doesn’t seem like the 
wisest course. If we wait—’ 


“If we wait,” she said sternly, “Galbatorix will only get stronger. This is 
the first time since Morzan was slain that we have even the slightest op- 
portunity of catching him unprepared. He had no reason to suspect we 
could defeat the Urgals—which we did thanks to you—so he won't have 
readied the Empire for invasion.” 


Invasion! exclaimed Saphira. And how does she plan to kill Galbatorix 
when he flies out to obliterate their army with magic? 


Nasuada shook her head in response when Eragon restated the objec- 
tion. “From what we know of him, he won't fight until Urd’baen itself is 
threatened. It doesn’t matter to Galbatorix if we destroy half the Empire, 
so long as we come to him, not the other way around. Why should he 
bother anyway? If we do manage to reach him, our troops will be bat- 
tered and depleted, making it all the easier for him to destroy us.” 


“You still haven’t answered Saphira,” protested Eragon. 


“That’s because I can’t yet. This will be a long campaign. By its end you 
might be powerful enough to defeat Galbatorix, or the elves may have 
joined us... and their spellcasters are the strongest in Alagaésia. No matter 
what happens, we cannot afford to delay. Now is the time to gamble and 
dare what no one thinks we can accomplish. The Varden have lived in 
the shadows for too long—we must either challenge Galbatorix or sub- 
mit and pass away.” 


The scope of what Nasuada was suggesting disturbed Eragon. So many 
risks and unknown dangers were involved, it was almost absurd to con- 
sider such a venture. However, it was not his place to make the decision, 
and he accepted that. Nor would he dispute it further. We have to trust in 
her judgment now. 


“But what of you, Nasuada? Will you be safe while we’re gone? I must 
think of my vow. It’s become my responsibility to ensure that you won't 
have your own funeral soon.” 


Her jaw tightened as she gestured at the door and the warriors beyond. 
“You needn't fear, I am well defended.” She looked down. “I will admit... 
one reason for going to Surda is that Orrin knows me of old and will offer 
his protection. I cannot tarry here with you and Arya gone and the Coun- 


72 


cil of Elders still with power. They won't accept me as their leader until I 
prove beyond doubt that the Varden are under my control, not theirs.” 


Then she seemed to draw on some inner strength, squaring her shoul- 
ders and lifting her chin so she was distant and aloof. “Go now, Eragon. 
Ready your horse, gather supplies, and be at the north gate by dawn.” 


He bowed low, respecting her return to formality, then left with 
Saphira. 


After dinner, Eragon and Saphira flew together. They sailed high above 
Tronjheim, where crenulated icicles hung from the sides of Farthen Dar, 
forming a great white band around them. Though it was still hours until 
night, it was already nearly dark within the mountain. 


Eragon threw back his head, savoring the air on his face. He missed the 
wind—wind that would rush through the grass and stir the clouds until 
everything was tousled and fresh. Wind that would bring rain and storms 
and lash the trees so they bent. For that matter, I miss trees as well, he 
thought. Farthen Dir is an incredible place, but it’s as empty of plants and 
animals as Ajihad’s tomb. 


Saphira agreed. The dwarves seem to think that gems take the place of 
flowers. She was silent as the light continued to fade. When it was too 
dark for Eragon to see comfortably, she said, It’s late. We should return. 


All right. 


She drifted toward the ground in great, lazy spirals, drawing nearer to 
Tronjheim—which glowed like a beacon in the center of Farthen Dar. 
They were still far from the city-mountain when she swung her head, 
saying, Look. 


He followed her gaze, but all he could see was the gray, featureless 
plain below them. What? 


Instead of answering, she tilted her wings and glided to their left, slip- 
ping down to one of the four roads that radiated from Tronjheim along 
the cardinal compass points. As they landed, he noticed a patch of white 
on a small hill nearby. The patch wavered strangely in the dusk, like a 
floating candle, then resolved into Angela, who was wearing a pale wool 
tunic. 


73 


The witch carried a wicker basket nearly four feet across and filled 
with a wild assortment of mushrooms, most of which Eragon did not 
recognize. As she approached, he gestured at them and said, “You’ve been 
gathering toadstools?” 


“Hello,” laughed Angela, putting her load down. “Oh no, toadstool is far 
too general a term. And anyway, they really ought to be called frogstools, 
not toadstools.” She spread them with her hand. “This one is sulphur tuft, 
and this is an inkcap, and here’s navelcap, and dwarf shield, russet tough- 
shank, blood ring, and that is a spotted deceiver. Delightful, isn’t it!” She 
pointed to each in turn, ending on a mushroom with pink, lavender, and 
yellow splashed in rivulets across its cap. 


“And that one?” he asked, indicating a mushroom with a lightning-blue 
stem, molten-orange gills, and a glossy black two-tiered cap. 


She looked at it fondly. “Fricai Andlat, as the elves might say. The stalk 
is instant death, while the cap can cure most poisons. It’s what Tunivor’s 
Nectar is extracted from. Fricai Andlat only grows in caves in Du Wel- 
denvarden and Farthen Dar, and it would die out here if the dwarves 
started carting their dung elsewhere.” 


Eragon looked back at the hill and realized that was exactly what it 
was, a dung heap. 


“Hello, Saphira,” said Angela, reaching past him to pat Saphira on the 
nose. Saphira blinked and looked pleased, tail twitching. At the same 
time, Solembum padded into sight, his mouth clamped firmly around a 
limp rat. Without so much as a flick of his whiskers, the werecat settled 
on the ground and began to nibble on the rodent, studiously ignoring the 
three of them. 


“So,” said Angela, tucking back a curl of her enormous hair, “off to 
Ellesméra?” Eragon nodded. He did not bother asking how she had found 
out; she always seemed to know what was going on. When he remained 
silent, she scowled. “Well, don’t act so morose. It’s not as if it’s your exe- 
cution!” 


“IT know.” 
“Then smile, because if it’s not your execution, you should be happy! 


You're as flaccid as Solembum’s rat. Flaccid. What a wonderful word, 
don’t you think?” 


74 


That wrung a grin out of him, and Saphira chortled with amusement 
deep in her throat. “I’m not sure it’s quite as wonderful as you think, but 
yes, I understand your point.” 


‘I’m glad you understand. Understanding is good.” With arched eye- 
brows, she hooked a fingernail underneath a mushroom and flipped it 
over, inspecting its gills as she said, “It’s fortuitous we met tonight, as you 
are about to leave and I... I will accompany the Varden to Surda. As I 
told you before, I like to be where things are happening, and that’s the 
place.” 


Eragon grinned even more. “Well then, that must mean we'll have a 
safe journey, else you'd be with us.” 


Angela shrugged, then said seriously, “Be careful in Du Weldenvarden. 
Just because elves do not display their emotions doesn’t mean they aren't 
subject to rage and passion like the rest of us mortals. What can make 
them so deadly, though, is how they conceal it, sometimes for years.” 


“You've been there?” 
“Once upon a time.” 
After a pause, he asked, “What do you think of Nasuada’s plans?” 


“Mmm... she’s doomed! You're doomed! They’re all doomed!” She 
cackled, doubling over, then straightened abruptly. “Notice I didn’t spec- 
ify what kind of doom, so no matter what happens, I predicted it. How 
very wise of me.” She lifted the basket again, setting it on one hip. “I sup- 
pose I won't see you for a while, so farewell, best of luck, avoid roasted 
cabbage, don’t eat earwax, and look on the bright side of life!” And with a 
cheery wink, she strolled off, leaving Eragon blinking and nonplussed. 


After an appropriate pause, Solembum picked up his dinner and fol- 
lowed, ever so dignified. 


75 


HROTHGAR'’S GIFT 





Dawn was a half hour away when Eragon and Saphira arrived at Tron- 
jheim’s north gate. The gate was raised just enough to let Saphira pass, so 
they hurried underneath it, then waited in the recessed area beyond, 
where red jasper pillars loomed above and carved beasts snarled between 
the bloody piers. Past those, at the very edge of Tronjheim, sat two 
thirty-foot-high gold griffins. Identical pairs guarded each of the city- 
mountain’s gates. No one was in sight. 


Eragon held Snowfire’s reins. The stallion was brushed, reshoed, and 
saddled, his saddlebags bulging with goods. He pawed the floor impa- 
tiently; Eragon had not ridden him for over a week. 


Before long Orik ambled up, bearing a large pack on his back and a 
bundle in his arms. “No horse?” asked Eragon, somewhat surprised. Are 
we supposed to walk all the way to Du Weldenvarden? 


Orik grunted. “We'll be stopping at Tarnag, just north of here. From 
there we take rafts along the Az Ragni to Hedarth, an outpost for trading 
with the elves. We won't need steeds before Hedarth, so I'll use my own 
feet till then.” 


He set the bundle down with a clang, then unwrapped it, revealing Er- 
agon’s armor. The shield had been repainted—so the oak tree stood 
clearly in the center—and all the dings and scrapes removed. Beneath it 
was the long mail shirt, burnished and oiled until the steel gleamed bril- 
liantly. No sign existed of where it had been rent when Durza cut Er- 
agon’s back. The coif, gloves, bracers, greaves, and helmet were likewise 
repaired. 


“Our greatest smiths worked on these,” said Orik, “as well as your ar- 
mor, Saphira. However, since we can’t take dragon armor with us, it was 
given to the Varden, who will guard it against our return.” 


Please thank him for me, said Saphira. 


Eragon obliged, then laced on the greaves and bracers, storing the other 
items in his bags. Last of all, he reached for his helm, only to find Orik 
holding it. The dwarf rolled the piece between his hands, then said, “Do 
not be so quick to don this, Eragon. There is a choice you must make 
first.” 


76 


“What choice is that?” 


Raising the helmet, Orik uncovered its polished brow, which, Eragon 
now saw, had been altered: etched in the steel were the hammer and 
stars of Hrothgar and Orik’s clan, the Ingeitum. Orik scowled, looking 
both pleased and troubled, and said in a formal voice, “Mine king, Hroth- 
gar, desires that I present this helm as a symbol of the friendship he bears 
for you. And with it Hrothgar extends an offer to adopt you as one of 
Dargrimst Ingeitum, as a member of his own family.” 


Eragon stared at the helm, amazed that Hrothgar would make such a 
gesture. Does this mean I'd be subjected to his rule?... If I continue to accrue 
loyalties and allegiances at this pace, I'll be incapacitated before long— 
unable to do anything without breaking some oath! 


You don’t have to put it on, pointed out Saphira. 
And risk insulting Hrothgar? Once again, we’re trapped. 


It may be intended as a gift, though, another sign of otho, not a trap. I 
would guess he’s thanking us for my offer to repair Isidar Mithrim. 


That had not occurred to Eragon, for he had been too busy trying to 
figure out how the dwarf king might gain advantage over them. True. But 
I think it’s also an attempt to correct the imbalance of power created when I 
swore fealty to Nasuada. The dwarves couldn’t have been pleased with that 
turn of events. He looked back at Orik, who was waiting anxiously. “How 
often has this been done?” 


“For a human? Never. Hrothgar argued with the Ingeitum families for a 
day and a night before they agreed to accept you. If you consent to bear 
our crest, you will have full rights as clan member. You may attend our 
councils and give voice on every issue. And,” he grew very somber, “if 
you so wish, you will have the right to be buried with our dead.” 


For the first time, the enormity of Hrothgar’s action struck Eragon. The 
dwarves could offer no higher honor. With a swift motion, he took the 
helm from Orik and pressed it down upon his head. “I am privileged to 
join Dargrimst Ingeitum.” 


Orik nodded with approval and said, “Then take this Knurlnien, this 
Heart of Stone, and cup it between your hands—yes, like so. You must 
steel yourself now and prick open a vein to wet the stone. A few drops 
will suffice.... To finish, repeat after me: Os il dom qirana carn dar thar- 


77 


gen, zeitmen, oen grimst vor formv edaris rak skilfz. Narho is belgond...” 
It was a lengthy recitation and all the longer because Orik stopped to 
translate every few sentences. Afterward, Eragon healed his wrist with a 
quick spell. 


“Whatever else the clans may say about this business,” observed Orik, 
“you have behaved with integrity and respect. They cannot ignore that.” 
He grinned. “We are of the same clan now, eh? You are my foster 
brother! Under more normal circumstances, Hrothgar would have pre- 
sented your helm himself and we would have held a lengthy ceremony to 
commemorate your induction into Diargrimst Ingeitum, but events move 
too swiftly for us to tarry. Fear not that you are being slighted, though! 
Your adoption shall be celebrated with the proper rituals when you and 
Saphira next return to Farthen Dar. You shall feast and dance and have 
many pieces of paper to sign in order to formalize your new position.” 


“I look forward to the day,” said Eragon. He was still preoccupied with 
sifting through the numerous possible ramifications of belonging to Dtr- 
grimst Ingeitum. 


Sitting against a pillar, Orik shrugged off his pack and drew his ax, 
which he proceeded to twirl between his palms. After several minutes, 
he leaned forward, glaring back into Tronjheim. “Barztl knurlar! Where 
are they? Arya said she would be right here. Ha! Elves’ only concept of 
time is late and even later.” 


“Have you dealt with them much?” asked Eragon, crouching. Saphira 
watched with interest. 


The dwarf laughed suddenly. “Eta. Only Arya, and then sporadically be- 
cause she traveled so often. In seven decades, I’ve learned but one thing 
about her: You can’t rush an elf. Trying is like hammering a file—it might 
break, but it’ll never bend.” 


“Aren't dwarves the same?” 

“Ah, but stone will shift, given enough time.” Orik sighed and shook his 
head. “Of all the races, elves change the least, which is one reason I’m re- 
luctant to go.” 

“But we'll get to meet Queen Islanzadi and see Ellesméra and who 


knows what else? When was the last time a dwarf was invited into Du 
Weldenvarden?” 


78 


Orik frowned at him. “Scenery means nothing. Urgent tasks remain in 
Tronjheim and our other cities, yet I must tramp across Alagaésia to ex- 
change pleasantries and sit and grow fat as you are tutored. It could take 
years!” 


Years!... Still, if that’s what is required to defeat Shades and the Ra’zac, 
I'll do it. 


Saphira touched his mind: I doubt Nasuada will let us stay in Ellesméra 
for more than a few months. With what she told us, we'll be needed fairly 
Soon. 


“At last!” said Orik, pushing himself upright. 


Approaching were Nasuada—slippers flashing beneath her dress, like 
mice darting from a hole—Jérmundur, and Arya, who bore a pack like 
Orik’s. She wore the same black leather outfit Eragon had first seen her 
in, as well as her sword. 


At that moment, it struck Eragon that Arya and Nasuada might not 
approve of him joining the Ingeitum. Guilt and trepidation shot through 
him as he realized that it had been his duty to consult Nasuada first. And 
Arya! He cringed, remembering how angry she had been after his first 
meeting with the Council of Elders. 


Thus, when Nasuada stopped before him, he averted his eyes, ashamed. 
But she only said, “You accepted.” Her voice was gentle, restrained. 


He nodded, still looking down. 


“I wondered if you would. Now once again, all three races have a hold 
on you. The dwarves can claim your allegiance as a member of Dtirgrimst 
Ingeitum, the elves will train and shape you—and their influence may be 
the strongest, for you and Saphira are bound by their magic—and you 
have sworn fealty to me, a human.... Perhaps it is best that we share your 
loyalty.” She met his surprise with an odd smile, then pressed a small bag 
of coins into his palm and stepped away. 


Jérmundur extended a hand, which Eragon shook, feeling a bit dazed. 
“Have a good trip, Eragon. Guard yourself well.” 


“Come,” said Arya, gliding past them into the darkness of Farthen Dar. 
“It is time to leave. Aiedail has set, and we have far to go.” 


79 


“Aye,” Orik agreed. He pulled out a red lantern from the side of his 
pack. 


Nasuada looked them over once more. “Very well. Eragon and Saphira, 
you have the Varden’s blessings, as well as mine. May your journey be 
safe. Remember, you carry the weight of our hopes and expectations, so 
acquit yourselves honorably.” 


“We will do our best,” promised Eragon. 


Gripping Snowfire’s reins firmly, he started after Arya, who was already 
several yards away. Orik followed, then Saphira. As Saphira passed 
Nasuada, Eragon saw her pause and lightly lick Nasuada on the cheek. 
Then she lengthened her stride, catching up with him. 


As they continued north along the road, the gate behind them shrank 
smaller and smaller until it was reduced to a pinprick of light—with two 
lonely silhouettes where Nasuada and Jormundur remained watching. 


When they finally reached Farthen Dtr’s base, they found a pair of gi- 
gantic doors—thirty feet tall—open and waiting. Three dwarf guards 
bowed and moved away from the aperture. Through the doors was a 
tunnel of matching proportions, lined with columns and lanterns for the 
first fifty feet. After that it was as empty and silent as a mausoleum. 


It looked exactly like Farthen Dar’s western entrance, but Eragon knew 
that this tunnel was different. Instead of burrowing through the mile- 
thick base to emerge outside, it proceeded underneath mountain after 
mountain, all the way to the dwarf city Tarnag. 


“Here is our path,” said Orik, lifting the lantern. 

He and Arya crossed over the threshold, but Eragon held back, sud- 
denly uncertain. While he did not fear the dark, neither did he welcome 
being surrounded by eternal night until they arrived at Tarnag. And once 
he entered the barren tunnel, he would again be hurling himself into the 
unknown, abandoning the few things he had grown accustomed to 
among the Varden in exchange for an uncertain destiny. 

What is it? asked Saphira. 

Nothing. 


He took a breath, then strode forward, allowing the mountain to swal- 


80 


low him in its depths. 


81 


HAMMER AND TONGS 





Three days after the Ra’zac’s arrival, Roran found himself pacing uncon- 
trollably along the edge of his camp in the Spine. He had heard nothing 
since Albriech’s visit, nor was it possible to glean information by observ- 
ing Carvahall. He glared at the distant tents where the soldiers slept, then 
continued pacing. 


At midday Roran had a small, dry lunch. Wiping his mouth with the 
back of his hand, he wondered, How long are the Ra’zac willing to wait? If 
it was a test of patience, he was determined to win. 


To pass the time, he practiced his archery on a rotting log, stopping 
only when an arrow shattered on a rock embedded in the trunk. After 
that nothing else remained to do, except to resume striding back and 
forth along the bare track that stretched from a boulder to where he 
slept. 


He was still pacing when footsteps sounded in the forest below. Grab- 
bing his bow, Roran hid and waited. Relief rushed through him when 
Baldor’s face bobbed into view. Roran waved him over. 


As they sat, Roran asked, “Why hasn’t anyone come?” 


“We couldn't,” said Baldor, wiping sweat off his brow. “The soldiers 
have been watching us too closely. This was the first opportunity we had 
to get away. I can’t stay long either.” He turned his face toward the peak 
above them and shuddered. “You're braver than I, staying here. Have you 
had any trouble with wolves, bears, mountain cats?” 


“No, no, I’m fine. Did the soldiers say anything new?” 

“One of them bragged to Morn last night that their squad was hand- 
picked for this mission.” Roran frowned. “They haven't been too quiet... 
At least two or three of them get drunk each night. A group of them tore 
up Morn’s common room the first day.” 

“Did they pay for the damage?” 


“Course not.” 


Roran shifted, staring down at the village. “I still have trouble believing 
that the Empire would go to these lengths to capture me. What could I 


82 


give them? What do they think I can give them?” 


Baldor followed his gaze. “The Ra’zac questioned Katrina today. Some- 
one mentioned that the two of you are close, and the Ra’zac were curious 
if she knew where you'd gone.” 


Roran refocused on Baldor’s open face. “Is she all right?” 


“It would take more than those two to scare her,” reassured Baldor. His 
next sentence was cautious and probing. “Perhaps you should consider 
turning yourself in.” 


‘I'd sooner hang myself and them with me!” Roran started up and 
stalked over his usual route, still tapping his leg. “How can you say that, 
knowing how they tortured my father?” 


Catching his arm, Baldor said, “What happens if you remain in hiding 
and the soldiers don’t give up and leave? They'll assume we lied to help 
you escape. The Empire doesn’t forgive traitors.” 


Roran shrugged off Baldor. He spun around, tapping his leg, then 
abruptly sat. If don’t show myself, the Ra’zac will blame the people at 
hand. If I attempt to lead the Ra’zac away... Roran was not a skilled 
enough woodsman to evade thirty men and the Ra’zac. Eragon could do it, 
but not me. Still, unless the situation changed, it might be the only choice 
available to him. 


He looked at Baldor. “I don’t want anyone to be hurt on my behalf. I'll 
wait for now, and if the Ra’zac grow impatient and threaten someone... 
Well then, I'll think of something else to do.” 


“It’s a nasty situation all around,” offered Baldor. 
“One I intend to survive.” 


Baldor departed soon afterward, leaving Roran alone with his thoughts 
on his endless path. He covered mile after mile, grinding a rut into the 
earth under the weight of his ruminations. When chill dusk arrived, he 
removed his boots—for fear of wearing them out—and proceeded to pad 
barefoot. 


Just as the waxing moon rose and subsumed the night shadows in 


beams of marble light, Roran noticed a disturbance in Carvahall. Scores of 
lanterns bobbed through the darkened village, winking in and out as they 


83 


floated behind houses. The yellow specks clustered in the center of Car- 
vahall, like a cloud of fireflies, then streamed haphazardly toward the 
edge of town, where they were met by a hard line of torches from the 
soldiers’ camp. 


For two hours, Roran watched the opposing sides face each other—the 
agitated lanterns milling helplessly against the stolid torches. Finally, the 
lambent groups dispersed and filtered back into the tents and houses. 


When nothing else of interest occurred, Roran untied his bedroll and 
slipped under the blankets. 


Throughout the next day, Carvahall was consumed with unusual activ- 
ity. Figures strode between houses and even, Roran was surprised to see, 
rode out into Palancar Valley toward various farms. At noon he saw two 
men enter the soldiers’ camp and disappear into the Ra’zac’s tent for al- 
most an hour. 


So involved was he with the proceedings, Roran barely moved the en- 
tire day. 


He was in the middle of dinner when, as he had hoped, Baldor reap- 
peared. “Hungry?” asked Roran, gesturing. 


Baldor shook his head and sat with an air of exhaustion. Dark lines un- 
der his eyes made his skin look thin and bruised. “Quimby’s dead.” 


Roran’s bow] clattered as it struck the ground. He cursed, wiping cold 
stew off his leg, then asked, “How?” 


“A couple of soldiers started bothering Tara last night.” Tara was 
Morn’s wife. “She didn’t really mind, except the men got in a fight over 
who she was supposed to serve next. Quimby was there—checking a 
cask Morn said had turned—and he tried to break them up.” Roran nod- 
ded. That was Quimby, always interfering to make sure others behaved 
properly. “Only thing is, a soldier threw a pitcher and hit him on the 
temple. Killed him instantly.” 


Roran stared at the ground with his hands on his hips, struggling to re- 
gain control over his ragged breathing. He felt as if Baldor had knocked 
the wind out of him. It doesn’t seem possible.... Quimby, gone? The farmer 
and part-time brewer was as much a part of the landscape as the moun- 


84 


tains surrounding Carvahall, an unquestioned presence that shaped the 
fabric of the village. “Will the men be punished?” 


Baldor held up his hand. “Right after Quimby died, the Ra’zac stole his 
body from the tavern and hauled it out to their tents. We tried to get it 
back last night, but they wouldn’t talk with us.” 


“T saw.” 


Baldor grunted, rubbing his face. “Dad and Loring met with the Ra’zac 
today and managed to convince them to release the body. The soldiers, 
however, won't face any consequences.” He paused. “I was about to leave 
when Quimby was handed over. You know what his wife got? Bones.” 


“Bones!” 


“Every one of them was nibbled clean—you could see the bite marks— 
and most had been cracked open for the marrow.” 


Disgust gripped Roran, as well as profound horror for Quimby’s fate. It 
was well known that a person’s spirit could never rest until his body was 
given a proper burial. Revolted by the desecration, he asked, “What, who, 
ate him then?” 


“The soldiers were just as appalled. It must have been the Ra’zac.” 
“Why? To what end?” 


“I don’t think,” said Baldor, “that the Ra’zac are human. You've never 
seen them up close, but their breath is foul, and they always cover their 
faces with black scarves. Their backs are humped and twisted, and they 
speak to each other with clicks. Even their men seem to fear them.” 


“If they aren’t human, then what kind of creatures can they be?” de- 
manded Roran. “They’re not Urgals.” 


“Who knows?” 


Fear now joined Roran’s revulsion—fear of the supernatural. He saw it 
echoed on Baldor’s face as the young man clasped his hands. For all the 
stories of Galbatorix’s misdeeds, it was still a shock to have the king’s evil 
roosted among their homes. A sense of history settled on Roran as he re- 
alized he was involved with forces he had previously been acquainted 
with only through songs and stories. “Something should be done,” he 


85 


muttered. 


The air grew warmer through the night, until by afternoon Palancar 
Valley shimmered and sweltered with the unexpected spring heat. Car- 
vahall looked peaceful under the bald blue sky, yet Roran could feel the 
sour resentment that clenched its inhabitants with malicious intensity. 
The calm was like a sheet stretched taut in the wind. 


Despite the aura of expectation, the day proved to be utterly boring; 
Roran spent most of his time brushing Horst’s mare. At last he lay to 
sleep, looking up past the towering pines at the haze of stars that adorned 
the night sky. They seemed so close, it felt as if he hurtled among them, 
falling toward the blackest void. 


The moon was setting when Roran woke, his throat raw from smoke. 
He coughed and rolled upright, blinking as his eyes burned and watered. 
The noxious fumes made it difficult to breathe. 


Roran grabbed his blankets and saddled the frightened mare, then 
spurred her farther up the mountain, hoping to find clear air. It quickly 
became apparent that the smoke was ascending with him, so he turned 
and cut sideways through the forest. 


After several minutes spent maneuvering in the dark, they finally broke 
free and rode onto a ledge swept clean by a breeze. Purging his lungs with 
long breaths, Roran scanned the valley for the fire. He spotted it in an in- 
stant. 


Carvahall’s hay barn glowed white in a cyclone of flames, transforming 
its precious contents into a fountain of amber motes. Roran trembled as 
he watched the destruction of the town’s feed. He wanted to scream and 
run through the forest to help with the bucket brigade, yet he could not 
force himself to abandon his own safety. 


Now a molten spark landed on Delwin’s house. Within seconds, the 
thatched roof exploded in a wave of fire. 


Roran cursed and tore his hair, tears streaming down his face. This was 


why mishandling fire was a hanging offense in Carvahall. Was it an acci- 
dent? Was it the soldiers? Are the Ra’zac punishing the villagers for shield- 


86 


ing me?... Am I somehow responsible for this? 


Fisk’s house joined the conflagration next. Aghast, Roran could only 
avert his face, hating himself for his cowardice. 


By dawn all the fires had been extinguished or burned out on their 
own. Only sheer luck and a calm night saved the rest of Carvahall from 
being consumed. 


Roran waited until he was sure of the outcome, then retreated to his 
old camp and threw himself down to rest. From morning through eve- 
ning, he was oblivious to the world, except through the lens of his trou- 


bled dreams. 


Upon his return to awareness, Roran simply waited for the visitor he 
was sure would appear. This time it was Albriech. He arrived at dusk 
with a grim, worn expression. “Come with me,” he said. 


Roran tensed. “Why?” Have they decided to give me up? If he was the 
cause of the fire, he could understand the villagers wanting him gone. He 
might even agree it was necessary. It was unreasonable to expect every- 
one in Carvahall to sacrifice themselves for him. Still, that did not mean 
he would allow them to just hand him over to the Ra’zac. After what the 
two monsters had done to Quimby, Roran would fight to the death to 
avoid being their prisoner. 


“Because,” said Albriech, clenching his jaw muscles, “it was the soldiers 
who started the fire. Morn banned them from the Seven Sheaves, but 
they still got drunk on their own beer. One of them dropped a torch 
against the hay barn on his way to bed.” 


“Was anyone hurt?” asked Roran. 

“A few burns. Gertrude was able to handle them. We tried to negotiate 
with the Ra’zac. They spat on our requests that the Empire replace our 
losses and the guilty face justice. They even refused to confine the sol- 
diers to the tents.” 


“So why should I return?” 


Albriech chuckled hollowly. “For hammer and tongs. We need your 
help to...remove the Ra’zac.” 


87 


“You would do that for me?” 


“We're not risking ourselves for your sake alone. This concerns the en- 
tire village now. At least come talk to Father and the others and hear 
their thoughts... I'd think you would be glad to get out of these cursed 
mountains.” 


Roran considered Albriech’s proposition long and hard before deciding 
to accompany him. It’s this or run for it, and I can always run later. He 
fetched the mare, tied his bags to the saddle, then followed Albriech to- 
ward the valley floor. 


Their progress slowed as they neared Carvahall, using trees and brush 
for cover. Slipping behind a rain barrel, Albriech checked to see if the 
streets were clear, then signaled to Roran. Together they crept from 
shadow to shade, constantly on guard for the Empire’s servants. At 
Horst’s forge, Albriech opened one of the double doors just far enough 
for Roran and the mare to quietly enter. 


Inside, the workshop was lit by a single candle, which cast a trembling 
glow over the ring of faces that hovered about it in the surrounding 
darkness. Horst was there—his thick beard protruded like a shelf into the 
light—flanked by the hard visages of Delwin, Gedric, and then Loring. 
The rest of the group was composed of younger men: Baldor, Loring’s 
three sons, Parr, and Quimby’s boy, Nolfavrell, who was only thirteen. 


They all turned to look as Roran entered the assembly. Horst said, “Ah, 
you made it. You escaped misfortune while in the Spine?” 


“I was lucky.” 
“Then we can proceed.” 
“With what, exactly?” Roran hitched the mare to an anvil as he spoke. 


Loring answered, the shoemaker’s parchment face a mass of contorting 
lines and grooves. “We have attempted reason with these Ra’zac... these 
invaders. ” He stopped, his thin frame racked with an unpleasant, metal- 
lic wheeze deep in his chest. “They have refused reason. They have en- 
dangered us all with no sign of remorse or contrition.” He made a noise in 
his throat, then said with pronounced deliberation, “They... must... go. 
Such creatures—’ 


88 


“No,” said Roran. “Not creatures. Desecrators.” 


The faces scowled and bobbed in agreement. Delwin picked up the 
thread of conversation: “The point is, everyone’s life is at stake. If that fire 
had spread any farther, dozens of people would have been killed and 
those who escaped would have lost everything they own. As a result, 
we've agreed to drive the Ra’zac away from Carvahall. Will you join us?” 


Roran hesitated. “What if they return or send for reinforcements? We 
can’t defeat the entire Empire.” 


“No,” said Horst, grave and solemn, “but neither can we stand silent and 
allow the soldiers to kill us and to destroy our property. A man can en- 
dure only so much abuse before he must strike back.” 


Loring laughed, throwing back his head so the flame gilded the stumps 
of his teeth. “First we fortify,’ he whispered with glee, “then we fight. 
We'll make them regret they ever clapped their festering eyes on Carva- 
hall! Ha ha!” 


89 


RETALIATION 





After Roran agreed to their plan, Horst began distributing shovels, 
pitchforks, flails—anything that could be used to beat the soldiers and 
the Ra’zac away. 


Roran hefted a pick, then set it aside. Though he had never cared for 
Brom’s stories, one of them, the “Song of Gerand,” resonated with him 
whenever he heard it. It told of Gerand, the greatest warrior of his time, 
who relinquished his sword for a wife and farm. He found no peace, 
however, as a jealous lord initiated a blood feud against Gerand’s family, 
which forced Gerand to kill once more. Yet he did not fight with his 
blade, but with a simple hammer. 


Going to the wall, Roran removed a medium-sized hammer with a long 
handle and a rounded blade on one side of the head. He tossed it from 
hand to hand, then went to Horst and asked, “May I have this?” 


Horst eyed the tool and Roran. “Use it wisely.” Then he said to the rest 
of the group, “Listen. We want to scare, not kill. Break a few bones if you 
want, but don’t get carried away. And whatever you do, don’t stand and 
fight. No matter how brave or heroic you feel, remember that they are 
trained soldiers.” 


When everyone was equipped, they left the forge and wound their way 
through Carvahall to the edge of the Ra’zac’s camp. The soldiers had al- 
ready gone to bed, except for four sentries who patrolled the perimeter 
of the gray tents. The Ra’zac’s two horses were picketed by a smoldering 
fire. 


Horst quietly issued orders, sending Albriech and Delwin to ambush 
two of the sentries, and Parr and Roran to ambush the other two. 


Roran held his breath as he stalked the oblivious soldier. His heart be- 
gan to shudder as energy spiked through his limbs. He hid behind the 
corner of a house, quivering, and waited for Horst’s signal. Wait. 


Wait. 
With a roar, Horst burst from hiding, leading the charge into the tents. 


Roran darted forward and swung his hammer, catching the sentry on the 
shoulder with a grisly crunch. 


gO 


The man howled and dropped his halberd. He staggered as Roran 
struck his ribs and back. Roran raised the hammer again and the man re- 
treated, screaming for help. 


Roran ran after him, shouting incoherently. He knocked in the side of a 
wool tent, trampling whatever was inside, then smashed the top of a 
helmet he saw emerging from another tent. The metal rang like a bell. 
Roran barely noticed as Loring danced past—the old man cackled and 
hooted in the night as he jabbed the soldiers with a pitchfork. Every- 
where was a confusion of struggling bodies. 


Whirling around, Roran saw a soldier attempting to string his bow. He 
rushed forward and hit the back of the bow with his steel mallet, break- 
ing the wood in two. The soldier fled. 


The Ra’zac scrambled free of their tent with terrible screeches, swords 
in hand. Before they could attack, Baldor untethered the horses and sent 
them galloping toward the two scarecrow figures. The Ra’zac separated, 
then regrouped, only to be swept away as the soldiers’ morale broke and 
they ran. 


Then it was over. 


Roran panted in the silence, his hand cramped around the hammer’s 
handle. After a moment, he picked his way through the crumpled 
mounds of tents and blankets to Horst. The smith was grinning under his 
beard. “That's the best brawl] I’ve had in years.” 


Behind them, Carvahall jumped to life as people tried to discover the 
source of the commotion. Roran watched lamps flare up behind shut- 
tered windows, then turned as he heard soft sobbing. 


The boy, Nolfavrell, was kneeling by the body of a soldier, methodi- 
cally stabbing him in the chest as tears slid down his chin. Gedric and Al- 
briech hurried over and pulled Nolfavrell away from the corpse. 

“He shouldn't have come,” said Roran. 

Horst shrugged. “It was his right.” 

All the same, killing one of the Ra’zac’s men will only make it harder to 
rid ourselves of the desecrators.“ We should barricade the road and be- 


tween the houses so they won't catch us by surprise.” Studying the men 
for any injuries, Roran saw that Delwin had received a long cut on his 


Ql 


forearm, which the farmer bandaged with a strip torn from his ruined 
shirt. 


With a few shouts, Horst organized their group. He dispatched Al- 
briech and Baldor to retrieve Quimby’s wagon from the forge and had 
Loring’s sons and Parr scour Carvahall for items that could be used to se- 
cure the village. 


Even as he spoke, people congregated on the edge of the field, staring at 
what was left of the Ra’zac’s camp and the dead soldier. “What hap- 
pened?” cried Fisk. 


Loring scuttled forward and stared the carpenter in the eye. “What 
happened? I'll tell you what happened. We routed the dung-beardlings... 
caught them with their boots off and whipped them like dogs!” 


‘I am glad.” The strong voice came from Birgit, an auburn-haired 
woman who clasped Nolfavrell against her bosom, ignoring the blood 
smeared across his face. “They deserve to die like cowards for my hus- 


band’s death.” 


The villagers murmured in agreement, but then Thane spoke: “Have 
you gone mad, Horst? Even if you frightened off the Ra’zac and their sol- 
diers, Galbatorix will just send more men. The Empire will never give up 
until they get Roran.” 


“We should hand him over,” snarled Sloan. 


Horst raised his hands. “I agree; no one is worth more than all of Carva- 
hall. But if we surrender Roran, do you really think Galbatorix will let us 
escape punishment for our resistance? In his eyes, we’re no better than 
the Varden.” 


“Then why did you attack?” demanded Thane. “Who gave you the au- 
thority to make this decision? You’ve doomed us all!” 


This time Birgit answered. “Would you let them kill your wife?” She 
pressed her hands on either side of her son’s face, then showed Thane her 
bloody palms, like an accusation. “Would you let them burn us?... Where 
is your manhood, loam breaker?” 


He lowered his gaze, unable to face her stark expression. 


“They burned my farm,” said Roran, “devoured Quimby, and nearly de- 


Q2 


stroyed Carvahall. Such crimes cannot go unpunished. Are we frightened 
rabbits to cower down and accept our fate? No! We have a right to de- 
fend ourselves.” He stopped as Albriech and Baldor trudged up the street, 
dragging the wagon. “We can debate later. Now we have to prepare. 


Who will help us?” 


Forty or more men volunteered. Together they set about the difficult 
task of making Carvahall impenetrable. Roran worked incessantly, nailing 
fence slats between houses, piling barrels full of rocks for makeshift 
walls, and dragging logs across the main road, which they blocked with 
two wagons tipped on their sides. 


As Roran hurried from one chore to another, Katrina waylaid him in an 
alley. She hugged him, then said, “I’m glad you're back, and that you're 
safe.” 


He kissed her lightly. “Katrina... I have to speak with you as soon as 
we're finished.” She smiled uncertainly, but with a spark of hope. “You 
were right; it was foolish of me to delay. Every moment we spend to- 
gether is precious, and I have no desire to squander what time we have 
when a whim of fate could tear us apart.” 


Roran was tossing water on the thatching of Kiselt’s house—so it could 
not catch fire—when Parr shouted, “Ra’zac!” 


Dropping the bucket, Roran ran to the wagons, where he had left his 
hammer. As he grabbed the weapon, he saw a single Ra’zac sitting on a 
horse far down the road, almost out of bowshot. The creature was illu- 
minated by a torch in its left hand, while its right was drawn back, as if to 
throw something. 


Roran laughed. “Is he going to toss rocks at us? He’s too far away to 
even hit—’ He was cut off as the Ra’zac whipped down its arm and a 
glass vial arched across the distance between them and shattered against 
the wagon to his right. An instant later, a fireball launched the wagon 
into the air while a fist of burning air flung Roran against a wall. 


Dazed, he fell to his hands and knees, gasping for breath. Through the 
roaring in his ears came the tattoo of galloping horses. He forced himself 
upright and faced the sound, only to dive aside as the Ra’zac raced into 
Carvahall through the burning gap in the wagons. 


93 


The Ra’zac reined in their steeds, blades flashing as they hacked at the 
people strewn around them. Roran saw three men die, then Horst and 
Loring reached the Ra’zac and began pressing them back with pitchforks. 
Before the villagers could rally, soldiers poured through the breach, kill- 
ing indiscriminately in the darkness. 


Roran knew they had to be stopped, else Carvahall would be taken. He 
jumped at a soldier, catching him by surprise, and hit him in the face 
with the hammer’s blade. The soldier crumpled without a sound. As the 
man’s compatriots rushed toward him, Roran wrestled the corpse’s shield 
off his limp arm. He barely managed to get it free in time to block the 
first strike. 


Backstepping toward the Ra’zac, Roran parried a sword thrust, then 
swung his hammer up under the man’s chin, sending him to the ground. 
“To mel” shouted Roran. “Defend your homes!” He sidestepped a jab as 
five men attempted to encircle him. “To mel” 


Baldor answered his call first, then Albriech. A few seconds later, Lor- 
ing’s sons joined him, followed by a score of others. From the side streets, 
women and children pelted the soldiers with rocks. “Stay together,” or- 
dered Roran, standing his ground. “There are more of us.” 


The soldiers halted as the line of villagers before them continued to 
thicken. With more than a hundred men at his back, Roran slowly ad- 
vanced. 


“Attack, you foolsss,” screamed a Ra’zac, dodging Loring’s pitchfork. 


A single arrow whizzed toward Roran. He caught it on his shield and 
laughed. The Ra’zac were level with the soldiers now, hissing with frus- 
tration. They glared at the villagers from under their inky cowls. Sud- 
denly Roran felt himself become lethargic and powerless to move; it was 
hard to even think. Fatigue seemed to chain his arms and legs in place. 


Then from farther in Carvahall, Roran heard a raw shout from Birgit. A 
second later, a rock hurtled over his head and bored toward the lead 
Ra’zac, who twitched with supernatural speed to avoid the missile. The 
distraction, slight though it was, freed Roran’s mind from the soporific 
influence. Was that magic? he wondered. 


He dropped the shield, grasped his hammer with both hands, and raised 


it far above his head—just like Horst did when spreading metal. Roran 
went up on tiptoe, his entire body bowed backward, then whipped his 


94 


arms down with a huh! The hammer cartwheeled through the air and 
bounced off the Ra’zac’s shield, leaving a formidable dent. 


The two attacks were enough to disrupt the last of the Ra’zac’s strange 
power. They clicked rapidly to each other as the villagers roared and 
marched forward, then the Ra’zac yanked on their reins, wheeling 
around. 


“Retreat,” they growled, riding past the soldiers. The crimson-clad war- 
riors sullenly backed out of Carvahall, stabbing at anyone who came too 
close. Only when they were a good distance from the burning wagons did 
they dare turn their backs. 


Roran sighed and retrieved his hammer, feeling the bruises on his side 
and back where he had hit the wall. He bowed his head as he saw that 
the explosion had killed Parr. Nine other men had died. Already wives 
and mothers rent the night with their wails of grief. 


How could this happen here? 
“Everyone, come!” called Baldor. 


Roran blinked and stumbled to the middle of the road, where Baldor 
stood. A Ra’zac sat beetle-like on a horse only twenty yards away. The 
creature crooked a finger at Roran and said, “You... you sssmell like your 
cousin. We never forget a sssmell.” 


“What do you want?” he shouted. “Why are you here?” 


The Ra’zac_ chuckled in a_ horrible, insectile way. “We 
want...information. ” It glanced over its shoulder, where its companions 
had disappeared, then cried, “Release Roran and you ssshall be sold as 
ssslaves. Protect him, and we will eat you all. We ssshall have your an- 
swer when next we come. Be sssure it is the right one.” 


95 


AZ SWELDN RAK ANHUIN 





Light burst into the tunnel as the doors dragged open. Eragon winced, 
his eyes sorely unaccustomed to daylight after so long underground. Be- 
side him, Saphira hissed and arched her neck to get a better view of their 
surroundings. 


It had taken them two days to traverse the subterranean passage from 
Farthen Dar, though it felt longer to Eragon, due to the never-ending 
dusk that surrounded them and the silence it had imposed upon their 
group. In all, he could recall only a handful of words being exchanged 
during their journey. 


Eragon had hoped to learn more about Arya while they traveled to- 
gether, but the only information he had gleaned came simply as a result 
of observation. He had not supped with her before and was startled to 
see that she brought her own food and ate no meat. When he asked her 
why, she said, “You will never again consume an animal's flesh after you 
have been trained, or if you do, it will be only on the rarest of occasions.” 


“Why should I give up meat?” he scoffed. 


“I cannot explain with words, but you will understand once we reach 
Ellesméra.” 


All that was forgotten now as he hurried to the threshold, eager to see 
their destination. He found himself standing on a granite outcropping, 
more than a hundred feet above a purple-hued lake, brilliant under the 
eastern sun. Like Kdostha-mérna, the water reached from mountain to 
mountain, filling the valley’s end. From the lake’s far side, the Az Ragni 
flowed north, winding between the peaks until—in the far distance—it 
rushed out onto the eastern plains. 


To his right, the mountains were bare, save for a few trails, but to his 
left... to his left was the dwarf city Tarnag. Here the dwarves had re- 
worked the seemingly immutable Beors into a series of terraces. The 
lower terraces were mainly farms—dark curves of land waiting to be 
planted—dotted with squat halls, which as best he could tell were built 
entirely of stone. Above those empty levels rose tier upon tier of inter- 
locking buildings until they culminated in a giant dome of gold and 
white. It was as if the entire city was nothing more than a line of steps 
leading to the dome. The cupola glistened like polished moonstone, a 
milky bead floating atop a pyramid of gray slate. 


96 


Orik anticipated Eragon’s question, saying, “That is Celbedeil, the great- 
est temple of dwarfdom and home of Dtrgrimst Quan—the Quan clan— 
who act as servants and messengers to the gods.” 


Do they rule Tarnag? asked Saphira. Eragon repeated the query. 


“Nay,” said Arya, stepping past them. “Though the Quan are strong, 
they are small in numbers, despite their power over the afterlife... and 
gold. It is the Ragni Hefthyn—the River Guard—who control Tarnag. 
We will stay with their clan chief, Undin, while here.” 


As they followed the elf off the outcropping and through the gnarled 
forest that blanketed the mountain, Orik whispered to Eragon, “Mind her 
not. She has been arguing with the Quan for many a year. Every time she 
visits Tarnag and speaks with a priest, it produces a quarrel fierce enough 
to scare a Kull.” 


“Arya?” 


Orik nodded grimly. “I know little of it, but I’ve heard she disagrees 
strongly with much that the Quan practice. It seems that elves do not 
hold with ‘muttering into the air for help.’ ” 


Eragon stared at Arya’s back as they descended, wondering if Orik’s 
words were true, and if so, what Arya herself believed. He took a deep 
breath, pushing the matter from his mind. It felt wonderful to be back in 
the open, where he could smell the moss and ferns and trees of the forest, 
where the sun was warm on his face and bees and other insects swarmed 
pleasantly. 


The path took them down to the edge of the lake before rising back 
toward Tarnag and its open gates. “How have you hidden Tarnag from 
Galbatorix?” asked Eragon. “Farthen Dar I understand, but this... I’ve 
never seen anything like it.” 


Orik laughed softly. “Hide it? That would be impossible. No, after the 
Riders fell, we were forced to abandon all our cities aboveground and re- 
treat into our tunnels in order to escape Galbatorix and the Forsworn. 
They would often fly through the Beors, killing anyone who they en- 
countered.” 


“I thought that dwarves always lived underground.” 


oF 


Orik’s thick eyebrows met in a frown. “Why should we? We may have 
an affinity for stone, but we like the open air as much as elves or humans. 
However, it has only been in the last decade and a half, ever since Mor- 
zan died, that we have dared return to Tarnag and other of our ancient 
dwellings. Galbatorix may be unnaturally powerful, but even he would 
not attack an entire city alone. Of course, he and his dragon could cause 
us no end of trouble if they wanted, but these days they rarely leave 
Urtrbaen, even for short trips. Nor could Galbatorix bring an army here 
without first defeating Buragh or Farthen Dar.” 


Which he nearly did, commented Saphira. 


Cresting a small mound, Eragon jolted with surprise as an animal 
crashed through the underbrush and onto the path. The scraggly creature 
looked like a mountain goat from the Spine, except that it was a third 
larger and had giant ribbed horns that curled around its cheeks, making 
an Urgal’s seem no bigger than a swallow nest. Odder still was the saddle 
lashed across the goat's back and the dwarf seated firmly on it, aiming a 
half-drawn bow into the air. 


“Hert dirgrimst? Fild rastn?” shouted the strange dwarf. 


“Orik Thrifkz menthiv oen Hrethcarach Eragon rak Dargrimst Ingei- 
tum,” answered Orik. “Wharn, az vanyali-carhartig Arya. Né oc Undinz 
grimstbelardn.” The goat stared warily at Saphira. Eragon noted how 
bright and intelligent its eyes were, though its face was rather droll with 
its frosty beard and somber expression. It reminded him of Hrothgar, and 
he almost laughed, thinking how very dwarfish the animal was. 


“Azt jok jordn rast,” came the reply. 

With no discernible command on the dwarf’s part, the goat leaped 
forward, covering such an extraordinary distance it seemed to take flight 
for a moment. Then rider and steed vanished between the trees. 

“What was that?” asked Eragon, amazed. 

Orik resumed walking. “A Feldtnost, one of the five animals unique to 
these mountains. A clan is named after each one. However, Dtrgrimst 
Feldanost is perhaps the bravest and most revered of the clans.” 


“Why so?” 


“We depend upon Feldtinost for milk, wool, and meat. Without their 


98 


sustenance, we could not live in the Beors. When Galbatorix and his trai- 
torous Riders were terrorizing us, it was Dirgrimst Feldtinost who risked 
themselves—and still do—to tend the herds and fields. As such, we are 
all in their debt.” 


“Do all dwarves ride FeldGnost?” He stumbled slightly over the unusual 
word. 


“Only in the mountains. Feldtinost are hardy and sure-footed, but they 
are better suited for cliffs than open plains.” 


Saphira nudged Eragon with her nose, causing Snowfire to shy away. 
Now those would be good hunting, better than any I had in the Spine or 
hence! If I have time in Tarnag— 


No, he said. We can’t afford to offend the dwarves. 
She snorted, irritated. I could ask permission first. 


Now the path that had concealed them for so long under dark boughs 
entered the great clearing that surrounded Tarnag. Groups of observers 
had already begun to gather in the fields when seven Feldtnost with jew- 
eled harnesses bounded out from the city. Their riders bore lances tipped 
with pennants that snapped like whips in the air. Reining in his strange 
beast, the lead dwarf said, “Thou art well-come to this city of Tarnag. By 
otho of Undin and Gannel, I, Thorv, son of Brokk, offer in peace the 
shelter of our halls.” His accent grumbled and rasped with a rough burr 
quite unlike Orik’s. 


“And by Hrothgar’s otho, we of the Ingeitum accept your hospitality,” 
responded Orik. 


“As do I, in Islanzadi’s stead,” added Arya. 

Appearing satisfied, Thorv motioned to his fellow riders, who spurred 
their Feldtinost into formation around the four of them. With a flourish, 
the dwarves rode off, guiding them to Tarnag and through the city gates. 

The outer wall was forty feet thick and formed a shadowed tunnel to 
the first of the many farms that belted Tarnag. Five more tiers—each of 
which was defended by a fortified gate—carried them past the fields and 
into the city proper. 


In contrast to Tarnag’s thickly built ramparts, the buildings within, 


99 


though of stone, were shaped with such cunning as to give the impres- 
sion of grace and lightness. Strong, bold carvings, usually of animals, 
adorned the houses and shops. But even more striking was the stone it- 
self: vibrant hues, from bright scarlet to the subtlest of greens, glazed the 
rock in translucent layers. 


And hung throughout the city were the dwarves’ flameless lanterns, 
their multicolored sparks harbingers of the Beors’ long dusk and night. 


Unlike Tronjheim, Tarnag had been constructed in proportion to the 
dwarves, with no concession for human, elf, or dragon visitors. At the 
most, doorways were five feet high, and they were often only four and a 
half. Eragon was of middling height, but now he felt like a giant trans- 
ported onto a puppet stage. 


The streets were wide and crammed. Dwarves of various clans hurried 
about their business or stood haggling in and around shops. Many were 
garbed in strange, exotic costumes, such as a block of fierce black-haired 
dwarves who wore silver helmets forged in the likeness of wolf heads. 


Eragon stared at the dwarf women the most, as he had only caught 
brief glimpses of them while in Tronjheim. They were broader than the 
men, and their faces were heavyset, yet their eyes sparkled and their hair 
was lustrous and their hands were gentle on their diminutive children. 
They eschewed frippery, except for small, intricate brooches of iron and 
stone. 


At the Feldanost’s piercing footsteps, the dwarves turned to look at the 
new arrivals. They did not cheer as Eragon had expected, but rather 
bowed and murmured, “Shadeslayer.” As they saw the hammer and stars 
upon Eragon’s helm, admiration was replaced by shock and, in many 
cases, outrage. A number of the angrier dwarves contracted around the 
Feldtnost, glaring between the animals at Eragon and shouting impreca- 
tions. 


The back of Eragon’s neck prickled. It seems that adopting me wasn’t the 
most popular decision Hrothgar could make. 


Aye, agreed Saphira. He may have strengthened his hold on you, but at 
the cost of alienating many of the dwarves.... We'd better get out of sight be- 
fore blood is shed. 


Thorv and the other guards rode forward as if the crowd was nonexis- 
tent, clearing the way through seven additional tiers until only a single 


100 


gate separated them from the mass of Celbedeil. Then Thorv turned left, 
toward a great hall pressed against the side of the mountain and pro- 
tected in fore by a barbican with two machicolated towers. 


As they neared the hall, a group of armed dwarves streamed out from 
between the houses and formed a thick line, blocking the street. Long 
purple veils covered their faces and draped over their shoulders, like mail 
coifs. 


The guards immediately reined in their Feldtnost, faces hard. “What is 
it?” Eragon asked Orik, but the dwarf only shook his head and strode 
forward, a hand on his ax. 


“Etzil nithgech!” cried a veiled dwarf, raising a fist. “Formv Hrethca- 
rach... formv Jurgencarmeitder nos eta goroth bahst Tarnag, dtr encesti 
rak kythn! Jok is warrev az barztlegdar dtr dargrimst, Az Sweldn rak An- 
hain, mégh tor rak Jurgenvren? Né ddim etal os rast knurlag. Knurlag 
ana...” For a long minute, he continued to rant with growing spleen. 


“Vrron!” barked Thorv, cutting him off, then the two dwarves began 
arguing. Despite the harsh exchange, Eragon saw that Thorv seemed to 
respect the other dwarf. 


Eragon shifted to the side—trying to get a better view past Thorv’s 
Felda@nost—and the veiled dwarf abruptly fell silent, jabbing at Eragon’s 
helm with an expression of horror. 


“Knurlag gana girant: Dirgrimst Ingeitum!” he screamed. “Qarztl ana 
Hrothgar oen volfild—’” 


‘Jok is frekk dirgrimstvren?” interrupted Orik quietly, drawing his ax. 
Worried, Eragon glanced at Arya, but she was too intent on the confron- 
tation to notice him. He surreptitiously slid his hand down and around 
Zar roc’s wire-wrapped hilt. 


The strange dwarf stared hard at Orik, then removed an iron ring from 
his pocket, plucked three hairs from his beard, twined them around the 
ring, and threw it onto the street with an impervious clink, spitting after 
it. Without a word, the purple-shrouded dwarves filed away. 


Thorv, Orik, and the other warriors flinched as the ring bounced across 
the granite pavement. Even Arya seemed taken aback. Two of the 
younger dwarves blanched and reached for their blades, then dropped 
their hands as Thorv barked, “Eta!” 


101 


Their reactions unsettled Eragon far more than the raucous exchange 
had. As Orik strode forward alone and deposited the ring in a pouch, Er- 
agon asked, “What does it mean?” 


“It means,” said Thorv, “that you have enemies.” 


They hurried through the barbican to a wide courtyard arrayed with 
three banquet tables, decorated with lanterns and banners. Before the ta- 
bles stood a group of dwarves, foremost among them a gray-bearded 
dwarf swathed in wolfskin. He spread his arms, saying, “Welcome to 
Tarnag, home of Dargrimst Ragni Hefthyn. We have heard much praise 
of you, Eragon Shadeslayer. I am Undin, son of Derdnd and clan chief.” 


Another dwarf stepped forward. He had the shoulders and chest of a 
warrior, topped with hooded black eyes that never left Eragon’s face. 
“And I, Gannel, son of Orm Blood-ax and clan chief of Dargrimst Quan.” 


“It is an honor to be your guests,” said Eragon, inclining his head. He felt 
Saphira’s irritation at being ignored. Patience, he murmured, forcing a 
smile. 


She snorted. 


The clan chiefs greeted Arya and Orik in turn, but their hospitality was 
lost on Orik, whose only response was to extend his hand, the iron ring 
on his palm. 


Undin’s eyes widened, and he gingerly lifted the ring, pinching it be- 
tween his thumb and forefinger as if it were a venomous snake. “Who 
gave this to you?” 


“It was Az Sweldn rak Anhtin. And not to me, but to Eragon.” 


As alarm spread across their faces, Eragon’s earlier apprehension re- 
turned. He had seen lone dwarves face an entire group of Kull without 
shirking. The ring must symbolize something dreadful indeed if it could 
undermine their courage. 


Undin frowned as he listened to the muttering of his advisers, then said, 
“We must consult on this issue. Shadeslayer, a feast is prepared in your 
honor. If you would allow my servants to guide you to your quarters, you 
can refresh yourself, and then we might begin.” 


102 


“Of course.” Eragon handed Snowfire’s reins to a waiting dwarf and fol- 
lowed a guide into the hall. As he passed through the doorway, he 
glanced back and saw Arya and Orik bustling away with the clan chiefs, 
their heads pressed close together. I won't be long, he promised Saphira. 


After crouching through dwarf-sized corridors, he was relieved that the 
room assigned to him was spacious enough to stand freely. The servant 
bowed and said, “I will return when Grimstborith Undin is ready.” 


Once the dwarf was gone, Eragon paused and took a deep breath, grate- 
ful for the silence. The encounter with the veiled dwarves hovered in his 
mind, making it difficult for him to relax. At least we won't be in Tarnag 
long. That should prevent them from hindering us. 


Peeling off his gloves, Eragon went to a marble basin set on the floor 
next to the low bed. He put his hands in the water, then jerked them out 
with an involuntary yelp. The water was almost boiling. It must be a 
dwarf custom, he realized. He waited until it cooled a bit, then doused his 
face and neck, rubbing them clean as steam swirled off his skin. 


Rejuvenated, he stripped out of his breeches and tunic and outfitted 
himself in the clothes he had worn to Ajihad’s funeral. He touched 
Zar'roc, but decided it would only insult Undin’s table and instead belted 
on his hunting knife. 


Then, from his pack, he took the scroll Nasuada had charged him with 
delivering to Islanzadi and weighed it in his hand, wondering where to 
hide it. The missive was too important to leave out in the open, where it 
could be read or stolen. Unable to think of a better place, he slipped the 
scroll up his sleeve. It'll be safe there unless I get into a fight, in which case 
I'll have bigger problems to worry about. 


When at last the servant returned for Eragon, it was only an hour or so 
past noon, but the sun had already vanished behind the looming moun- 
tains, plunging Tarnag into dusk. Exiting the hall, Eragon was struck by 
the city’s transformation. With the premature advent of night, the 
dwarves’ lanterns revealed their true strength, flooding the streets with 
pure, unwavering light that made the entire valley glow. 


Undin and the other dwarves were gathered in the courtyard, along 


with Saphira, who had situated herself at the head of a table. No one ap- 
peared interested in disputing her choice. 


103 


Has anything happened? asked Eragon, hurrying toward her. 
Undin summoned extra warriors, then had the gates barred. 
Does he expect an attack? 

At the very least, he’s concerned about the possibility. 


“Eragon, please join me,” said Undin, gesturing at the chair to his right. 
The clan chief seated himself as Eragon did, and the rest of the company 
hurriedly followed suit. 


Eragon was happy when Orik ended up beside him with Arya directly 
across the table, although both looked grim. Before he could ask Orik 
about the ring, Undin slapped the table and roared, “Ignh az voth!” 


Servants streamed out of the hall, bearing platters of beaten gold piled 
high with meats, pies, and fruit. They divided into three columns—one 
for each table—and deposited the dishes with a flourish. 


Before them were soups and stews filled with various tubers, roasted 
venison, long hot loaves of sourdough bread, and rows of honeycakes 
dripped with raspberry preserve. In a bed of greens lay filleted trout gar- 
nished with parsley, and on the side, pickled eel stared forlornly at an urn 
of cheese, as if hoping to somehow escape back into a river. A swan sat 


on each table, surrounded by a flock of stuffed partridges, geese, and 
ducks. 


Mushrooms were everywhere: broiled in juicy strips, placed atop a 
bird’s head like a bonnet, or carved in the shape of castles amid moats of 
gravy. An incredible variety was on display, from puffy white mushrooms 
the size of Eragon’s fist, to ones he could have mistaken for gnarled bark, 
to delicate toadstools sliced neatly in half to showcase their blue flesh. 


Then the centerpiece of the feast was revealed: a gigantic roasted boar, 
glistening with sauce. At least Eragon thought it was a boar, for the car- 
cass was as large as Snowfire and took six dwarves to carry. The tusks 
were longer than his forearms, the snout as wide as his head. And the 
smell, it overwhelmed all others in pungent waves that made his eyes 
water from their strength. 


“Nagra,” whispered Orik. “Giant boar. Undin truly honors you tonight, 
Eragon. Only the bravest dwarves dare hunt Nagran, and it is only served 


104 


to those who have great valor. Also, I think he makes a gesture that he 
will support you over Dtrgrimst Nagra.” 


Eragon leaned toward him so no one else could hear. “Then this is an- 
other animal native to the Beors? What are the rest?” 


“Forest wolves big enough to prey on a Nagra and nimble enough to 
catch Feldanost. Cave bears, which we call Urzhadn and the elves call 
Beorn and for which they dubbed these peaks, though we do not call 
them such ourselves. The mountains’ name is a secret that we share with 
no race. And—” 


“Smer voth,” commanded Undin, smiling at his guests. The servants 
immediately drew small curved knives and cut portions of the Nagra, 
which they set on everyone’s plates—except for Arya’s— including a 
weighty piece for Saphira. Undin smiled again, took a dagger, and sliced 
off a bit of his meat. 


Eragon reached for his own knife, but Orik grabbed his arm. “Wait.” 


Undin chewed slowly, rolling his eyes and nodding in an exaggerated 
fashion, then swallowed and proclaimed, “Ilf gauhnith!” 


“Now,” said Orik, turning to the meal as conversation erupted along the 
tables. 


Eragon had never tasted anything like the boar. It was juicy, soft, and 
oddly spicy—as if the meat had been soaked in honey and cider—which 
was enhanced by the mint used to flavor the pork. I wonder how they 
managed to cook something so large. 


Very slowly, commented Saphira, nibbling on her Nagra. 


Between bites, Orik explained, “It is custom, from days when poisoning 
was rampant among clans, for the host to taste the food first and declare 
it safe for his guests.” 


During the banquet, Eragon divided his time between sampling the 
multitude of dishes and conversing with Orik, Arya, and dwarves farther 
down the table. In that manner, the hours hastened by, for the feast was 
so large, it was late afternoon before the last course had been served, the 
last bite consumed, and the last chalice drained. As servants removed the 
tableware, Undin turned to Eragon and said, “The meal pleased you, yes?” 


105 


“It was delicious.” 


Undin nodded. “I’m glad you enjoyed it. I had the tables moved outside 
yesterday so the dragon might dine with us.” He remained intently fo- 
cused on Eragon all the while he spoke. 


Eragon went cold inside. Intentionally or not, Undin had treated 
Saphira as no more than a beast. Eragon had intended to ask about the 
veiled dwarves in private, but now—out of a desire to unsettle Undin— 
he said, “Saphira and I thank you.” Then, “Sir, why was the ring thrown at 
us?” 


A painful silence crept over the courtyard. Out of the corner of his eye, 
Eragon saw Orik wince. Arya, however, smiled as if she understood what 
he was doing. 


Undin put down his dagger, scowling thickly. “The knurlagn you met 
are of a tragic clan. Before the Riders’ fall, they were among the oldest, 
richest families of our kingdom. Their doom was sealed, though, by two 
mistakes: they lived on the western edge of the Beor Mountains, and they 
volunteered their greatest warriors in Vrael’s service.” 


Anger broke through his voice with sharp cracks. “Galbatorix and his 
ever-cursed Forsworn slaughtered them in your city of Urt’baen. Then 
they flew on us, killing many. Of that clan, only Grimstcarvlorss Anhtin 
and her guards survived. Anhtin soon died of grief, and her men took the 
name Az Sweldn rak Anhdin, The Tears of Anhdin, covering their faces 
to remind themselves of their loss and their desire for revenge.” 


Eragon’s cheeks stung with shame as he fought to keep his face expres- 
sionless. “So,” said Undin, glowering at a pastry, “they rebuilt the clan over 
the decades, waiting and hunting for recompense. And now you come, 
bearing Hrothgar’s mark. It is the ultimate insult to them, no matter your 
service in Farthen Dar. Thus the ring, the ultimate challenge. It means 
Dargrimst Az Sweldn rak Anhtin will oppose you with all their re- 
sources, in every matter, big or small. They have set themselves against 
you utterly, declared themselves blood enemies.” 


“Do they mean me bodily harm?” asked Eragon stiffly. 
Undin’s gaze faltered for a moment as he cast a look at Gannel, then he 
shook his head and uttered a gruff laugh that was, perhaps, louder than 


the occasion warranted. “No, Shadeslayer! Not even they would dare hurt 
a guest. It is forbidden. They only want you gone, gone, gone.” Yet Eragon 


106 


still wondered. Then Undin said, “Please, let us talk no more of these un- 
pleasant matters. Gannel and I have offered our food and mead in friend- 
ship; is that not what matters?” The priest murmured in concordance. 

“It is appreciated,” Eragon finally relented. 

Saphira looked at him with solemn eyes and said, They are afraid, Er- 
agon. Afraid and resentful because they have been forced to accept a Rider's 


assistance. 


Aye. They may fight with us, but they don’t fight for us. 


107 


CELBEDEIL 





The dawnless morning found Eragon in Undin’s main hall, listening as 
the clan chief spoke to Orik in Dwarvish. Undin broke off as Eragon ap- 
proached, then said, “Ah, Shadeslayer. You slept well?” 


“Ves.” 


“Good.” He gestured at Orik. “We have been considering your depar- 
ture. I had hoped you'd be able to spend some time with us. But under 
the circumstances, it seems best if you resume your journey early tomor- 
row morning, when few are in the streets who might trouble you. Sup- 
plies and transportation are being readied even as I speak. It was Hroth- 
gars orders that guards should accompany you as far as Ceris. I have in- 
creased their numbers from three to seven.” 


“And in the meantime?” 


Undin shrugged his fur-bound shoulders. “I had intended to show you 
the wonders of Tarnag, but it would be foolish now for you to wander 
mine city. However, Grimstborith Gannel has invited you to Celbedeil 
for the day. Accept if you wish. You'll be safe with him.” The clan chief 
seemed to have forgotten his earlier assertion that Az Sweldn rak Anhtin 
would not harm a guest. 


“Thank you, I might at that.” As Eragon left the hall, he pulled Orik 
aside and asked, “How serious is this feud, really? I need to know the 
truth.” 


Orik answered with obvious reluctance: “In the past, it was not un- 
common for blood feuds to endure for generations. Entire families were 
driven extinct because of them. It was rash of Az Sweldn rak Anhtin to 
invoke the old ways; such a thing has not been done since the last of the 
clan wars.... Until they rescind their oath, you must guard against their 
treachery, whether it be for a year or a century. I’m sorry that your 
friendship with Hrothgar has brought this upon you, Eragon. But you are 
not alone. Dargrimst Ingeitum stands with you in this.” 


Once outside, Eragon hurried to Saphira, who had spent the night 
coiled in the courtyard. Do you mind if I visit Celbedeil? 


108 


Go if you must. But take Zar’roc. He followed her advice, also tucking 
Nasuada’s scroll into his tunic. 


When Eragon approached the gates to the hall’s enclosure, five dwarves 
pushed the rough-hewn timbers aside, then closed in around him, hands 
on their axes and swords as they inspected the street. The guards re- 
mained as Eragon retraced yesterday’s path to the barred entrance of Tar- 
nag’s foremost tier. 


Eragon shivered. The city seemed unnaturally empty. Doors were 
closed, windows were shuttered, and the few pedestrians in evidence 
averted their faces and turned down alleys to avoid walking past him. 
They're scared to be seen near me, he realized. Perhaps because they know 
Az Sweldn rak Anhiin will retaliate against anyone who helps me. Eager to 
escape the open street, Eragon raised his hand to knock, but before he 
could, one door grated outward, and a black-robed dwarf beckoned from 
within. Tightening his sword belt, Eragon entered, leaving his guards out- 
side. 


His first impression was of color. A burning-green sward splayed 
around the pillared mass of Celbedeil, like a mantle dropped over the 
symmetrical hill that upheld the temple. Ivy strangled the building’s an- 
cient walls in foot after foot of hairy ropes, dew still glittering on the 
pointed leaves. And curving above all but the mountains was the great 
white cupola ribbed with chiseled gold. 


His next impression was of smell. Flowers and incense mixed their per- 
fumes into an aroma so ethereal, Eragon felt as if he could live on the 
scent alone. 


Last was sound, for despite clumps of priests strolling along mosaic 
pathways and spacious grounds, the only noise Eragon could discern was 
the soft thump of a rook flying overhead. 


The dwarf beckoned again and strode down the main avenue toward 
Celbedeil. As they passed under its eaves, Eragon could only marvel at 
the wealth and craftsmanship displayed around him. The walls were 
spotted with gems of every color and cut—though all flawless—and red 
gold had been hammered into the veins lacing the stone ceilings, walls, 
and floor. Pearls and silver provided accents. Occasionally, they passed a 
screen partition carved entirely of jade. 


The temple was devoid of cloth decorations. In their absence, the 
dwarves had carved a profusion of statues, many depicting monsters and 


109 


deities locked in epic battles. 


After climbing several floors, they passed through a copper door waxy 
with verdigris and embossed with intricate, patterned knots into a bare 
room floored with wood. Armor hung thickly on the walls, along with 
racks of staff-swords identical to the one Angela had fought with in Far- 
then Dar. 


Gannel was there, sparring with three younger dwarves. The clan 
chief's robe was rucked up over his thighs so he could move freely, his 
face a fierce scowl as the wood shaft spun in his hands, unsharpened 
blades darting like riled hornets. 


Two dwarves lunged at Gannel, only to be stymied in a clatter of wood 
and metal as he spun past them, rapping their knees and heads and send- 
ing them to the floor. Eragon grinned as he watched Gannel disarm his 
last opponent in a brilliant flurry of blows. 


At last the clan chief noticed Eragon and dismissed the other dwarves. 
As Gannel set his weapon on a rack, Eragon said, “Are all Quan so profi- 
cient with the blade? It seems an odd skill for priests.” 


Gannel faced him. “We must be able to defend ourselves, no? Many 
enemies stalk this land.” 


Eragon nodded. “Those are unique swords. I’ve never seen their like, 
except for one an herbalist used in the battle of Farthen Dar.” 


The dwarf sucked in his breath, then let it hiss out between his teeth. 
“Angela.” His expression soured. “She won her staff from a priest in a 
game of riddles. It was a nasty trick, as we are the only ones allowed to 
use htthvirn. She and Arya...” He shrugged and went to a small table, 
where he filled two mugs with ale. Handing one to Eragon, he said, “I in- 
vited you here today at Hrothgar’s request. He told me that if you ac- 
cepted his offer to become Ingeitum, I was to acquaint you with dwarf 
traditions.” 


Eragon sipped the ale and kept silent, eyeing how Gannel’s thick brow 
caught the light, shadows dripping down his cheeks from the bony ridge. 


The clan chief continued: “Never before has an outsider been taught 
our secret beliefs, nor may you speak of them to human or elf. Yet with- 
out this knowledge, you cannot uphold what it means to be knurla. You 
are Ingeitum now: our blood, our flesh, our honor. You understand?” 


“J do.” 


“Come.” Keeping his ale in hand, Gannel took Eragon from the sparring 
room and conveyed him through five grand corridors, stopping in the 
archway to a dim chamber hazy with incense. Facing them, the squat 
outline of a statue swelled ponderously from floor to ceiling, a faint light 
cast across the brooding dwarf face hacked with uncharacteristic crude- 
ness from brown granite. 


“Who is he?” asked Eragon, intimidated. 


“Gtntera, King of the Gods. He is a warrior and a scholar, though fickle 
in his moods, so we burn offerings to assure his affection at the solstices, 
before sowing, and at deaths and births.” Gannel twisted his hand in a 
strange gesture and bowed to the statue. “It is to him we pray before bat- 
tles, for he molded this land from the bones of a giant and gives the 


) ” 


world its order. All realms are Gtntera’s. 


Then Gannel instructed Eragon how to properly venerate the god, ex- 
plaining the signs and words that were used for homage. He elucidated 
the meaning of the incense—how it symbolized life and happiness—and 
spent long minutes recounting legends about Gintera, how the god was 
born fully formed to a she-wolf at the dawn of stars, how he had battled 
monsters and giants to win a place for his kin in Alagaésia, and how he 
had taken Kilf, the goddess of rivers and the sea, as his mate. 


Next they went to Kilfs statue, which was carved with exquisite deli- 
cacy out of pale blue stone. Her hair flew back in liquid ripples, rolling 
down her neck and framing merry amethyst eyes. In her hands, she 
cupped a water lily and a chunk of porous red rock that Eragon did not 
recognize. 


“What is that?” he asked, pointing. 

“Coral taken from deep within the sea that borders the Beors.” 

“Coral?” 

Gannel took a draught of ale, then said, “Our divers found it while 
searching for pearls. It seems that, in brine, certain stones grow like 


plants.” 


Eragon stared with wonder. He had never thought of pebbles or boul- 


ders as alive, yet here was proof that all they needed was water and salt 
to flourish. It finally explained how rocks had continued to appear in 
their fields in Palancar Valley, even after the soil had been combed clean 
each spring. They grew! 


They proceeded to Urir, master of the air and heavens, and his brother 
Morgothal, god of fire. At the carmine statue of Morgothal, the priest 
told how the brothers loved each other so much, neither could exist in- 
dependently. Thus, Morgothal’s burning palace in the sky during the day, 
and the sparks from his forge that appeared overhead every night. And 
also thus, how Urar constantly fed his sibling so he would not die. 


Only two more gods were left after that: Sindri—mother of the earth— 
and Helzvog. 


Helzvog’s statue was different from the rest. The nude god was bowed 
in half over a dwarf-sized lump of gray flint, caressing it with the tip of 
his forefinger. The muscles of his back bunched and knotted with inhu- 
man strain, yet his expression was incredibly tender, as if a newborn child 
lay before him. 


Gannel’s voice dropped to a low rasp: “Gtintera may be King of the 
Gods, but it is Helzvog who holds our hearts. It was he who felt that the 
land should be peopled after the giants were vanquished. The other gods 
disagreed, but Helzvog ignored them and, in secret, formed the first 
dwarf from the roots of a mountain. 


“When his deed was discovered, jealousy swept the gods and Gtintera 
created elves to control Alagaésia for himself. Then Sindri brought forth 
humans from the soil, and Urtr and Morgothal combined their knowl- 
edge and released dragons into the land. Only Kilf restrained herself. So 
the first races entered this world.” 


Eragon absorbed Gannel’s words, accepting the clan chief's sincerity but 
unable to quell a simple question: How does he know? Eragon sensed that 
it would be an awkward query, however, and merely nodded as he lis- 
tened. 


“This,” said Gannel, finishing the last of his ale, “leads to our most im- 
portant rite, which I know Orik has discussed with you... All dwarves 
must be buried in stone, else our spirits will never join Helzvog in his 
hall. We are not of earth, air, or fire, but of stone. And as Ingeitum, it is 
your responsibility to assure a proper resting place for any dwarf who 
may die in your company. If you fail—in the absence of injury or ene- 


mies—Hrothgar will exile you, and no dwarf will acknowledge your 
presence until after your death.” He straightened his shoulders, staring 
hard at Eragon. “You have much more to learn, yet uphold the customs I 
outlined today and you will do well.” 


“I won't forget,” said Eragon. 


Satisfied, Gannel led him away from the statues and up a winding stair- 
case. As they climbed, the clan chief dipped a hand into his robe and 
withdrew a simple necklace, a chain threaded through the pommel of a 
miniature silver hammer. He gave it to Eragon. 


“This is another favor Hrothgar asked of me,” Gannel explained. “He 
worries that Galbatorix may have gleaned an image of you from the 
minds of Durza, the Ra’zac, or any number of soldiers who saw you 
throughout the Empire.” 


“Why should I fear that?” 
“Because then Galbatorix could scry you. Perhaps he already has.” 


A shiver of apprehension wormed down Eragon’s side, like an icy 
snake. I should have thought of that, he berated himself. 


“The necklace will prevent anyone from scrying you or your dragon, as 
long as you wear it. I placed the spell myself, so it should hold before 
even the strongest mind. But be forewarned, when activated, the neck- 
lace will draw upon your strength until you either take it off or the dan- 
ger has passed.” 


“What if I’m asleep? Could the necklace consume all my energy before 
I was aware of it?” 


“Nay. It will wake you.” 


Eragon rolled the hammer between his fingers. It was difficult to avert 
another's spells, least of all Galbatorix’s. If Gannel is so accomplished, 
what other enchantments might be hidden in his gift? He noticed a line of 
runes cut along the hammer’s haft. They spelled Astim Hefthyn. The 
stairs ended as he asked, “Why do dwarves write with the same runes as 
humans?” 


For the first time since they met, Gannel laughed, his voice booming 
through the temple as his large shoulders shook. “It is the other way 


113 


around; humans write with our runes. When your ancestors landed in 
Alagaésia, they were as illiterate as rabbits. However, they soon adopted 
our alphabet and matched it to this language. Some of your words even 
come from us, like father, which was originally farthen. ” 


“So then Farthen Dar means... ?” Eragon slipped the necklace over his 
head and tucked it under his tunic. 


“Our Father.” 


Stopping at a door, Gannel ushered Eragon through to a curved gallery 
located directly below the cupola. The passageway banded Celbedeil, 
providing a view through the open archways of the mountains behind 
Tarnag, as well as the terraced city far below. 


Eragon barely glanced at the landscape, for the gallery’s inner wall was 
covered with a single continuous painting, a gigantic narrative band that 
began with a depiction of the dwarves’ creation under Helzvog’s hand. 
The figures and objects stood in relief from the surface, giving the pano- 
rama a feeling of hyperrealism with its saturated, glowing colors and 
minute detail. 


Captivated, Eragon asked, “How was this made?” 


“Each scene is carved out of small plates of marble, which are fired 
with enamel, then fitted into a single piece.” 


“Wouldn't it be easier to use regular paint?” 


“It would,” said Gannel, “but not if we wanted it to endure centuries— 
millennia—without change. Enamel never fades or loses its brilliancy, 
unlike oil paint. This first section was carved only a decade after the dis- 
covery of Farthen Dar, well before elves set foot on Alagaésia.” 


The priest took Eragon by the arm and guided him along the tableau. 
Each step carried them through uncounted years of history. 


Eragon saw how the dwarves were once nomads on a seemingly endless 
plain, until the land grew so hot and desolate they were forced to migrate 
south to the Beor Mountains. That was how the Hadarac Desert was 
formed, he realized, amazed. 


As they proceeded down the mural, heading toward the back of Cel- 
bedeil, Eragon witnessed everything from the domestication of Feldtinost 


114 


to the carving of Isidar Mithrim, the first meeting between dwarves and 
elves, and the coronation of each new dwarf king. Dragons frequently ap- 
peared, burning and slaughtering. Eragon had difficulty restraining com- 
ment during those sections. 


His steps slowed as the painting shifted to the event he had hoped to 
find: the war between elves and dragons. Here the dwarves had devoted a 
vast amount of space to the destruction wreaked upon Alagaésia by the 
two races. Eragon shuddered with horror at the sight of elves and dragons 
killing each other. The battles continued for yards, each image more 
bloody than the last, until the darkness lifted and a young elf was shown 
kneeling on the edge of a cliff, holding a white dragon egg. 


“Is that... ?” whispered Eragon. 


“Aye, it’s Eragon, the First Rider. It’s a good likeness too, as he agreed to 
sit for our artisans.” 


Drawn forward by his fascination, Eragon studied the face of his name- 
sake. I always imagined him older. The elf had angled eyes that peered 
down a hooked nose and narrow chin, giving him a fierce appearance. It 
was an alien face, completely different from his own... and yet the set of 
his shoulders, high and tense, reminded Eragon of how he had felt upon 
finding Saphira’s egg. We’re not so different, you and I, he thought, touch- 
ing the cool enamel. And once my ears match yours, we shall truly be 
brothers through time.... I wonder, would you approve of my actions? He 
knew they had made at least one identical choice; they had both kept the 


egg. 

He heard a door open and close and turned to see Arya approaching 
from the far end of the gallery. She scanned the wall with the same blank 
expression Eragon had seen her use when confronting the Council of Eld- 
ers. Whatever her specific emotions, he sensed that she found the situa- 
tion distasteful. 

Arya inclined her head. “Grimstborith.” 

“Arya.” 


“You have been educating Eragon in your mythology?” 


Gannel smiled flatly. “One should always understand the faith of the 
society that one belongs to.” 


115 


“Yet comprehension does not imply belief.” She fingered the pillar of an 
archway. “Nor does it mean that those who purvey such beliefs do so for 
more than... material gain.” 


“You would deny the sacrifices my clan makes to bring comfort to our 
brethren?” 


“I deny nothing, only ask what good might be accomplished if your 
wealth were spread among the needy, the starving, the homeless, or even 
to buy supplies for the Varden. Instead, you've piled it into a monument 
to your own wishful thinking.” 


“Enough!” The dwarf clenched his fists, his face mottled. “Without us, 
the crops would wither in drought. Rivers and lakes would flood. Our 
flocks would give birth to one-eyed beasts. The very heavens would shat- 
ter under the gods’ rage!” Arya smiled. “Only our prayers and service pre- 
vent that from happening. If not for Helzvog, where—’ 


Eragon soon lost track of the argument. He did not understand Arya’s 
vague criticisms of Dtirgrimst Quan, but he gathered from Gannel’s re- 
sponses that, in some indirect way, she had implied that the dwarf gods 
did not exist, questioned the mental capacity of every dwarf who entered 
a temple, and pointed out what she took to be flaws in their reasoning— 
all in a pleasant and polite voice. 


After a few minutes, Arya raised her hand, stopping Gannel, and said, 
“That is the difference between us, Grimstborith. You devote yourself to 
that which you believe to be true but cannot prove. There, we must 
agree to disagree.” She turned to Eragon then. “Az Sweldn rak Anhdin has 
inflamed Tarnag’s citizens against you. Undin believes, as do I, that it 
would be best for you to remain behind his walls until we leave.” 


Eragon hesitated. He wanted to see more of Celbedeil, but if there was 
to be trouble, then his place was by Saphira’s side. He bowed to Gannel 
and begged to be excused. “You need not apologize, Shadeslayer,” said the 
clan chief. He glared at Arya. “Do what you must, and may the blessings 
of Gintera be upon you.” 


Together Eragon and Arya departed the temple and, surrounded by a 
dozen warriors, trotted through the city. As they did, Eragon heard 
shouts from an angry mob on a lower tier. A stone skipped over a nearby 
roof. The motion drew his eye to a dark plume of smoke rising from the 
city’s edge. 


116 


Once in the hall, Eragon hurried to his room. There he slipped on his 
mail hauberk; strapped the greaves to his shins and the bracers to his 
forearms; jammed the leather cap, coif, and then helm over his head; and 
grabbed his shield. Scooping up his pack and saddlebags, he ran back to 
the courtyard, where he sat against Saphira’s right foreleg. 


Tarnag is like an overturned anthill, she observed. 
Let’s hope we don't get bitten. 


Arya joined them before long, as did a group of fifty heavily armed 
dwarves who settled in the middle of the courtyard. The dwarves waited 
impassively, talking in low grunts as they eyed the barred gate and the 
mountain that rose up behind them. 


“They fear,” said Arya, seating herself by Eragon, “that the crowds may 
prevent us from reaching the rafts.” 


“Saphira can always fly us out.” 


“Snowfire as well? And Undin’s guards? No, if we are stopped, we shall 
have to wait until the dwarves’ outrage subsides.” She studied the darken- 
ing sky. “It’s unfortunate that you managed to offend so many dwarves, 
but perhaps inevitable. The clans have ever been contentious; what 
pleases one infuriates another.” 


He fingered the edge of his mail. “I wish now I hadn’t accepted Hroth- 
gar’s offer.” 


“Ah, yes. As with Nasuada, I think you made the only viable choice. 
You are not to blame. The fault, if any, lies with Hrothgar for making the 
offer in the first place. He must have been well aware of the repercus- 
sions.” 

Silence reigned for several minutes. A half-dozen dwarves marched 
around the courtyard, stretching their legs. Finally, Eragon asked, “Do you 
have any family in Du Weldenvarden?” 

It was a long time before Arya answered. “None that I’m close to.” 


“Why... why is that?” 


She hesitated again. “They disliked my choice to become the Queen’s 
envoy and ambassador; it seemed inappropriate. When I ignored their ob- 


117 


jections and still had the yawé tattooed on my shoulder—which indicates 
that I have devoted myself to the greater good of our race, as is the case 
with your ring from Brom—my family refused to see me again.” 


“But that was over seventy years ago,” he protested. 


Arya looked away, concealing her face behind a veil of hair. Eragon 
tried to imagine what it must have been like for her—ostracized from 
her family and sent to live among two completely different races. No 
wonder she’s so withdrawn, he realized. “Are there any other elves outside 
of Du Weldenvarden?” 


Still keeping her face covered, she said, “Three of us were sent forth 
from Ellesméra. Faolin and Glenwing always traveled with me when we 
transported Saphira’s egg between Du Weldenvarden and Tronjheim. 
Only I survived Durza’s ambush.” 


“What were they like?” 


“Proud warriors. Glenwing loved speaking to birds with his mind. He 
would stand in the forest surrounded by a flock of songbirds and listen to 
their music for hours. Afterward, he might sing us the prettiest melodies.” 


“And Faolin?” This time Arya refused to answer, though her hands 
tightened on her bow. Undaunted, Eragon cast around for another sub- 
ject. “Why do you dislike Gannel so much?” 


She faced him suddenly and touched his cheek with soft fingers. Eragon 
flinched with surprise. “That,” she said, “is a discussion for another time.” 
Then she stood and calmly relocated herself across the courtyard. 


Confused, Eragon stared at her back. I don’t understand, he said, leaning 
against Saphira’s belly. She snorted, amused, then curled her neck and tail 
around him and promptly fell asleep. 


As the valley darkened, Eragon struggled to stay alert. He pulled out 
Gannel’s necklace and examined it several times with magic, but found 
only the priest’s guarding spell. Giving up, he replaced the necklace under 
his tunic, pulled his shield over him, and settled down to wait through 
the night. 


At the first hint of light in the sky overhead—though the valley itself 


118 


was still in shadow and would remain so until almost midday—Eragon 
roused Saphira. The dwarves were already up, busy muffling their weap- 
ons so they could creep through Tarnag with utter secrecy. Undin even 
had Eragon tie rags around Saphira’s claws and Snowfire’s hooves. 


When all was ready, Undin and his warriors assembled in a large block 
around Eragon, Saphira, and Arya. The gates were carefully opened—no 
sound came from the oiled hinges—and then they set out for the lake. 


Tarnag seemed deserted, the vacant streets lined with houses where its 
inhabitants lay oblivious and dreaming. The few dwarves they encoun- 
tered gazed at them silently, then padded away like ghosts in the twilight. 


At the gate to each tier, a guard waved them through without com- 
ment. They soon left the buildings and found themselves crossing the 
barren fields at Tarnag’s base. Beyond those, they reached the stone quay 
that edged the still, gray water. 


Waiting for them were two wide rafts tied alongside a pier. Three 
dwarves squatted on the first raft, four on the second. They stood as 
Undin came into view. 


Eragon helped the dwarves hobble and blindfold Snowfire, then coax 
the reluctant horse onto the second raft, where he was forced to his 
knees and tied down. Meanwhile, Saphira slipped off the pier into the 
lake. Only her head remained above the surface as she paddled through 
the water. 


Undin grasped Eragon’s arm. “Here is where we part. You have my best 
men; they will protect you until you reach Du Weldenvarden.” Eragon 
tried to thank him, but Undin shook his head. “No, it is not a matter for 
gratitude. It is my duty. I am only shamed that your stay was darkened by 
the hatred of Az Sweldn rak Anhtin.” 


Eragon bowed, then boarded the first raft with Orik and Arya. The 
mooring ropes were unknotted, and the dwarves pushed away from 
shore with long poles. As dawn approached, the two rafts drifted toward 
the mouth of the Az Ragni, Saphira swimming between them. 


119 


DIAMONDS IN THE NIGHT 





The Empire has violated my home. 


So thought Roran as he listened to the anguished moans of the men in- 
jured during the previous night’s battle with the Ra’zac and soldiers. Ro- 
ran shuddered with fear and rage until his whole body was consumed 
with feverish chills that left his cheeks burning and his breath short. And 
he was sad, so very sad... as if the Ra’zac’s deeds had destroyed the inno- 
cence of his childhood haunts. 


Leaving the healer, Gertrude, tending to the wounded, Roran contin- 
ued toward Horst’s house, noting the makeshift barriers that filled the 
gaps between buildings: the boards, the barrels, the piles of rocks, and the 
splintered frames of the two wagons destroyed by the Ra’zac’s explosives. 
It all seemed pitifully fragile. 


The few people who moved through Carvahall were glassy-eyed with 
shock, grief, and exhaustion. Roran was tired too, more than he could 
ever remember being. He had not slept since the night before last, and his 
arms and back ached from the fighting. 


He entered Horst’s house and saw Elain standing by the open doorway 
to the dining room, listening to the steady burn of conversation that 
emanated from within. She beckoned him over. 


After they had foiled the Ra’zac’s counterattack, the prominent mem- 
bers of Carvahall had sequestered themselves in an attempt to decide 
what action the village should take and if Horst and his allies should be 
punished for initiating the hostilities. The group had been in deliberation 
most of the morning. 


Roran peeked into the room. Seated around the long table were Birgit, 
Loring, Sloan, Gedric, Delwin, Fisk, Morn, and a number of others. Horst 
presided at the head of the table. 


“.. and I say that it was stupid and reckless!” exclaimed Kiselt, propping 
himself upright on his bony elbows. “You had no cause to endanger—’ 


Morn waved a hand. “We've been over this before. Whether what has 
been done should have been done is beside the point. I happen to agree 
with it—Quimby was my friend as much as anyone’s, and I shudder to 
think what those monsters would do with Roran—but... but what I want 


120 


to know is how we can escape this predicament.” 
“Easy, kill the soldiers,” barked Sloan. 


“And then what? More men will follow until we drown in a sea of 
crimson tunics. Even if we surrender Roran, it'll do no good; you heard 
what the Ra’zac said—they'll kill us if we protect Roran and enslave us if 
we don’t. You may feel differently, but, as for myself, I would rather die 
than spend my life as a slave.” Morn shook his head, his mouth set in a 
flat grim line. “We cannot survive.” 


Fisk leaned forward. “We could leave.” 


“There’s nowhere to go,” retorted Kiselt. “We're backed against the 
Spine, the soldiers have blocked the road, and beyond them is the rest of 
the Empire.” 


‘It’s all your fault,” cried Thane, stabbing a shaking finger at Horst. 
“They will torch our houses and murder our children because of you. 
You!” 


Horst stood so quickly, his chair toppled over backward. “Where is 
your honor, man? Will you let them eat us without fighting back?” 


“Yes, if it means suicide otherwise.” Thane glared around the table, then 
stormed out past Roran. His face was contorted by pure, unadulterated 
fear. 


Gedric spotted Roran then and waved him in. “Come, come, we've 
been waiting for you.” 


Roran clasped his hands in the small of his back as scores of hard eyes 
inspected him. “How can I help?” 


“I think,” said Gedric, “we've all agreed that it would accomplish noth- 
ing to give you to the Empire at this point. Whether we would if that 
wasn't the case is neither here nor there. The only thing we can do is 
prepare for another attack. Horst will make spearheads—and other 
weapons if he has time—and Fisk has agreed to construct shields. Fortu- 
nately, his carpentry shop didn’t burn. And someone needs to oversee our 
defenses. We would like it to be you. You'll have plenty of assistance.” 


Roran nodded. “I'll do my best.” 


Beside Morn, Tara stood, towering over her husband. She was a large 
woman, with gray-streaked black hair and strong hands that were just as 
capable of twisting off a chicken’s head as separating a pair of brawlers. 
She said, “Make sure you do, Roran, else we'll have more funerals.” Then 
she turned to Horst. “Before we go any further, there are men to bury. 
And there are children who should be sent to safety, maybe to Cawley’s 
farm on Nost Creek. You should go as well, Elain.” 


“I won't leave Horst,” said Elain calmly. 


Tara bristled. “This is no place for a woman five months pregnant. 
You'll lose the child running around like you have.” 


“It would do me far more harm to worry in ignorance than remain here. 
I have borne my sons; I will stay, as I know you and every other wife in 


Carvahall will.” 


Horst came around the table and, with a tender expression, took Elain’s 
hand. “Nor would I have you anywhere but at my side. The children 
should go, though. Cawley will care for them well, but we must make 
sure that the route to his farm is clear.” 


“Not only that,” rasped Loring, “none of us, not one blasted man jack 
can have a thing to do with the families down the valley, ’side from Caw- 
ley, of course. They can’t help us, and we don’t want those desecrators to 
trouble ’em.” 


Everyone agreed that he was right, then the meeting ended and the at- 
tendees dispersed throughout Carvahall. Before long, however, they re- 
congregated—along with most of the village—in the small cemetery be- 
hind Gertrude’s house. Ten white-swathed corpses were arranged beside 
their graves, a sprig of hemlock on each of their cold chests and a silver 
amulet around each of their necks. 


Gertrude stood forth and recited the men’s names: “Parr, Wyglif, Ged, 
Bardrick, Farold, Hale, Garner, Kelby, Melkolf, and Albem.” She placed 
black pebbles over their eyes, then raised her arms, lifted her face to the 
sky, and began the quavering death lay. Tears seeped from the corners of 
her closed eyes as her voice rose and fell with the immemorial phrases, 
sighing and moaning with the village’s sorrow. She sang of the earth and 
the night and of humanity’s ageless sorrow from which none escape. 


After the last mournful note faded into silence, family members praised 
the feats and traits of those they had lost. Then the bodies were buried. 


As Roran listened, his gaze lit upon the anonymous mound where the 
three soldiers had been interred. One killed by Nolfavrell, and two by me. 
He could still feel the visceral shock of muscle and bone giving... crunch- 
ing... pulping under his hammer. His bile rose and he had to struggle not 
to be sick in full view of the village. I am the one who destroyed them. Ro- 
ran had never expected or wanted to kill, and yet he had taken more 
lives than anyone else in Carvahall. It felt as if his brow was marked with 


blood. 


He left as soon as possible—not even stopping to speak with Katrina— 
and climbed to a point where he could survey Carvahall and consider 
how best to protect it. Unfortunately, the houses were too far apart to 
form a defensive perimeter by just fortifying the spaces between build- 
ings. Nor did Roran think it would be a good idea to have soldiers fight- 
ing up against the walls of people’s houses and trampling their gardens. 
The Anora River guards our western flank, he thought, but as for the rest of 
Carvahall, we couldn't even keep a child out of it.... What can we build in 
a few hours that will be a strong enough barrier? 


He jogged into the middle of the village and shouted, “I need everyone 
who is free to help cut down trees!” After a minute, men began to trickle 
out of the houses and through the streets. “Come on, more! We all have 
to help!” Roran waited as the group around him continued to grow. 


One of Loring’s sons, Darmmen, shouldered to his side. “What’s your 
plan?” 


Roran raised his voice so they could all hear. “We need a wall around 
Carvahall; the thicker the better. I figure if we get some big trees, lay 
them on their sides, and sharpen the branches, the Ra’zac will have a 
pretty hard time getting over them.” 


“How many trees do you think it'll take?” asked Orval. 


Roran hesitated, trying to gauge Carvahall’s circumference. “At least 
fifty. Maybe sixty to do it properly.” The men swore and began to argue. 
“Wait!” Roran counted the number of people in the crowd. He arrived at 
forty-eight. “If you each fell a tree in the next hour, we'll be almost done. 
Can you do that?” 


“What do you take us for?” retorted Orval. “The last time I took an 
hour on a tree, I was ten!” 


123 


Darmmen spoke up: “What about brambles? We could drape them 
over the trees. I don’t know anyone who can climb through a knot of 
thorny vines.” 


Roran grinned. “That’s a great idea. Also, those of you with sons, have 
them harness your horses so we can drag the trees back.” The men agreed 
and scattered through Carvahall to gather axes and saws for the job. Ro- 
ran stopped Darmmen and said, “Make sure that the trees have branches 
all along the trunk or else they won't work.” 


“Where will you be?” asked Darmmen. 


“Working on another line of defense.” Roran left him then and ran to 
Quimby’s house, where he found Birgit busy boarding up the windows. 


“Yes?” she said, looking at him. 


He quickly explained his plan with the trees. “I want to dig a trench in- 
side the ring of trees, to slow down anyone who gets through. We could 
even put pointed stakes in the bottom of it and—” 


“What is your point, Roran?” 


‘I'd like you to organize every woman and child, and everyone else you 
can, to dig. It’s too much for me to handle by myself, and we don’t have 
long...” Roran looked her straight in the eyes. “Please.” 


Birgit frowned. “Why ask me?” 


“Because, like me, you hate the Ra’zac, and I know you will do every- 
thing possible to stop them.” 


“Aye,” whispered Birgit, then clapped her hands briskly. “Very well, as 
you wish. But I will never forget, Roran Garrowsson, that it was you and 
your family who brought about my husband’s doom.” She strode away 
before Roran could respond. 


He accepted her animosity with equanimity; it was to be expected, 
considering her loss. He was only lucky she had not started a blood feud. 
Then he shook himself and ran to where the main road entered Carva- 
hall. It was the weakest spot in the village and had to be doubly pro- 
tected. The Ra’zac can't be allowed to just blast their way in again. 


Roran recruited Baldor, and together they began excavating a ditch 


124 


across the road. “I'll have to go soon,” warned Baldor between strokes of 
his pickax. “Dad needs me in the forge.” 


Roran grunted an acknowledgment without looking up. As he worked, 
his mind once again filled with memories of the soldiers: how they had 
looked as he struck them, and the feeling, the horrible feeling of smashing 
a body as if it were a rotten stump. He paused, nauseated, and noted the 
commotion throughout Carvahall as people readied themselves for the 
next assault. 


After Baldor left, Roran completed the thigh-deep ditch himself, then 
went to Fisk’s workshop. With the carpenter’s permission, he had five 
logs from the stockpile of seasoned wood pulled by horses back to the 
main road. There Roran tipped the logs on end into the trench so that 
they formed an impenetrable barrier into Carvahall. 


As he tamped down the earth around the logs, Darmmen trotted up. 
“We got the trees. They’re just being put into place now.” Roran accom- 
panied him to Carvahall’s northern edge, where twelve men wrestled 
four lush green pines into alignment while a team of draft horses under 
the whip of a young boy returned to the foothills. “Most of us are helping 
to retrieve the trees. The others got inspired; they seemed determined to 
chop down the rest of the forest when I left.” 


“Good, we can use the extra timber.” 


Darmmen pointed to a pile of dense brambles that sat on the edge of 
Kiselt’s fields. “I cut those along the Anora. Use them however you want. 
I'm going to find more.” 


Roran clapped him on the arm, then turned toward the eastern side of 
Carvahall, where a long, curved line of women, children, and men la- 
bored in the dirt. He went to them and found Birgit issuing orders like a 
general and distributing water among the diggers. The trench was already 
five feet wide and two feet deep. When Birgit paused for breath, he said, 
“I’m impressed.” 


She brushed back a lock of hair without looking at him. “We plowed 
the ground to begin with. It made things easier.” 


“Do you have a shovel I can use?” he asked. Birgit pointed to a mound 
of tools at the other end of the trench. As Roran walked toward it, he 
spied the copper gleam of Katrina’s hair in the midst of the bobbing 
backs. Beside her, Sloan hacked at the soft loam with a furious, obsessive 


125 


energy, as if he were attempting to tear open the earth’s skin, to peel 
back its clay hide and expose the muscle beneath. His eyes were wild, 
and his teeth were bared in a knotted grimace, despite the flecks of dirt 
and filth that spotted his lips. 


Roran shuddered at Sloan’s expression and hurried past, averting his 
face so as to avoid meeting his bloodshot gaze. He grabbed a shovel and 
immediately plunged it into the soil, doing his best to forget his worries 
in the heat of physical exertion. 


The day progressed in a continuous rush of activity, without breaks for 
meals or rest. The trench grew longer and deeper, until it cupped two- 
thirds of the village and reached the banks of the Anora River. All the 
loose dirt was piled on the inside edge of the trench in an attempt to 
prevent anyone from jumping over it... and to make it difficult to climb 
out. 


The wall of trees was finished in early afternoon. Roran stopped digging 
then to help sharpen the innumerable branches—which were overlapped 
and interlocked as much as possible—and affix the nets of brambles. Oc- 
casionally, they had to pull out a tree so farmers like Ivor could drive 
their livestock into the safety of Carvahall. 


By evening the fortifications were stronger and more extensive than 
Roran had dared hope, though they still required several more hours of 
work to complete to his satisfaction. 


He sat on the ground, gnawing a hunk of sourdough bread and staring 
at the stars through a haze of exhaustion. A hand dropped on his shoul- 
der, and he looked up to see Albriech. “Here.” Albriech extended a rough 
shield—made of sawed boards pegged together—and a six-foot-long 
spear. Roran accepted them gratefully, then Albriech proceeded onward, 
distributing spears and shields to whomever he encountered. 


Roran dragged himself upright, got his hammer from Horst’s house, and 
thus armed, went to the entrance to the main road, where Baldor and 
two others kept watch. “Wake me when you need to rest,” Roran said, 
then lay on the soft grass underneath the eaves of a nearby house. He ar- 
ranged his weapons so he could find them in the dark and closed his eyes 
in eager anticipation. 


“Roran.” 


126 


The whisper came from by his right ear. “Katrina?” He struggled into a 
sitting position, blinking as she unshuttered a lantern so a key of light 
struck his thigh. “What are you doing here?” 


“I wanted to see you.” Her eyes, large and mysterious against her pale 
face, pooled with the night’s shadows. She took his arm and led him to a 
deserted porch far out of earshot of Baldor and the other guards. There 
she placed her hands on his cheeks and softly kissed him, but he was too 
tired and troubled to respond to her affection. She drew away and stud- 
ied him. “What is wrong, Roran?” 


A bark of humorless laughter escaped him. “What’s wrong? The world 
is wrong; it’s as askew as a picture frame knocked on its side.” He 
jammed his fist against his gut. “And I am wrong. Every time I allow my- 
self to relax, I see the soldiers bleeding under my hammer. Men I killed, 
Katrina. And their eyes... their eyes 1 They knew they were about to die 
and that they could nothing do about it.” He trembled in the darkness. 
“They knew... I knew... and I still had to do it. It couldn’t—’ Words failed 
him as he felt hot tears roll down his cheeks. 


Katrina cradled his head as Roran cried from the shock of the past few 
days. He wept for Garrow and Eragon; he wept for Parr, Quimby, and 
the other dead; he wept for himself; and he wept for the fate of Carva- 
hall. He sobbed until his emotions ebbed and left him as dry and hollow 
as an old barley husk. 


Forcing himself to take a long breath, Roran looked at Katrina and no- 
ticed her own tears. He brushed them away with his thumb, like dia- 
monds in the night. “Katrina... my love.” He said it again, tasting the 
words: “My love. I have naught to give you but my love. Still... I must ask. 
Will you marry me?” 


In the dim lantern light, he saw pure joy and wonder leap across her 
face. Then she hesitated and troubled doubt appeared. It was wrong for 
him to ask, or for her to accept, without Sloan’s permission. But Roran no 
longer cared; he had to know now if he and Katrina would spend their 
lives together. 


Then, softly: “Yes, Roran, I will.” 


127 


UNDER A DARKLING SKY 





That night it rained. 


Layer upon layer of pregnant clouds blanketed Palancar Valley, clinging 
to the mountains with tenacious arms and filling the air with heavy, cold 
mist. From inside, Roran watched as cords of gray water pelted the trees 
with their frothing leaves, muddied the trench around Carvahall, and 
scrabbled with blunt fingers against the thatched roofs and eaves as the 
clouds disgorged their load. Everything was streaked, blurred, and hidden 
behind the torrent’s inexorable streamers. 


By midmorning the storm had abated, although a continuous drizzle 
still percolated through the mist. It quickly soaked Roran’s hair and 
clothes when he took his watch at the barricade to the main road. He 
squatted by the upright logs, shook his cloak, then pulled the hood far- 
ther over his face and tried to ignore the cold. 


Despite the weather, Roran soared and exulted with his joy at Katrina’s 
acceptance. They were engaged! In his mind, it was as if a missing piece 
of the world had dropped into place, as if he had been granted the confi- 
dence of an invulnerable warrior. What did the soldiers matter, or the 
Ra’zac, or the Empire itself, before love such as theirs? They were noth- 
ing but tinder to the blaze. 


For all his new bliss, however, his mind was entirely focused on what 
had become the most important conundrum of his existence: how to as- 
sure that Katrina would survive Galbatorix’s wrath. He had thought of 
nothing else since waking. The best thing would be for Katrina to go to 
Cawley’s, he decided, staring down the hazy road, but she would never 
agree to leave... unless Sloan told her to. I might be able to convince him; 
I’m sure he wants her out of danger as much as I do. 


As he considered ways to approach the butcher, the clouds thickened 
again and the rain renewed its assault on the village, arching down in 
stinging waves. Around Roran, the puddles jumped to life as pellets of 
water drummed their surfaces, bouncing back up like startled grasshop- 
pers. 


When Roran grew hungry, he passed his watch to Larne—Loring’s 
youngest son—and went to find lunch, darting from the shelter of one 
eave to another. As he rounded a corner, he was surprised to see Albriech 
on the house’s porch, arguing violently with a group of men. 


128 


Ridley shouted, “... you’re blind—follow the cottonwoods and they'll 
never see! You took the addle-brain’s route.” 


“Try it if you want,” retorted Albriech. 
“T will!” 


“Then you can tell me how you like the taste of arrows.” 


) 


“Maybe,” said Thane, “we aren’t as clubfooted as you are.’ 


Albriech turned on him with a snarl. “Your words are as thick as your 
wits. I’m not stupid enough to risk my family on the cover of a few 
leaves that I’ve never seen before.” Thane’s eyes bulged and his face 
turned a deep mottled crimson. “What?” taunted Albriech. “Have you no 
tongue?” 


Thane roared and struck Albriech on the cheek with his fist. Albriech 
laughed. “Your arm is as weak as a woman’s.” Then he grabbed Thane’s 
shoulder and threw him off the porch and into the mud, where he lay on 
his side, stunned. 


Holding his spear like a staff, Roran jumped beside Albriech, prevent- 
ing Ridley and the others from laying hands on him. “No more,” growled 
Roran, furious. “We have other enemies. An assembly can be called and 
arbitrators will decide whether compensation is due to either Albriech or 
Thane. But until then, we can’t fight ourselves.” 


“Easy for you to say,” spat Ridley. “You have no wife or children.” Then 
he helped Thane to his feet and departed with the group of men. 


Roran stared hard at Albriech and the purple bruise that was spreading 
beneath his right eye. “What started it?” he asked. 


“‘I—’ Albriech stopped with a grimace and felt his jaw. “I went scouting 
with Darmmen. The Ra’zac have posted soldiers on several hills. They 
can see across the Anora and up and down the valley. One or two of us 
might, might, be able to creep past them without notice, but we'll never 
get the children to Cawley without killing the soldiers, and then we 
might as well tell the Ra’zac where we're going.” 


Dread clutched at Roran, flooding like poison through his heart and 
veins. What can I do? Sick with a sense of impending doom, he put an 


129 


arm around Albriech’s shoulders. “Come on; Gertrude should have a look 
at you.” 


“No,” said Albriech, shrugging him off. “She has more pressing cases 
than me.” He took a preparatory breath—as if he were about to dive into 
a lake—and lumbered off through the downpour in the direction of the 
forge. 


Roran watched him go, then shook his head and went inside. He found 
Elain sitting on the floor with a row of children, sharpening a pile of 
spearheads with files and whetstones. Roran gestured to Elain. Once they 
were in another room, he told her what had just occurred. 


Elain swore harshly—startling him, for he had never heard her use such 
language—then asked, “Is there cause for Thane to declare a feud?” 


“Possibly,” admitted Roran. “They both insulted each other, but Al- 
briech’s oaths were the strongest.... However, Thane did strike first. You 
could declare a feud yourself.” 


“Nonsense,” asserted Elain, wrapping a shawl around her shoulders. 
“This is a dispute for arbitrators to resolve. If we must pay a fine, so be it, 
as long as bloodshed is avoided.” She headed out the front door, a finished 
spear in hand. 


Troubled, Roran located bread and meat in the kitchen, then helped 
the children sharpen spearheads. Once Felda, one of the mothers, arrived, 
Roran left the children in her care and slogged back through Carvahall to 
the main road. 


As he squatted in the mud, a shaft of sunlight burst underneath the 
clouds and illuminated the folds of rain so each drop flashed with crystal- 
line fire. Roran stared, awestruck, ignoring the water streaming down his 
face. The rift in the clouds widened until a shelf of massive thunderheads 
hung over the western three-quarters of Palancar Valley, facing a strip of 
pure blue sky. Because of the billowy roof above and the angle of the 
sun, the rain-drenched landscape was lit brilliantly on one side and 
painted with rich shadows on the other, giving the fields, bushes, trees, 
river, and mountains the most extraordinary colors. It was as if the entire 
world had been transformed into a sculpture of burnished metal. 


Just then, movement caught Roran’s eye, and he looked down to see a 


soldier standing on the road, his mail shining like ice. The man gaped 
with amazement at Carvahall’s new fortifications, then turned and fled 


130 


back into the golden mist. 


“Soldiers!” shouted Roran, jolting to his feet. He wished that he had his 
bow, but he had left it inside to protect it from the elements. His only 
comfort was that the soldiers would have an even harder time keeping 
their weapons dry. 


Men and women ran from their houses, gathered along the trench, and 
peered out through the wall of overlapping pines. The long branches 
wept beads of moisture, translucent cabochons that reflected the rows of 
anxious eyes. 


Roran found himself standing beside Sloan. The butcher held one of 
Fisk’s makeshift shields in his left hand, and in his right a cleaver curved 
like a half-moon. His belt was festooned with at least a dozen knives, all 
of them large and honed to a razor edge. He and Roran exchanged brisk 
nods, then refocused on where the soldier had disappeared. 


Less than a minute later, the disembodied voice of a Ra’zac slithered 
out of the mist: “By continuing to defend Carvahall, you proclaim your 
choice and ssseal your doom. You ssshall die!” 


Loring responded: “Show your maggot-riddled faces if you dare, you 
lily-livered, bandy-legged, snake-eyed wretches | We'll crack your skulls 
open and fatten our hogs on your blood!” 


A dark shape floated toward them, followed by the dull thump of a 
spear embedding itself in a door an inch from Gedric’s left arm. 


“Take cover!” shouted Horst from the middle of the line. Roran knelt 
behind his shield and peered through a hairline gap between two of the 
boards. He was just in time, for a half-dozen spears hurtled over the wall 
of trees and buried themselves among the cowering villagers. 


From somewhere in the mist came an agonized scream. 


Roran’s heart jumped with a painful flutter. He panted for breath, 
though he had not moved, and his hands were slick with sweat. He heard 
the faint sound of shattering glass on the northern edge of Carvahall... 
then the bellow of an explosion and crashing timbers. 


Spinning around, he and Sloan sped through Carvahall, where they 


found a team of six soldiers dragging away the splintered remains of sev- 
eral trees. Beyond them, pale and wraithlike in the glittering shards of 


131 


rain, sat the Ra’zac on their black horses. Without slowing, Roran fell 
upon the first man, jabbing his spear. His first and second stabs were de- 
flected by an upraised arm, then Roran caught the soldier on the hip, and 
when he stumbled, in his throat. 


Sloan howled like an enraged beast, threw his cleaver, and split one of 
the men’s helms, crushing his skull. Two soldiers charged him with 
drawn swords. Sloan sidestepped, laughing now, and blocked their attacks 
with his shield. One soldier swung so hard, his blade stuck in the shield’s 
rim. Sloan yanked him closer and gored him through the eye with a carv- 
ing knife from his belt. Drawing a second cleaver, the butcher circled his 
other opponent with a maniacal grin. “Shall I gut and hamstring you?” he 
demanded, almost prancing with a terrible, bloody glee. 


Roran lost his spear to the next two men he faced. He barely managed 
to drag out his hammer in time to stop a sword from shearing off his leg. 
The soldier who had torn the spear from Roran’s grip now cast the 
weapon at him, aiming for his breast. Roran dropped his hammer, caught 
the shaft in midair—which astounded him as much as the soldiers—spun 
it around, and drove the spear through the armor and ribs of the man 
who had launched it. Left weaponless, Roran was forced to retreat before 
the remaining soldier. He stumbled over a corpse, cutting his calf on a 
sword as he fell, and rolled to avoid a two-handed blow from the soldier, 
scrabbling frantically in the ankle-deep mud for something, anything he 
could use for a weapon. A hilt bruised his fingers, and he ripped it from 
the muck and slashed at the soldier’s sword hand, severing his thumb. 


The man stared dumbly at the glistening stump, then said, “This is what 
comes from not shielding myself.” 


“Aye,” agreed Roran, and beheaded him. 


The last soldier panicked and fled toward the impassive specters of the 
Ra’zac while Sloan bombarded him with a stream of insults and foul 
names. When the soldier finally pierced the shining curtain of rain, Roran 
watched with a thrill of horror as the two black figures bent down from 
their steeds on either side of the man and gripped the nape of his neck 
with twisted hands. The cruel fingers tightened, and the man shrieked 
desperately and convulsed, then went limp. The Ra’zac placed the corpse 
behind one of their saddles before turning their horses and riding away. 


Roran shuddered and looked at Sloan, who was cleaning his blades. 


“You fought well.” He had never suspected that the butcher contained 
such ferocity. 


132 


Sloan said in a low voice, “They'll never get Katrina. Never, even if I 
must skin the lot of them, or fight a thousand Urgals and the king to 
boot. I'd tear the sky itself down and let the Empire drown in its own 
blood before she suffers so much as a scratch.” He clamped his mouth 
shut then, jammed the last of his knives into his belt, and began dragging 
the three broken trees back into position. 


While he did, Roran rolled the dead soldiers through the trampled 
mud, away from the fortifications. Now I have killed five. At the comple- 
tion of his labor, he straightened and glanced around, puzzled, for all he 
heard was silence and the hissing rain. Why has no one come to help us? 


Wondering what else might have occurred, he returned with Sloan to 
the scene of the first attack. Two soldiers hung lifelessly on the slick 
branches of the tree wall, but that was not what held their attention. 
Horst and the other villagers knelt in a circle around a small body. Roran 
caught his breath. It was Elmund, son of Delwin. The ten-year-old boy 
had been struck in his side by a spear. His parents sat in the mud beside 
him, their faces as blank as stone. 


Something has to be done, thought Roran, dropping to his knees and 
leaning against his spear. Few children survived their first five or six years. 
But to lose your firstborn son now, when everything indicated that he 
should grow tall and strong to take his father’s place in Carvahall—it was 
enough to crush you. Katrina... the children... they all have to be protected. 


But where?... Where?... Where?... Where! 


133 


DOWN THE RUSHING MERE-W ASH 





On the first day from Tarnag, Eragon made an effort to learn the names 
of Undin’s guards. They were Ama, Trihga, Hedin, Ekksvar, Shrrgnien— 
which Eragon found unpronounceable, though he was told it meant 
Wolfheart—Diathmér, and Thorv. 


Each raft had a small cabin in the center. Eragon preferred to spend his 
time seated on the edge of the logs, watching the Beor Mountains scroll 
by. Kingfishers and jackdaws flitted along the clear river, while blue her- 
ons stood stiltlike on the marshy bank, which was planked with splotches 
of light that fell through the boughs of hazel, beech, and willow. Occa- 
sionally, a bullfrog would croak from a bed of ferns. 


When Orik settled beside him, Eragon said, “It’s beautiful.” 
“That it is.” The dwarf quietly lit his pipe, then leaned back and puffed. 


Eragon listened to the creak of wood and rope as Trihga steered the raft 
with the long paddle at the aft. “Orik, can you tell me why Brom joined 
the Varden? I know so little about him. For most of my life, he was just 
the town storyteller.” 


“He never joined the Varden; he helped found it.” Orik paused to tap 
some ashes into the water. “After Galbatorix became king, Brom was the 
only Rider still alive, outside of the Forsworn.” 


“But he wasn’t a Rider, not then. His dragon was killed in the fighting at 
Doru Araeba.” 


“Well, a Rider by training. Brom was the first to organize the friends 
and allies of the Riders who had been forced into exile. It was he who 
convinced Hrothgar to allow the Varden to live in Farthen Dar, and he 
who obtained the elves’ assistance.” 


They were silent for a while. “Why did Brom relinquish the leader- 
ship?” asked Eragon. 


Orik smiled wryly. “Perhaps he never wanted it. It was before Hrothgar 
adopted me, so I saw little of Brom in Tronjheim.... He was always off 
fighting the Forsworn or engaged in one plot or another.” 


“Your parents are dead?” 


134 


“Aye. The pox took them when I was young, and Hrothgar was kind 
enough to welcome me into his hall and, since he has no children of his 
own, to make me his heir.” 


Eragon thought of his helm, marked with the Ingeitum symbol. Hroth- 
gar has been kind to me as well. 


When the afternoon twilight arrived, the dwarves hung a round lantern 
at each corner of the rafts. The lanterns were red, which Eragon remem- 
bered was to preserve night vision. He stood by Arya and studied the lan- 
terns’ pure, motionless depths. “Do you know how these are made?” he 


asked. 


“It was a spell we gave the dwarves long ago. They use it with great 


skill.” 


Eragon reached up and scratched his chin and cheeks, feeling the 
patches of stubble that had begun to appear. “Could you teach me more 
magic while we travel?” 


She looked at him, her balance perfect on the undulating logs. “It is not 
my place. A teacher is waiting for you.” 


“Then tell me this, at least,” he said. “What does the name of my sword 
mean?” 


Arya’s voice was very soft. “Misery is your sword. And so it was until 
you wielded it.” 


Eragon stared with aversion at Zar’roc. The more he learned about his 
weapon, the more malevolent it seemed, as if the blade could cause mis- 
fortune of its own free will. Not only did Morzan kill Riders with it, but 
Zar'roc’s very name is evil. If Brom had not given it to him, and if not for 
the fact that Zar’roc never dulled and could not be broken, Eragon would 
have thrown it into the river at that very moment. 


Before it grew any darker, Eragon swam out to Saphira. They flew to- 
gether for the first time since leaving Tronjheim and soared high above 
the Az Ragni, where the air was thin and the water below was only a 
purple streak. 


Without the saddle, Eragon gripped Saphira tightly with his knees, feel- 
ing her hard scales rub the scars from their first flight. 


135 


As Saphira tilted to the left, rising on an updraft, he saw three brown 
specks launch themselves from the mountainside below and ascend rap- 
idly. At first Eragon took them to be falcons, but as they neared, he real- 
ized that the animals were almost twenty feet long, with attenuated tails 
and leathery wings. In fact, they looked like dragons, though their bodies 
were smaller, thinner, and more serpentine than Saphira’s. Nor did their 
scales glitter, but were dappled green and brown. 


Excited, Eragon pointed them out to Saphira. Could they be dragons? he 
asked. 


I don’t know. She floated in place, inspecting the newcomers as they 
spiraled around them. The creatures seemed puzzled by Saphira. They 
darted toward her, only to hiss and swoop overhead at the last moment. 


Eragon grinned and reached out with his mind, trying to touch their 
thoughts. As he did, the three recoiled and shrieked, opening their maws 
like hungry snakes. Their piercing keen was mental as well as physical. It 
tore through Eragon with a savage strength, seeking to incapacitate him. 
Saphira felt it too. Continuing the racking cry, the creatures attacked 
with razor claws. 


Hold on, warned Saphira. She folded her left wing and spun halfway 
around, avoiding two of the animals, then flapped quickly, rising above 
the other. At the same time, Eragon worked furiously to block the shriek. 
The instant his mind was clear, he reached for the magic. Don’t kill them, 
said Saphira. I want the experience. 


Though the creatures were more agile than Saphira, she had the advan- 
tage of bulk and strength. One of the creatures dove at her. She flipped 
upside down—falling backward—and kicked the animal in the chest. 


The shriek dropped in intensity as her injured foe retreated. 


Saphira flared her wings, looping right side up so she faced the other 
two as they converged on her. She arched her neck, Eragon heard a deep 
rumble between her ribs, and then a jet of flame roared from her jaws. A 
molten-blue halo engulfed Saphira’s head, flashing through her gemlike 
scales until she sparkled gloriously and seemed to be lit from within. 


The two dragon-beasts squawked in dismay and veered to either side. 


The mental assault ceased as they sped away, sinking back toward the 
mountainside. 


136 


You almost threw me off, said Eragon, loosening his cramped arms from 
around her neck. 


She looked at him smugly. Almost, but not quite. 
That’s true, he laughed. 


Flushed with the thrill of victory, they returned to the rafts. As Saphira 
landed amid two great fins of water, Orik shouted, “Are you hurt?” 


“No,” called Eragon. The icy water whirled around his legs as Saphira 
swam to the side of the raft. “Were they another race unique to the 
Beors?” 


Orik pulled him onto the raft. “We call them Fanghur. They’re not as 


intelligent as dragons and they can’t breathe fire, but they are still formi- 
dable foes.” 


“So we discovered.” Eragon massaged his temples in an attempt to alle- 
viate the headache the Fanghur’s attack had brought on. “Saphira was 
more than a match for them, however.” 


Of course, she said. 


“It’s how they hunt,” explained Orik. “They use their minds to immobi- 
lize their prey while they kill it.” 


Saphira flicked water at Eragon with her tail. It’s a good idea. Maybe I'll 
try it next time I go hunting. 


He nodded. It could come in handy in a fight too. 


Arya came to the edge of the raft. “I’m glad you did not kill them. 
Fanghur are rare enough that those three would have been sorely missed.” 


“They still manage to eat enough of our herds,” growled Thorv from in- 
side the cabin. The dwarf marched out to Eragon, champing irritably un- 
der the twisted knots of his beard. “Do not fly anymore while in these 
Beor Mountains, Shadeslayer. It is difficult enough to keep you unharmed 
without you and thine dragon fighting wind-vipers.” 


“We'll stay on the ground until we reach the plains,” promised Eragon. 


137 


“Good.” 


When they stopped for the night, the dwarves moored the rafts to as- 
pen trees along the mouth of a small stream. Ama started a fire while Er- 
agon helped Ekksvar pull Snowfire onto land. They picketed the stallion 
on a strip of grass. 


Thorv oversaw the erection of six large tents. Hedin gathered firewood 
to last until morning, and Dathmér carried supplies off the second raft 
and began making dinner. Arya took up watch on the edge of camp, 
where she was soon joined by Ekksvar, Ama, and Trihga when they fin- 
ished their tasks. 


When Eragon realized he had nothing to do, he squatted by the fire 
with Orik and Shrrgnien. As Shrrgnien pulled off his gloves and held his 
scarred hands over the flames, Eragon noticed that a polished steel stud— 
perhaps a quarter of an inch long—protruded from each of the dwarf’s 
knuckles, except for on his thumbs. 


“What are those?” he asked. 


Shrrgnien looked at Orik and laughed. “These are mine Asctidgamln... 
mine ‘fists of steel.’ ” Without standing, he twisted and punched the bole 
of an aspen, leaving four symmetrical holes in the bark. Shrrgnien laughed 
again. “They are good for hitting things, eh?” 


Eragon’s curiosity and envy were aroused. “How are they made? I mean, 
how are the spikes attached to your hands?” 


Shrrgnien hesitated, trying to find the right words. “A healer puts you 
in a deep sleep, so you feel no pain. Then a hole is—is drilled, yes?—is 
drilled down through the joints...” He broke off and spoke quickly to 
Orik in the dwarf language. 


“A metal socket is embedded in each hole,” explained Orik. “Magic is 
used to seal it in place, and when the warrior has fully recovered, various- 
sized spikes can be threaded into the sockets.” 


“Yes, see,” said Shrrgnien, grinning. He gripped the stud above his left 
index finger, carefully twisted it free of his knuckle, and then handed it 


to Eragon. 


Eragon smiled as he rolled the sharp lump around his palm. “I wouldn't 
mind having ‘fists of steel’ myself.” He returned the stud to Shrrgnien. 


138 


‘It’s a dangerous operation,” warned Orik. “Few knurlan get 
Asctidgamln because you can easily lose the use of your hands if the drill 
goes too deep.” He raised his fist and showed it to Eragon. “Our bones are 
thicker than yours. It might not work for a human.” 


‘Tl remember that.” Still, Eragon could not help but imagine what it 
would be like to fight with Asctidgamln, to be able to strike anything he 
wanted with impunity, including armored Urgals. He loved the idea. 


After eating, Eragon retired to his tent. The fire provided enough light 
that he could see the silhouette of Saphira nestled alongside the tent, like 
a figure cut from black paper and pasted against the canvas wall. 


Eragon sat with the blankets pulled over his legs and stared at his lap, 
drowsy but unwilling to sleep quite yet. Unbidden, his mind turned to 
thoughts of home. He wondered how Roran, Horst, and everyone else 
from Carvahall was doing, and if the weather in Palancar Valley was 
warm enough for the farmers to start planting their crops. Longing and 
sadness suddenly gripped Eragon. 


He removed a wood bowl from his pack and, taking his waterskin, 
filled it to the brim with liquid. Then he focused on an image of Roran 
and whispered, “Draumr k6pa.” 


As always, the water went black before brightening to reveal the object 
being scryed. Eragon saw Roran sitting alone in a candlelit bedroom he 
recognized from Horst’s house. Roran must have given up his job in Ther- 
insford, realized Eragon. His cousin leaned on his knees and clasped his 
hands, staring at the far wall with an expression that Eragon knew meant 
Roran was grappling with some difficult problem. Still, Roran seemed 
well enough, if a bit drawn, which comforted Eragon. After a minute, he 
released the magic, ending the spell and clearing the surface of the water. 


Reassured, Eragon emptied the bowl, then lay down, pulling the blan- 
kets up to his chin. He closed his eyes and sank into the warm dusk that 
separates consciousness and sleep, where reality bends and sways to the 
wind of thought, and where creativity blossoms in its freedom from 
boundaries and all things are possible. 


Slumber soon took him. Most of his rest was uneventful, but right be- 
fore he woke, the usual night phantasms were replaced with a vision as 


139 


clear and vibrant as any waking experience. 


He saw a tortured sky, black and crimson with smoke. Crows and eagles 
swirled high above flights of arrows that arched from one side to another of 
a great battle. A man sprawled in the clotted mud with a dented helm and 
bloody mail—his face concealed behind an upthrown arm. 


An armored hand entered Eragon’s view. The gauntlet was so near it blot- 
ted out half the world with polished steel. Like an inexorable machine, the 
thumb and last three fingers curled into a fist, leaving the trunk of the index 
finger to point at the downed man with all the authority of fate itself. 


The vision still filled Eragon’s mind when he crawled out of the tent. 
He found Saphira some distance from the camp, gnawing on a furry 
lump. When he told her what he had seen, she paused in midbite, then 
jerked her neck and swallowed a strip of meat. 


The last time this occurred, she said, it proved to be a true prediction of 
events elsewhere. Do you think a battle is in progress in Alagaésia? 


He kicked a loose branch. I’m not sure.... Brom said you could only scry 
people, places, and things that you had already seen. Yet I've never seen 
this place. Nor had I seen Arya when I first dreamt about her in Teirm. 

Perhaps Togira Ikonoka will be able to explain it. 

As they prepared to leave, the dwarves seemed much more relaxed 
now that they were a good distance from Tarnag. When they started pol- 
ing down the Az Ragni, Ekksvar—who was steering Snowfire’s raft— 
began chanting in his rough bass: 

Down the rushing mere-wash 

Of Kilf's welling blood, 


We ride the twisting timbers, 


For hearth, clan, and honor. 


Under the ernes’ sky-vat, 


140 


Through the ice-wolves’ forest bowls, 
We ride the gory wood, 


For iron, gold, and diamond. 


Let hand-ringer and bearded gaper fill my grip 
And battle-leaf guard my stone 
As I leave the halls of my fathers 


For the empty land beyond. 


The other dwarves joined Ekksvar, slipping into Dwarvish as they con- 
tinued on to other verses. The low throb of their voices accompanied Er- 
agon as he carefully made his way to the head of the raft, where Arya sat 
cross-legged. 


“I had a... vision during my sleep,” said Eragon. Arya looked at him with 
interest, and he recounted the images he had seen. “If it’s scrying, then—” 


“It’s not scrying,” said Arya. She spoke with deliberate slowness, as if to 
prevent any misunderstanding. “I thought for a long time about how you 
saw me imprisoned in Gilead, and I believe that as I lay unconscious, my 
spirit was searching for help, wherever I might find it.” 


“But why me?” 


Arya nodded toward where Saphira undulated through the water. “I 
grew accustomed to Saphira’s presence during the fifteen years I guarded 
her egg. I was reaching out for anything that felt familiar when I touched 
your dreams.” 


“Are you really strong enough to contact someone in Teirm from 
Gil’ead? Especially if you were drugged.” 


A ghost of a smile touched Arya’s lips. “I could stand on the very gates 
of Vroengard and still speak with you as clearly as I am now.” She 
paused. “If you did not scry me in Teirm, then you could not have scryed 
this new dream. It must be a premonition. They have been known to oc- 


141 


cur throughout the sentient races, but especially among magic users.” 


Eragon clutched the netting around a bundle of supplies as the raft 
lurched. “If what I saw will come to pass, then how can we change any- 
thing that happens? Do our choices matter? What if I threw myself off 
the raft right now and drowned?” 


“But you won't.” Arya dipped her left forefinger in the river and stared 
at the single drop that clung to her skin, like a quivering lens. “Once, long 
ago, the elf Maerzadi had a premonition that he would accidentally kill 
his son in battle. Rather than live to see it happen, he committed suicide, 
saving his son, and at the same time proving that the future isn’t set. 
Short of killing yourself, however, you can do little to change your des- 
tiny, since you don't know what choices will lead you to the particular 
point of time that you saw.” She flipped her hand and the drop splattered 
against the log between them. “We know that it’s possible to retrieve in- 
formation from the future—fortunetellers can often sense the paths a 
person's life may take—but we've been unable to refine the process to 
the point where you can choose what, where, or when you want to see.” 


Eragon found the entire concept of funneling knowledge through time 
profoundly disturbing. It raised too many questions about the nature of 
reality. Whether fate and destiny really exist, the only thing I can do is en- 
joy the present and live as honorably as possible. Yet he could not help 
asking, “What's to stop me, though, from scrying one of my memories? 
I've seen everything in them... so I should be able to view them with 
magic. 


Arya’s gaze darted to meet his. “If you value your life, never attempt it. 
Many years ago, several of our spellweavers devoted themselves to de- 
feating time’s enigmas. When they tried to summon up the past, they 
only succeeded in creating a blurred image on their mirror before the 
spell consumed their energy and killed them. We made no more experi- 
ments on the subject. It is argued that the spell would work if more ma- 
gicians participated, but no one is willing to accept the risk and the the- 
ory remains unproven. Even if one could scry the past, it would be of 
limited use. And to scry the future, one would have to know exactly 
what was going to happen and where and when, which defeats the pur- 
pose. 


“It’s a mystery, then, how people can have premonitions while sleeping, 
how they can do something unconsciously that has defeated our greatest 
sages. Premonitions may be linked to the very nature and fabric of 
magic... or they may function in a similar way to the dragons’ ancestral 


142 


memories. We don’t know. Many avenues of magic have yet to be ex- 
plored.” She stood in a single fluid movement. “Take care not to lose 
yourself among them.” 


143 


DRIFTING 





The valley widened throughout the morning as the rafts swept toward 
a bright gap between two mountains. They reached the opening at mid- 
day and found themselves looking out of shadow upon a sunny prairie 
that faded into the north. 


Then the current pushed them beyond the frosted crags and the walls 
of the world dropped away to reveal a gigantic sky and flat horizon. Al- 
most immediately, the air grew warmer. The Az Ragni curved to the 
east, edging the foothills of the mountain range on one side and the plains 
on the other. 


The amount of open space seemed to unsettle the dwarves. They mut- 
tered among themselves and glanced longingly at the cavernous rift be- 


hind them. 


Eragon found the sunlight invigorating. It was hard to ever really feel 
awake when three-quarters of the day was spent in twilight. Behind his 
raft, Saphira launched herself out of the water and flew up over the prai- 
rie until she dwindled to a winking speck in the azure dome above. 


What do you see? he asked. 


I see vast herds of gazelles to the north and east. To the west, the Hadarac 
Desert. That is all. 


No one else? No Urgals, slavers, or nomads? 


We are alone. 


That evening, Thorv chose a small cove for their camp. While Dtth- 
mér fixed dinner, Eragon cleared a space beside his tent, then drew 
Zar roc and settled into the ready stance Brom had taught him when they 
first sparred. Eragon knew he was at a disadvantage compared to the 
elves, and he had no intention of arriving in Ellesméra out of practice. 


With excruciating slowness, he looped Zarroc over his head and 
brought it back down with both hands, as if to cleave an enemy’s helm. 
He held the pose for a second. Keeping his motion under complete con- 
trol, he pivoted to the right—twisting Zar’roc’s point to parry an imagi- 


144 


nary blow—then stopped with rigid arms. 


Out of the corner of his eye, Eragon noticed Orik, Arya, and Thorv 
watching. He ignored them and focused only on the ruby blade in his 
hands; he held it as if it were a snake that could writhe out of his grip and 
bite his arm. 


Turning again, he commenced a series of forms, flowing from one to 
another with disciplined ease as he gradually increased his speed. In his 
mind, he was no longer in the shadowy cove, but surrounded by a knot 
of ferocious Urgals and Kull. He ducked and slashed, parried, riposted, 
jumped to the side, and stabbed in a whirl of activity. He fought with 
mindless energy, as he had in Farthen Dar, with no thought for the safety 
of his own flesh, dashing and tearing aside his imagined enemies. 


He spun Zar’roc around—in an attempt to flip the hilt from one palm 
to another—then dropped the sword as a jagged line of pain bisected his 
back. He staggered and fell. Above him, he could hear Arya and the 
dwarves babbling, but all he saw was a constellation of sparkling red 
haze, like a bloody veil dropped over the world. No sensation existed 
other than pain. It blotted out thought and reason, leaving only a feral 
animal that screamed for release. 


When Eragon recovered enough to notice his whereabouts, he found 
that he had been placed inside his tent and wrapped tightly with blan- 
kets. Arya sat beside him, while Saphira’s head stuck through the en- 
trance flaps. 


Was I out long? asked Eragon. 


A while. You slept a little at the end. I tried to draw you from your body 
into mine and shield you from the pain, but I could do little with you un- 
CONSCIOUS. 


Eragon nodded and closed his eyes. His entire body throbbed. Taking a 
deep breath, he looked up at Arya and quietly asked, “How can I train?... 
How can I fight, or use magic?... 1 am a broken vessel.” His face felt heavy 
with age as he spoke. 


She answered just as softly: “You can sit and watch. You can listen. You 
can read. And you can learn.” 


145 


Despite her words, he heard a hitch of uncertainty, even fear, in her 
voice. He rolled onto his side to avoid meeting her eyes. It shamed him to 
appear so helpless before her. “How did the Shade do this to me?” 


“I have no answers, Eragon. I am neither the wisest nor the strongest elf. 
We all do our best, and you cannot be blamed for it. Perhaps time will 
heal your wound.” Arya pressed her fingers to his brow and murmured, 
“Sé mor’ranr ono finna,” then left the tent. 


Eragon sat and winced as his cramped back muscles stretched. He 
stared at his hands without seeing them. I wonder if Murtagh’s scar ever 
pained him like mine does. 


I don’t know, said Saphira. 
A dead silence followed. Then: I’m afraid. 
Why? 


Because...He hesitated. Because nothing I do will prevent another attack. 
I don’t know when or where it will happen, but I do know that it’s inevita- 
ble. So I wait, and every moment I fear that if I lift something too heavy or 
stretch in the wrong way, the pain will return. My own body has become the 
enemy. 


Saphira hummed deep in her throat. I have no answers either. Life is 
both pain and pleasure. If this is the price you must pay for the hours you 
enjoy, is it too much? 


Yes, he snapped. He pulled off the blankets and shoved past her, stum- 
bling into the center of the camp, where Arya and the dwarves sat 


around a fire. “Is there food left?” asked Eragon. 


Dathmér wordlessly filled a bowl and handed it to him. With a defer- 
ential expression, Thorv asked, “Are you better now, Shadeslayer?” He 
and the other dwarves seemed awed by what they had seen. 

“T’m fine.” 

“You bear a heavy burden, Shadeslayer.” 

Eragon scowled and abruptly walked to the edge of the tents, where he 


seated himself in darkness. He could sense Saphira nearby, but she left 
him in peace. He swore under his breath and jabbed Dtthmér’s stew 


146 


with dull anger. 


Just as he took a bite, Orik said from beside him, “You should not treat 
them so.” 


Eragon glared at Orik’s shadowed face. “What?” 


“Thorv and his men were sent to protect you and Saphira. They will die 
for you if need be, and trust their sacred burial to you. You should re- 
member that.” 


Eragon bit back a sharp retort and gazed at the black surface of the 
river—always moving, never stopping—in an attempt to calm his mind. 
“You're right. I let my temper get away from me.” 


Orik’s teeth gleamed in the night as he smiled. “It’s a lesson that every 
commander must learn. I had it beaten into me by Hrothgar after I threw 
my boot at a dwarf who left his halberd where someone could step on 
ite 


“Did you hit him?” 
“I broke his nose,” chuckled Orik. 


Despite himself, Eragon laughed as well. “I'll remember not to do that.” 
He held the bowl with both hands to keep them warm. 


Eragon heard the jangle of metal as Orik extracted something from a 
pouch. “Here,” said the dwarf, dropping a knot of intertwined gold rings 
on Eragon’s palm. “It’s a puzzle we use to test cleverness and dexterity. 
There are eight bands. If you arrange them properly, they form a single 
ring. I’ve found it useful for distracting myself when I’m troubled.” 


“Thank you,” murmured Eragon, already entranced by the complexity 
of the gleaming nest. 


“You can keep it if you can put it together.” 


When he returned to his tent, Eragon lay on his stomach and inspected 
the rings in the dim firelight that seeped past the entrance flaps. Four 
bands looped through four bands. Each was smooth on the bottom half 
and an asymmetrical wriggling mass on the top, where it would weave 
through the other pieces. 


147 


As Eragon experimented with various configurations, he quickly be- 
came frustrated by a simple fact: it seemed impossible to get the two sets 
of bands parallel so they would lie flat together. 


Absorbed by the challenge, he forgot the terror he had just endured. 


Eragon woke right before dawn. Scrubbing the sleep from his eyes, he 
exited the tent and stretched. His breath turned white in the brisk morn- 
ing air. He nodded to Shrrgnien, who was keeping guard by the fire, then 
strolled to the edge of the river and washed his face, blinking from the 
shock of the cold water. 


He located Saphira with a flick of his mind, belted on Zar’roc, and 
headed toward her through the beech trees that lined the Az Ragni. Be- 
fore long Eragon’s hands and face were slick with dew from a tangled 
wall of chokecherry bushes that obstructed his way. With an effort, he 
pushed through the net of branches and escaped onto the silent plains. A 
round hill rose before him. On its crest—like two ancient statues—stood 
Saphira and Arya. They faced east, where a molten glow crept into the 
sky and burnished the prairie amber. 


As the clear light struck the two figures, Eragon was reminded of how 
Saphira had watched the sunrise from his bedpost only a few hours after 
she hatched. She was like a hawk or falcon with her hard, sparkling eyes 
under their bony ridges, the fierce arch of her neck, and the lean strength 
etched into every line of her body. She was a huntress, and endowed with 
all the savage beauty that the term implied. Arya’s angled features and 
panther grace perfectly matched the dragon beside her. No discrepancy 
existed between their demeanors as they stood bathed in dawn’s first 
rays. 


A tingle of awe and joy shuddered along Eragon’s spine. This was where 
he belonged, as a Rider. Of all the things in Alagaésia, he had been lucky 
enough to be joined with this. The wonder of it brought tears to his eyes 
and a smile of wild exultation that dispelled all his doubts and fears in a 
surge of pure emotion. 


Still smiling, he mounted the hill and took his place by Saphira as they 
surveyed the new day. 


Arya looked at him. Eragon met her gaze, and something lurched 
within him. He flushed without knowing why, feeling a sudden connec- 


148 


tion with her, a sense that she understood him better than anyone other 
than Saphira. His reaction confused him, for no one had affected him in 
that manner before. 


Throughout the rest of the day, all Eragon had to do was think back on 
that moment to make himself smile and set his insides churning with a 
mixture of odd sensations he could not identify. He spent most of his 
time seated against the raft’s cabin, working on Orik’s ring and watching 
the changing landscape. 


Around midday they passed the mouth of a valley, and another river 
melded into the Az Ragni, doubling its size and speed until the shores 
were over a mile apart. It was all the dwarves could do to keep the rafts 
from being tossed like flotsam before the inexorable current and to avoid 
smashing into the trees that occasionally floated by. 


A mile after the rivers joined, the Az Ragni turned north and flowed 
past a lonely cloud-wreathed peak that stood separate from the main 
body of the Beor range, like a gigantic watchtower built to keep vigil 
over the plains. 


The dwarves bowed to the peak when they saw it, and Orik told Er- 
agon, “There is Moldtin the Proud. He is the last true mountain we shall 
see on this journey.” 


When the rafts were moored for the evening, Eragon saw Orik unwrap 
a long black box inlaid with mother-of-pearl, rubies, and curved lines of 
silver. Orik flicked a clasp, then raised the lid to reveal an unstrung bow 
nestled in red velvet. The bow’s reflexed limbs were ebony, which 
formed the background for intricate patterns of vines, flowers, animals, 
and runes, all executed in the finest gold. It was such a luxurious weapon, 
Eragon wondered how anyone dared use it. 


Orik strung the bow—it was nearly as tall as he was, but still no bigger 
than a child’s bow by Eragon’s standards—put the box away, and said, 
“I’m going to find some fresh meat. I'll be back in an hour.” With that he 
disappeared into the brush. Thorv grunted disapprovingly, but made no 
move to stop him. 


True to his word, Orik returned with a brace of long-necked geese. “I 


found a flock of them perched in a tree,” he said, tossing the birds to 
Dathmér. 


149 


As Orik retrieved the bejeweled case, Eragon asked, “What kind of 
wood is your bow made of?” 


“Wood?” Orik laughed, shaking his head. “You can’t make a bow this 
short out of wood and cast an arrow more than twenty yards; it breaks, 
or follows the string after a few shots. No, this is an Urgal horn bow?” 


Eragon eyed him suspiciously, sure that the dwarf was trying to fool 
him. “Horn isn’t flexible or springy enough to make a bow.” 


“Ah,” chortled Orik, “that’s because you have to know how to treat it 
right. We first learned to do it with Feldtinost horns, but it works just as 
well with an Urgal’s. It’s done by cutting the horn in half lengthwise, then 
trimming the outside coil until it’s the right thickness. The strip is boiled 
flat and sanded into the final shape before being fixed to the belly of an 
ash stave with glue made from fish scales and the skin from the roof of 
trout’s mouths. Then the back of the stave is covered with multiple lay- 
ers of sinew; they give the bow its snap. The last step is decoration. The 
entire process can take almost a decade.” 


“I’ve never heard of a bow built like that before,” said Eragon. It made 
his own weapon seem no more than a crudely hacked branch. “How far 
does it shoot?” 


“See for yourself,” said Orik. He let Eragon take the bow, which he held 
gingerly, for fear of scuffing its finish. Orik removed an arrow from his 
quiver and handed it to him. “You'll owe me an arrow, though.” 


Eragon fit shaft to string, aimed over the Az Ragni, and pulled back. 
The bow’s draw length was less than two feet, but he was surprised to 
find that its weight far exceeded that of his own bow; he was barely 
strong enough to hold the string. He released the arrow and it vanished 
with a twang, only to reappear far above the river. Eragon watched with 
amazement as the arrow landed in a spray of water halfway across the Az 
Ragni. 


He immediately reached through the barrier in his mind so that the 
magic’s power suffused him and said, “Gath sem oro un lam iet.” After a 
few seconds, the arrow darted back through the air to land on his out- 
stretched palm. “And there,” he said, “is the arrow I owe you.” 


Orik clapped his fist to his chest and then embraced the arrow and 
bow with obvious delight. “Wonderful! Now I still have an even two 


150 


dozen. Otherwise, I would have had to wait until Hedarth to replenish 
my stock.” He deftly unstrung the bow and stored it away, wrapping the 
case in soft rags to protect it. 


Eragon saw Arya watching. He asked her, “Do elves use horn bows as 
well? You're so strong, a wood bow would shatter if it was made heavy 
enough for you.” 


“We sing our bows from trees that do not grow.” And then she walked 
away. 


For days, they drifted through fields of spring grass while the Beor 
Mountains faded into a hazy white wall behind them. The banks were 
often covered with vast herds of gazelles and small red deer that watched 
them with liquid eyes. 


Now that the Fanghur were no longer a threat, Eragon flew almost con- 
stantly with Saphira. It was their first opportunity since before Gil’ead to 
spend so much time together in the air, and they took full advantage of it. 
Also, Eragon welcomed the chance to escape the cramped deck of the 
raft, where he felt awkward and unsettled with Arya so near. 


151 


ARYA SVIT-KONA 





Eragon and his company followed the Az Ragni until it joined the Edda 
River, which then drifted into the unknown east. At the juncture be- 
tween the rivers, they visited the dwarves’ trading outpost, Hedarth, and 
exchanged their rafts for donkeys. Dwarves never used horses on account 
of their size. 


Arya refused the steed offered to her, saying, “I will not return to the 
land of my ancestors on the back of a donkey.” 


Thorv frowned. “How will you keep pace with us?” 


‘I will run.” And run she did, outstripping Snowfire and the donkeys, 
only to sit waiting for them at the next hill or copse. Despite her exer- 
tions, she displayed no sign of weariness when they stopped for the night, 
nor any inclination to utter more than a few words between breakfast 
and supper. With every step, she seemed to grow tenser. 


From Hedarth, they trekked north, going up the Edda River toward its 
point of origin at Eldor Lake. 


Du Weldenvarden came into view within three days. The forest first 
appeared as a hazy ridge on the horizon, then quickly expanded into an 
emerald sea of ancient oaks, beeches, and maples. From Saphira’s back, 
Eragon saw that the woods reached unbroken to the horizon both north 
and west, and he knew they extended far beyond that, stretching the en- 
tire length of Alagaésia. 


To him, the shadows underneath the trees’ arching boughs seemed 
mysterious and enticing, as well as dangerous, for there lived the elves. 
Hidden somewhere in the dappled heart of Du Weldenvarden lay Elles- 
méra—where he would complete his training—as well as Osilon, and 
other elven cities few outsiders had visited since the fall of the Riders. 
The forest was a perilous place for mortals, Eragon felt, certain to be rid- 
dled with strange magic and stranger creatures. 


It’s like another world, he observed. A pair of butterflies spiraled around 
each other as they rose from the dark interior of the forest. 


I hope, said Saphira, there will be room for me within the trees on whatever 


152 


path the elves use. I cannot fly the whole time. 


I’m sure they found ways to accommodate dragons during the time of the 
Riders. 


Mmm. 


That night, just as Eragon was about to seek his blankets, Arya ap- 
peared by his shoulder, like a spirit materializing out of the air. Her 
stealth made him jump; he could never understand how she moved so 
quietly. Before he could ask what she wanted, her mind touched his and 
she said, Follow me as silently as you can. 


The contact surprised him as much as the request. They had shared 
thoughts during the flight to Farthen Dar—it had been the only way Er- 
agon could speak to her through her self-induced coma—but since Arya’s 
recovery, he had made no attempt to touch her mind again. It was a pro- 
foundly personal experience. Whenever he reached out to another per- 
son’s consciousness, it felt as if a facet of his bare soul rubbed against 
theirs. It seemed boorish and rude to initiate something so private with- 
out an invitation, as well as a betrayal of Arya’s trust, slender as it was. 
Also, Eragon was afraid that such a link would reveal his new and con- 
fused feelings for Arya, and he had no desire to be ridiculed for them. 


He accompanied her as she slipped out from the ring of tents, carefully 
evaded Trihga, who had taken the first watch, and passed beyond the 
dwarves’ hearing. Within him, Saphira kept a close watch on his progress, 
ready to leap to his side if need be. 


Arya squatted on a moss-eaten log and wrapped her arms around her 
knees without looking at him. “There are things you must know before 
we reach Ceris and Ellesméra so that you do not shame yourself or me 
through your ignorance.” 


“Such as?” He crouched opposite her, curious. 


Arya hesitated. “During my years as Islanzadi’s ambassador, it was my 
observation that humans and dwarves are quite similar. You share many 
of the same beliefs and passions. More than one human has lived com- 
fortably among the dwarves because he or she can understand their cul- 
ture, as they understand yours. You both love, lust, hate, fight, and create 
in much the same manner. Your friendship with Orik and your accep- 
tance into Dirgrimst Ingeitum are examples of this.” Eragon nodded, al- 
though their differences seemed greater to him than that. “Elves, though, 


153 


are not like other races.” 


“You speak as though you weren't one,” he said, echoing her words 
from Farthen Dar. 


“I have lived with the Varden for enough years to become accustomed 
to their traditions,” replied Arya in a brittle tone. 


“Ah... So then do you mean to say that elves don’t have the same emo- 
tions as dwarves and humans? I find that hard to believe. All living things 
have the same basic needs and desires.” 


“That is not what I mean to say!” Eragon recoiled, then frowned and 
studied her. It was unusual for her to be so brusque. Arya closed her eyes 
and placed her fingers on her temples, taking a long breath. “Because 
elves live for so many years, we consider courtesy to be the highest social 
virtue. You cannot afford to give offense when a grudge can be held for 
decades or centuries. Courtesy is the only way to prevent such hostility 
from accumulating. It doesn’t always succeed, but we adhere to our ritu- 
als rigorously, for they protect us from extremes. Nor are elves fecund, so 
it is vital that we avoid conflict among ourselves. If we shared the same 
rate of crime as you or the dwarves, we would soon be extinct. 


“There is a proper way to greet the sentinels in Ceris, certain patterns 
and forms that you must observe when presented to Queen Islanzadi, 
and a hundred different manners in which to greet those around you, if 
it’s not better to just remain quiet.” 


“With all your customs,” Eragon risked saying, “it seems as though 
you've only made it easier to offend people.” 


A smile flickered across her lips. “Perhaps. You know as well as I that 
you will be judged by the highest standards. If you make a mistake, the 
elves will think you did it on purpose. And only harm will come if they 
discover that it was born of ignorance. Far better to be thought rude and 
capable than rude and incapable, else you risk being manipulated like 
The Serpent in a match of Runes. Our politics move in cycles that are 
both subtle and lengthy. What you see or hear of an elf one day may only 
be a slight move in a strategy that reaches back millennia, and may have 
no bearing on how that elf will behave tomorrow. It is a game that we all 
play but few control, a game that you are about to enter. 


“Now perhaps you realize why I say elves are not like other races. The 
dwarves are also long-lived, yet they are more prolific than us and do not 


154 


share our restraint or our taste for intrigue. And humans...” She let her 
voice fade into a tactful silence. 


“Humans,” said Eragon, “do the best they can with what they are given.” 
“Even so.” 


“Why don’t you tell Orik all this as well? He'll be staying in Ellesméra, 
same as me.” 


An edge crept into Arya’s voice. “He is already somewhat familiar with 
our etiquette. However, as a Rider, you would do well to appear better 
educated than him.” 


Eragon accepted her rebuke without protest. “What must I learn?” 


So Arya began to tutor him and, through him, Saphira in the niceties of 
elven society. First she explained that when one elf meets another, they 
stop and touch their first two fingers to their lips to indicate that “we 
shall not distort the truth during our conversation.” This is followed by 
the phrase “Atra esterni ono thelduin” to which one replies “Atra du 
evarinya ono varda.” 


“And,” said Arya, “if you are being especially formal, a third response is 
made: ‘Un atra mor’ranr lifa unin hjarta onr, which means, ‘And may 
peace live in your heart.’ These lines were adopted from a blessing that 
was made by a dragon when our pact with them was finalized. It goes: 

Atra esterni ono thelduin, 

Mor'anr lifa unin hjarta onr, 

Un du evarinya ono varda. 

“Or: ‘May good fortune rule over you, peace live in your heart, and the 
stars watch over you.” 

“How do you know who is supposed to speak first?” 

“If you greet someone with greater status than yourself or if you wish 


to honor a subordinate, then speak first. If you greet someone with less 
status than yourself, speak last. But if you are uncertain of your position, 


155 


give your counterpart a chance to speak, and if they are silent, speak first. 
Such is the rule.” 


Does it apply to me as well? asked Saphira. 


Arya plucked a dry leaf from the ground and crumpled it between her 
fingers. Behind her, the camp faded into shadow as the dwarves banked 
the fire, dampening the flames with a layer of dirt so that the coals and 
embers would survive until morning. “As a dragon, none are higher than 
you in our culture. Not even the queen would claim authority over you. 
You may do and say as you wish. We do not expect dragons to be bound 
by our laws.” 


Next she showed Eragon how to twist his right hand and place it over 
his sternum in a curious gesture. “This,” she said, “you will use when you 
meet Islanzadi. By it you indicate that you offer her your loyalty and obe- 
dience.” 


“Is it binding, like my oath of fealty to Nasuada?” 
“No, only a courtesy, and a small one at that.” 


Eragon struggled to remember the sundry modes of address that Arya 
instructed them in. The salutations varied from man to woman, adults to 
children, boys to girls, as well as by rank and prestige. It was a daunting 
list, but one that Eragon knew he had to memorize perfectly. 


When he had absorbed all he could, Arya stood and dusted her hands. 


“So long as you do not forget, you'll do well enough.” She turned to leave. 


“Wait,” said Eragon. He reached out to stop her, then snatched back his 
hand before she noticed his presumption. She looked over her shoulder 
with a query in her dark eyes, and his stomach clenched as he tried to 
find a way to voice his thoughts. Despite his best efforts, he ended up 
just saying, “Are you well, Arya?... You've seemed distracted and out of 
sorts ever since we left Hedarth.” 


As Arya’s face hardened into a blank mask, he winced inwardly, know- 
ing that he had chosen the wrong approach, although he could not 
fathom why the question should offend her. 


“When we are in Du Weldenvarden,” she informed him, “I expect that 


you will not speak to me in such a familiar way, unless you wish to cause 
affront.” She stalked away. 


156 


Run after her! exclaimed Saphira. 

What? 

We can’t afford to have her angry with you. Go apologize. 
His pride rebelled. No! It’s her fault, not mine. 


Go apologize, Eragon, or I'll fill your tent with carrion. It was no idle 
threat. 


How? 


Saphira thought for a second, then told him what to do. Without argu- 
ing, he jumped to his feet and darted in front of Arya, forcing her to stop. 
She regarded him with a haughty expression. 


He touched his fingers to his lips and said, “Arya Svit-kona,” using the 
honorific he had just learned for a woman of great wisdom. “I spoke 
badly, and for that I cry your pardon. Saphira and I were concerned for 
your welfare. After all you've done for us, it seemed the least we could 
do was offer our help in return, if you need it.” 


Finally, Arya relented and said, “Your concern is appreciated. And I too 
spoke badly.” She looked down. In the dark, the outline of her limbs and 
torso was painfully rigid. “You ask what troubles me, Eragon? Do you 
truly wish to know? Then I will tell you.” Her voice was as soft as this- 
tledown floating on the wind. “I am afraid.” 


Dumbfounded, Eragon made no response, and she stepped past, leaving 
him alone in the night. 


157 


CERIS 





On the morning of the fourth day, when Eragon rode alongside 
Shrrgnien, the dwarf said, “So tell me, do men really have ten toes, as is 
said? For truly I have never traveled beyond our borders before.” 


“Of course we have ten toes!” said Eragon, astonished. He shifted in 
Snowfire’s saddle, lifted his foot, removed his right boot and sock, and 
wiggled his toes under Shrrgnien’s amazed eyes. “Don’t you?” 


Shrrgnien shook his head. “Nay, we have seven on each foot. It is how 
Helzvog made us. Five is too few and six is the wrong number, but 
seven... seven is just right.” He glanced at Eragon’s foot again, then spurred 
his donkey ahead and began speaking animatedly to Ama and Hedin, who 
eventually handed him several silver coins. 


I think, said Eragon as he pulled the boot back on, that I was just the 
source of a bet. For some reason, Saphira found that immensely amusing. 


As dusk fell and the full moon rose, the Edda River drew ever closer to 
the fringe of Du Weldenvarden. They rode down a narrow trail through 
tangled dogwood and rosebushes in full bloom, which filled the evening 
air with the flowers’ warm scent. 


Eager anticipation swelled within Eragon as he gazed into the dark for- 
est, knowing they had already entered the elves’ domain and were close 
to Ceris. He leaned forward in Snowfire’s saddle, the reins pulled tight 
between his hands. Saphira’s excitement was as great as his own; she 
ranged overhead, flicking her tail back and forth with impatience. 


Eragon felt as if they had wandered into a dream. It doesn’t seem reall, 


he said. 
Aye. Here the legends of old still bestride the earth. 


At last they came upon a small meadow set between the river and for- 
est. “Stop here,” said Arya in a low voice. She walked forward until she 
stood alone in the midst of the lush grass, then cried in the ancient lan- 
guage, “Come forth, my brethren! You have nothing to fear. Tis I, Arya 
of Ellesméra. My companions are friends and allies; they mean us no 
harm.” She added other words as well, ones alien to Eragon. 


158 


For several minutes, the only sound was the river rushing behind them, 
until from underneath the still leaves came a line of Elvish, so quick and 
fleeting that Eragon missed the meaning. Arya responded: “I do.” 


With a rustle, two elves stood on the edge of the forest and two ran 
lightly out on the boughs of a gnarled oak. Those on the ground bore long 
spears with white blades, while the others held bows. All were garbed in 
tunics the color of moss and bark underneath flowing cloaks clasped at 
the shoulder with ivory brooches. One had tresses as black as Arya’s. 
Three had hair like starlight. 


The elves dropped from the trees and embraced Arya, laughing in their 
clear, pure voices. They joined hands and danced in a circle around her 
like children, singing merrily as they spun through the grass. 


Eragon watched in amazement. Arya had never given him reason to 
suspect that elves liked to—or even could —laugh. It was a wondrous 
sound, like flutes and harps trilling with delight at their own music. He 
wished that he could listen to it forever. 


Then Saphira drifted over the river and settled beside Eragon. At her 
approach, the elves cried out in alarm and aimed their weapons toward 
her. Arya spoke quickly in soothing tones, motioning first at Saphira, then 
at Eragon. When she paused for breath, Eragon drew back the glove on 
his right hand, tilted his palm so that the gedwéy ignasia caught the 
moonlight, and said, as he once had to Arya so long ago, “Eka fricai un 
Shur’'tugal.” I am a Rider and friend. Remembering his lesson from yester- 
day, he touched his lips, adding, “Atra esterni ono thelduin.” 


The elves lowered their weapons as their angled faces lit up with radi- 
ant joy. They pressed their forefingers to their lips and bowed to Saphira 
and him, murmuring their reply in the ancient language. 


Then they rose, pointed at the dwarves, and laughed as if at a hidden 
joke. Drifting back into the forest, they waved their hands and called, 
“Come, come!” 


Eragon followed Arya with Saphira and the dwarves, who were grum- 
bling among themselves. As they passed between the trees, the canopy 
overhead plunged them into velvet darkness, except where fragments of 
moonlight gleamed through chinks in the shell of overlapping leaves. Er- 
agon could hear the elves whispering and laughing all around, though he 
could not see them. Occasionally, they would call directions when he or 


159 


the dwarves blundered. 


Ahead, a fire glowed through the trees, sending shadows racing like 
sprites across the leafy ground. As Eragon entered the radius of light, he 
saw three small huts clustered together around the base of a large oak. 
High in the tree was a roofed platform where a watchman could observe 
the river and forest. A pole had been lashed between two of the huts: 
from it hung bundles of drying plants. 


The four elves vanished into the huts, then returned with their arms 
piled high with fruits and vegetables—but no meat—and began prepar- 
ing a meal for their guests. They hummed as they worked, flitting from 
one tune to another as the fancy took them. When Orik asked their 
names, the dark-haired elf pointed to himself and said, “I am Lifaen of 
House Rilvenar. And my companions are Edurna, Celdin, and Nari.” 


Eragon sat beside Saphira, happy for an opportunity to rest and to 
watch the elves. Though all four were male, their faces resembled Arya’s, 
with delicate lips, thin noses, and large slanted eyes that shone under 
their brows. The rest of their bodies matched, with narrow shoulders and 
slender arms and legs. Each was more fair and noble than any human Er- 
agon had seen, albeit in a rarefied, exotic manner. 


Who ever thought I would get to visit the elves’ homeland? Eragon asked 
himself. He grinned and leaned against the corner of a hut, drowsy with 
the fire’s warmth. Above him, Saphira’s dancing blue eyes tracked the 
elves with unwavering precision. 


More magic is in this race, she finally remarked, than either humans or 
dwarves. They do not feel as if they come from the earth or the stone, but 
rather from another realm, half in, half out, like reflections seen through wa- 
ter. 


They certainly are graceful, he said. The elves moved like dancers, their 
every action smooth and lithe. 


Brom had told Eragon that it was rude for someone to speak with their 
mind to a Rider’s dragon without permission, and the elves adhered to 
that custom, voicing aloud their comments to Saphira, who would then 
answer the elves directly. Saphira usually refrained from touching the 
thoughts of humans and dwarves and allowed Eragon to relay her words, 
since few members of those races had the training to guard their minds if 
they wished for privacy. It also seemed an imposition to use such an in- 
timate form of contact for casual exchanges. The elves had no such inhi- 


160 


bitions, though; they welcomed Saphira into their minds, reveling in her 
presence. 


At last the food was ready and served on carved plates that felt like 
dense bone, although wood grain wandered through the flowers and 
vines decorating the rim. Eragon was also supplied with a flagon of 
gooseberry wine—made of the same unusual material—with a sculpted 
dragon wrapped around its stem. 

As they ate, Lifaen produced a set of reed pipes and began to play a 


flowing melody, his fingers running along the various holes. Soon the tall- 
est silver-haired elf, Nari, raised his voice and sang: 


O! 


The day is done; the stars are bright; 
The leaves are still; the moon is white! 
Laugh at woe and laugh at foe, 


Menoa’s scion now is safe this night! 


A forest child we lost to strife; 
A sylvan daughter caught by life! 
Freed of fear and freed of flame, 


She tore a Rider from the shadows rife! 


Again the dragons rise on wing, 
And we avenge their suffering! 
Strong of blade and strong of arm, 


The time is ripe for us to kill a king! 


161 


O! 


The wind is soft; the river deep; 
The trees are tall; the birds do sleep! 
Laugh at woe and laugh at foe, 


The hour has arrived for joy to reap! 


When Nari finished, Eragon released his pent-up breath. He had never 
heard such a voice before; it felt as if the elf had revealed his essence, his 
very soul. “That was beautiful, Nari-vodhr.” 


“A rough composition, Argetlam,” demurred Nari. “But I thank you, 
nevertheless.” 


Thorv grunted. “Very pretty, Master Elf. However, there are matters 
more serious than reciting verse that we must attend to. Are we to ac- 
company Eragon farther?” 


“No,” said Arya quickly, drawing looks from the other elves. “You may 
return home in the morning. We will assure that Eragon reaches Elles- 
mera.” 


Thorv dipped his head. “Then our task is complete.” 


As Eragon lay on the bedding the elves had arranged for him, he 
strained his ears to catch Arya’s speech, which drifted from one of the 
huts. Though she used many unfamiliar words in the ancient language, he 
deduced that she was explaining to their hosts how she had lost Saphira’s 
egg and the events since. A long silence followed after she stopped, then 
an elf said, “It is good that you have returned, Arya Dréttningu. Islanzadi 
was sorely wounded by grief when you were captured and the egg was 
stolen, and by Urgals no less! She was—and is—sick at heart.” 


“Hush, Edurna... hush,” chided another. “Dvergar are small, but they 
have sharp ears, and I am sure these will report to Hrothgar.” 


Then their voices dropped and Eragon could discern no more from the 


162 


murmur of voices, which melded into the whisper of leaves as he drifted 
to sleep, the elf’s song repeating endlessly through his dreams. 


The scent of flowers was heavy in the air when Eragon woke to behold 
a sun-drenched Du Weldenvarden. Above him arched a mottled panoply 
of drifting leaves, supported by the thick trunks that buried themselves 
in the dry, bare ground. Only moss, lichen, and a few low shrubs survived 
in the pervasive green shade. The scarcity of underbrush made it possible 
to see for great distances between the knotted pillars and to walk about 
freely beneath the dappled ceiling. 


Rolling to his feet, Eragon found Thorv and his guards packed and 
ready to leave. Orik’s donkey was tied behind Ekksvar's steed. Eragon ap- 
proached Thorv and said, “Thank you, all of you, for protecting me and 
Saphira. Please convey our gratitude to Undin.” 


Thorv pressed his fist to his chest. “I will carry your words.” He hesi- 
tated and looked back at the huts. “Elves are a queer race, full of light and 
dark. In the morning, they drink with you; in the evening, they stab you. 
Keep thine back to a wall, Shadeslayer. Capricious, they are.” 


“T will remember that.” 


“Mmm.” Thorv gestured toward the river. “They plan to travel up Eldor 
Lake in boats. What will you do with thine horse? We could return him 
to Tarnag with us, and from there, to Tronjheim.” 


“Boats!” cried Eragon with dismay. He had always planned to bring 
Snowfire to Ellesméra. It was convenient to have a horse whenever 
Saphira was away, or in places too confined for her bulk. He fingered the 
sparse bristles along his jaw. “That is a kind offer. Will you make sure 
Snowfire is well cared for? I couldn't bear it if anything were to happen 
to him.” 


“On mine honor,” pledged Thorv, “you will return to find him fat and 
sleek.” 


Eragon fetched Snowfire and transferred the stallion, his saddle, and his 
grooming supplies into Thorv’s care. He bade each of the warriors fare- 
well, then he, Saphira, and Orik watched the dwarves ride back along the 
trail they had arrived on. 


Returning to the huts, Eragon and the remainder of his party followed 
the elves to a thicket on the edge of the Edda River. There, docked on 
either side of a boulder, were two white canoes with vines carved along 
their sides. 


Eragon boarded the nearest boat and stowed his pack beneath his feet. 
He was amazed by how light the craft was; he could have lifted it with a 
single hand. Even more astounding, the hulls appeared to be composed of 
birch-bark panels melded into a seamless whole. Curious, he touched the 
side. The bark was hard and taut, like stretched parchment, and cool 
from its contact with the water. He rapped it with a knuckle. The fi- 
brous shell reverberated like a muted drum. 


“Are all your boats made this way?” he asked. 


“All except the very largest,’ answered Nari, seating himself at the 
prow of Eragon’s vessel. “For those, we sing the finest cedar and oak into 
shape.” 


Before Eragon could ask what he meant, Orik joined their canoe while 
Arya and Lifaen appropriated the second one. Arya turned to Edurna and 
Celdin—who stood on the bank—and said, “Guard this way so that none 
may follow us, and tell no one of our presence. The queen must be the 
first to know. I will send reinforcements as soon as we reach Silthrim.” 


“Arya Drottningu.” 
“May the stars watch over you!” she answered. 


Bending forward, Nari and Lifaen drew spiked poles ten feet long from 
inside the boats and began propelling the vessels upstream. Saphira slid 
into the water behind them and clawed her way along the riverbed until 
they were level. When Eragon looked at her, she winked lazily, then 
submerged, forcing the river to swell into a mound over her jagged back. 
The elves laughed as she did so and made many compliments about her 
size and strength. 


After an hour, they reached Eldor Lake, which was rough with small, 
jagged waves. Birds and flies swarmed by a wall of trees edging the west- 
ern shore, while the eastern shore sloped up into the plains. On that side 
meandered hundreds of deer. 


Once they escaped the river's current, Nari and Lifaen stowed their 
poles, then distributed leaf-bladed paddles. Orik and Arya already knew 


164 


how to steer a boat, but Nari had to explain the process to Eragon. “We 
turn toward whichever side you paddle on,” said the elf. “So if I paddle on 
the right and Orik paddles on the left, then you must paddle first on one 
side, then the other, else we will drift off course.” In the daylight, Nari’s 
hair shimmered like the finest wire, each strand a fiery line. 


Eragon soon mastered the ability, and as the motion became habitual, 
his mind was freed to daydream. Thus, he floated up the cool lake, lost in 
the fantastic worlds hidden behind his eyes. When he paused to rest his 
arms, he once again pulled Orik’s puzzle ring from his belt and struggled 
to arrange the obstinate gold bands into the correct pattern. 


Nari noticed what he was doing. “May I see that ring?” 


Eragon passed it to the elf, who turned his back. For a few moments, 
Eragon and Orik maneuvered the canoe alone as Nari picked at the en- 
twined bands. Then, with a pleased exclamation, Nari raised his hand, 
and the completed ring flashed on his middle finger. “A delightful riddle,” 
said Nari. He slipped off the ring and shook it, so that it was in its origi- 
nal state when he returned it to Eragon. 


“How did you solve it?” demanded Eragon, dismayed and envious that 
Nari had been able to master the puzzle so easily. “Wait... Don’t tell me. I 


want to figure it out on my own.” 


“Of course,” said Nari, smiling. 


WOUNDS OF THE PAST 





For three and a half days, the citizens of Carvahall discussed the latest 
attack, the tragedy of young Elmund’s death, and what could possibly be 
done to escape their thrice-blasted situation. The debate raged with bit- 
ter fury through every room of every home. In the space of a word, 
friends turned against friends, husbands against wives, children against 
parents, only to reconcile moments later in their frantic attempt to dis- 
cover a means of survival. 


Some said that since Carvahall was doomed anyway, they might as well 
kill the Ra’zac and remaining soldiers so as to at least have their venge- 
ance. Others said that if Carvahall really was doomed, then the only logi- 
cal course was to surrender and trust themselves to the king’s mercy, 
even if it did mean torture and death for Roran and enslavement for eve- 
ryone else. And still others sided with neither opinion, but rather de- 
scended into a sullen black anger directed at everyone who had brought 
about this calamity. Many did their best to hide their panic in the depths 
of a tankard. 


The Ra’zac themselves had apparently realized that with eleven soldiers 
dead they no longer had a large enough force to attack Carvahall, and 
thus had retreated farther down the road, where they were content to 
post sentinels across Palancar Valley and wait. “Wait for flea-bitten 
troops from Ceunon or Gil’ead, if you ask me,” Loring said at one meet- 
ing. Roran listened to that and more, kept his own council, and silently 
judged the various schemes. They all seemed dangerously risky. 


Roran still had not told Sloan that he and Katrina were engaged. He 
knew it was foolish to wait, but he feared how the butcher would react 
when he learned that Roran and Katrina had flouted tradition and, in do- 
ing so, undermined Sloan’s authority. Besides, there was plenty of work to 
divert Roran’s attention; he convinced himself that strengthening the for- 
tifications around Carvahall was his most important task at the moment. 


Getting people to help was easier than Roran anticipated. After the last 
fight, the villagers were more apt to listen and to obey him—that is, 
those who did not blame him for causing their predicament. He was 
mystified by his new authority, until he realized that it was the result of 
the awe, respect, and perhaps even fear his kills had elicited. They called 
him Stronghammer. Roran Stronghammer. 


The name pleased him. 


166 


As night engulfed the valley, Roran leaned against a corner of Horst’s 
dining room, his eyes closed. Conversation flowed from the men and 
women seated around the candlelit table. Kiselt was in the middle of ex- 
plaining the state of Carvahall’s supplies. “We won't starve,” he con- 
cluded, “but if we can’t tend to our fields and our flocks soon, we might 
as well cut our own throats before next winter. It would be a kinder 
fate.” 


Horst scowled. “Dog tripe!” 


“Dog tripe or not,” said Gertrude, “I doubt we'll have a chance to find 
out. We outnumbered the soldiers ten to one when they arrived. They 
lost eleven men; we lost twelve, and I’m caring for another nine 
wounded. What happens, Horst, when they outnumber us ten to one?” 


“We will give the bards a reason to remember our names,” retorted the 


smith. Gertrude shook her head sadly. 


Loring banged a fist on the table. “And I say it’s our turn to strike, be- 
fore we are outnumbered. All we need are a few men, shields, and spears, 
and we can wipe out their infestation. It could be done tonight!” 


Roran shifted restlessly. He had heard all this before, and like before, 
Loring’s proposal ignited an argument that consumed the group. After an 
hour, the debate still showed no sign of being resolved, nor had any new 
ideas been presented, except for Thane’s suggestion that Gedric should 
go tan his own hide, which nearly resulted in a fistfight. 


Finally, when the conversation lulled, Roran limped to the table as 
quickly as his injured calf would allow. “I have something to say.” For him 
it was the equivalent of stepping on a long thorn and then yanking it out 
without stopping to consider the pain; it had to be done, and the faster 
the better. 


All eyes—hard, soft, angry, kind, indifferent, and curious—turned to 
him, and Roran took a deep breath. “Indecision will kill us just as surely 
as a sword or an arrow.” Orval rolled his eyes, but the rest still listened. “I 
don’t know if we should attack or flee—’” 


“Where?” snorted Kiselt. 


“—but I do know one thing: our children, our mothers, and our infirm 
must be protected from danger. The Ra’zac have barred us from Cawley 


167 


and the other farms down the valley. So what? We know this land better 
than any in Alagaésia, and there is a place... there is a place where our 
loved ones will be safe: the Spine.” 


Roran winced as a barrage of outraged voices assaulted him. Sloan was 
the loudest, shouting, “I'll be hanged before I set foot in those cursed 
mountains!” 


“Roran,” said Horst, overriding the commotion. “You of all people 
should know that the Spine is too dangerous—it’s where Eragon found 
the stone that brought the Ra’zac! The mountains are cold, and filled 
with wolves, bears, and other monsters. Why even mention them?” 


To keep Katrina safe! Roran wanted to scream. Instead, he said, “Be- 
cause no matter how many soldiers the Ra’zac summon, they will never 
dare enter the Spine. Not after Galbatorix lost half his army in it.” 


“That was a long time ago,” said Morn doubtfully. 


Roran jumped on his statement. “And the stories have grown all the 
more frightening in the telling! A trail already exists to the top of Igualda 
Falls. All we have to do is send the children and others up there. They'll 
only be on the fringe of the mountains, but they’ll still be safe. If Carva- 
hall is taken, they can wait until the soldiers leave, then find refuge in 
Therinsford.” 


“It is too dangerous,” growled Sloan. The butcher gripped the edge of 
the table so hard that the tips of his fingers turned white. “The cold, the 
beasts. No sane man would send his family among those.” 


“But...” Roran faltered, put off-balance by Sloan’s response. Though he 
knew the butcher hated the Spine more than most—because his wife 
had plummeted to her death from the cliffs beside Igualda Falls—he had 
hoped that Sloan’s rabid desire to protect Katrina would be strong 
enough to overcome his aversion. Roran now understood he would have 
to win over Sloan just like everyone else. Adopting a placating tone, Ro- 
ran said, “It’s not that bad. The snow is already melting off the peaks. It’s 
no colder in the Spine than it was down here a few months ago. And | 
doubt that wolves or bears would bother such a large group.” 


Sloan grimaced, twisting his lips up over his teeth, and shook his head. 
“You will find nothing but death in the Spine.” 


The others seemed to agree, which only strengthened Roran’s determi- 


168 


nation, for he was convinced that Katrina would die unless he could sway 
them. He scanned the long oval of faces, searching for a sympathetic ex- 
pression. “Delwin, I know it’s cruel of me to say it, but if Elmund hadn't 
been in Carvahall, he would still be alive. Surely you must agree that this 
is the right thing to do! You have an opportunity to save other parents 
from your suffering.” 


No one responded. “And Birgit!” Roran dragged himself toward her, 
clutching the backs of chairs to keep himself from falling. “Do you want 
Nolfavrell to share his father’s fate? He has to leave. Can’t you see, that is 
the only way he'll be safe...” Though Roran did his best to fight it, he 
could feel tears flood his eyes. “It’s for the children!” he shouted angrily. 


The room was silent as Roran stared at the wood beneath his hands, 
struggling to control himself. Delwin was the first to stir. “I will never 
leave Carvahall so long as my son’s killers remain here. However,” he 
paused, then continued with painful slowness, “I cannot deny the truth of 
your words; the children must be protected.” 


“As I said from the beginning,” declared Tara. 


Then Baldor spoke: “Roran is right. We can’t allow ourselves to be 
blinded by fear. Most of us have climbed to the top of the falls at one 
time or another. It’s safe enough.” 


“I too,” Birgit finally added, “must agree.” 


Horst nodded. “I would rather not do it, but considering the circum- 
stances.... I don’t think we have any other choice.” After a minute, the 
various men and women began to reluctantly acquiesce to the proposal. 


“Nonsense!” exploded Sloan. He stood and stabbed an accusing finger at 
Roran. “How will they get enough food to wait for weeks on end? They 
can’t carry it. How will they stay warm? If they light fires, they'll be seen! 
How, how, how? If they don’t starve, they'll freeze. If they don’t freeze, 
they'll be eaten. If they’re not eaten... Who knows? They may fall!” 


Roran spread his hands. “If we all help, they will have plenty of food. 
Fire won't be a problem if they move farther back into the forest, which 
they must anyway, since there isn’t room to camp right by the falls.” 


“Excuses! Justifications!” 


“What would you have us do, Sloan?” asked Morn, eyeing him with cu- 


169 


riosity. 
Sloan laughed bitterly. “Not this.” 
“Then what?” 
“It doesn’t matter. Only this is the wrong choice.” 
“You don’t have to participate,” pointed out Horst. 


“Nor will I,” said the butcher. “Proceed if you want, but neither I nor 
my blood shall enter the Spine while I still have marrow in my bones.” 
He grabbed his cap and left with a venomous glare at Roran, who re- 
turned the scowl in kind. 


As Roran saw it, Sloan was endangering Katrina through his own pig- 
headed stubbornness. If he can’t bring himself to accept the Spine as a 
place of refuge, decided Roran, then he’s become my enemy and I have to 
take matters into my own hands. 


Horst leaned forward on his elbows and interlaced his thick fingers. 
“So... If we are going to use Roran’s plan, what preparations will be 
needed?” The group exchanged wary glances, then gradually began to dis- 
cuss the topic. 


Roran waited until he was convinced that he had achieved his goal be- 
fore slipping out of the dining room. Loping through the dusky village, he 
searched for Sloan along the inner perimeter of the tree wall. Eventually, 
he spotted the butcher hunched underneath a torch, his shield clasped 
around his knees. Roran spun around on one foot and ran to Sloan’s shop, 
where he hurried to the kitchen in the back. 


Katrina paused in the middle of setting their table and stared at him 
with amazement. “Roran! Why are you here? Did you tell Father?” 


“No.” He came forward and took her arm, savoring the touch. Just be- 
ing in the same room with her filled him with joy. “I have a great favor to 
ask of you. It’s been decided to send the children and a few others into 
the Spine above Igualda Falls.” Katrina gasped. “I want you to accompany 
them.” 


With a shocked expression, Katrina pulled free of his grasp and turned 


to the open fireplace, where she hugged herself and stared at the bed of 
throbbing embers. For a long time, she said nothing. Then: “Father for- 


170 


bade me to go near the falls after Mother died. Albem’s farm is the clos- 
est I’ve been to the Spine in over ten years.” She shivered, and her voice 
grew accusing. “How can you suggest that I abandon both you and my 
father? This is my home as much as yours. And why should I leave when 
Elain, Tara, and Birgit will remain?” 


“Katrina, please.” He tentatively put his hands on her shoulders. “The 
Ra’zac are here for me, and I would not have you harmed because of that. 
As long as you're in danger, I can’t concentrate on what has to be done: 


defending Carvahall.” 


“Who would respect me for fleeing like a coward?” She lifted her chin. 
‘IT would be ashamed to stand before the women of Carvahall and call 
myself your wife.” 


“Coward? There is no cowardice in guarding and protecting the chil- 
dren in the Spine. If anything, it requires greater courage to enter the 
mountains than to stay.” 


“What horror is this?” whispered Katrina. She twisted in his arms, eyes 
shining and mouth set firmly. “The man who would be my husband no 
longer wants me by his side.” 


He shook his head. “That’s not true. I—’” 
“It is true! What if you are killed while I’m gone?” 
“Don't say—’” 


“No! Carvahall has little hope of survival, and if we must die, I would 
rather die together than huddle in the Spine without life or heart. Let 
those with children tend to their own. As will I.” A tear rolled down her 
cheek. 


Gratitude and wonder surged through Roran at the strength of her de- 
votion. He looked deep into her eyes. “It is for that love that I would 
have you go. I know how you feel. I know that this is the hardest sacri- 
fice either of us could make, and I ask it of you now.” 


Katrina shuddered, her entire body rigid, her white hands clenched 
around her muslin sash. “If I do this,” she said with a shaking voice, “you 
must promise me, here and now, that you will never make such a request 
again. You must promise that even if we faced Galbatorix himself and 
only one of us could escape, you would not ask me to leave.” 


171 


Roran looked at her helplessly. “I can’t.” 


“Then how can you expect me to do what you won't!” she cried. “That 
is my price, and neither gold nor jewels nor pretty words can replace 
your oath. If you don’t care enough for me to make your own sacrifice, 
Roran Stronghammer, then be gone and I never wish to see your face 
again!” 


I cannot lose her. Though it pained him almost beyond endurance, he 
bowed his head and said, “You have my word.” 


Katrina nodded and sank into a chair—her back stiff and upright—and 
blotted her tears on the cuff of her sleeve. In a quiet voice, she said, “Fa- 
ther will hate me for going.” 

“How will you tell him?” 

‘I won't,” she said defiantly. “He would never let me enter the Spine, 
but he has to realize that this is my decision. Anyway, he won't dare pur- 
sue me into the mountains; he fears them more than death itself.” 

“He may fear losing you even more.” 

“We shall see. I-—when—the time comes to return, I expect you to 
have already spoken to him about our engagement. That should give him 


enough time to reconcile himself to the fact.” 


Roran found himself nodding in agreement, all the while thinking that 
they would be lucky if events worked out so well. 


172 


WOUNDS OF THE PRESENT 





When dawn arrived, Roran woke and lay staring at the whitewashed 
ceiling while he listened to the slow rasp of his own breathing. After a 
minute, he rolled off the bed, dressed, and proceeded to the kitchen, 
where he procured a chunk of bread, smeared it with soft cheese, then 
stepped out onto the front porch to eat and admire the sunrise. 


His tranquility was soon disrupted when a herd of unruly children 
dashed through the garden of a nearby house, shrieking with delight at 
their game of Catch-the-Cat, followed by a number of adults intent on 
snaring their respective charges. Roran watched the cacophonous parade 
vanish around a corner, then placed the last of the bread in his mouth 
and returned to the kitchen, which had filled with the rest of the house- 
hold. 


Elain greeted him. “Good morning, Roran.” She pushed open the win- 
dow shutters and gazed up at the sky. “It looks like it may rain again.” 


“The more the better,” asserted Horst. “It'll help keep us hidden while 
we climb Narnmor Mountain.” 


“Us?” inquired Roran. He sat at the table beside Albriech, who was 
rubbing the sleep from his eyes. 


Horst nodded. “Sloan was right about the food and supplies; we have to 
help carry them up the falls, or else there won't be enough.” 


“Will there still be men to defend Carvahall?” 


“Of course, of course.” 


Once they all had breakfast, Roran helped Baldor and Albriech wrap 
spare food, blankets, and supplies into three large bundles that they slung 
across their shoulders and hauled to the north end of the village. Roran’s 
calf pained him, but not unbearably. Along the way, they met the three 
brothers Darmmen, Larne, and Hamund, who were similarly burdened. 


Just inside the trench that circumnavigated the houses, Roran and his 
companions found a large gathering of children, parents, and grandparents 


173 


all busy organizing for the expedition. Several families had volunteered 
their donkeys to carry goods and the younger children; the animals were 
picketed in an impatient, braying line that added to the overall confusion. 


Roran set his bundle on the ground and scanned the group. He saw 
Svart—Ivor’s uncle and, at nearly sixty, the oldest man in Carvahall— 
seated on a bale of clothes, teasing a baby with the tip of his long white 
beard; Nolfavrell, who was guarded over by Birgit; Felda, Nolla, Calitha, 
and a number of other mothers with worried expressions; and a great 
many reluctant people, both men and women. Roran also saw Katrina 
among the crowd. She glanced up from a knot she was tying on a pack 
and smiled at him, then returned to her task. 


Since no one seemed to be in charge, Roran did his best to sort out the 
chaos by overseeing the arranging and packaging of the various supplies. 
He discovered a shortage of waterskins, but when he asked for more, he 
ended up with thirteen too many. Delays such as those consumed the 
early-morning hours. 


In the middle of discussing with Loring the possible need for extra 
shoes, Roran stopped as he noticed Sloan standing at the entrance to an 
alleyway. 


The butcher surveyed the mass of activity before him. Contempt cut 
into the lines along his downturned mouth. His sneer hardened into en- 
raged incredulity as he spotted Katrina, who had shouldered her pack, 
removing any possibility that she was there only to help. A vein throbbed 
down the middle of Sloan’s forehead. 


Roran hurried toward Katrina, but Sloan reached her first. He grabbed 
the top of the pack and shook it violently, shouting, “Who made you do 
this?” Katrina said something about the children and tried to pull free, 
but Sloan yanked at the pack—twisting her arms as the straps slid off her 
shoulders—and threw it on the ground so that the contents scattered. 
Still shouting, Sloan grabbed Katrina’s arm and began to drag her away. 
She dug in her heels and fought, her copper hair swirling over her face 
like a dust storm. 


Furious, Roran threw himself at Sloan and tore him from Katrina, shov- 
ing the butcher in the chest so that he stumbled backward several yards. 


“Stop! I’m the one who wanted her to go.” 


Sloan glared at Roran and snarled, “You have no right!” 


174 


“I have every right.” Roran looked at the ring of spectators who had 
gathered around and then declared so that all could hear: “Katrina and I 
are engaged to be married, and I would not have my future wife treated 
so!” For the first time that day, the villagers fell completely silent; even 
the donkeys were quiet. 


Surprise and a deep, inconsolable pain sprang onto Sloan’s vulnerable 
face, along with the glimmer of tears. For a moment, Roran felt sympathy 
for him, then a series of contortions distorted Sloan’s visage, each more 
extreme than the last, until his skin turned beet red. He cursed and said, 
“You two-faced coward! How could you look me in the eye and speak to 
me like an honest man while, at the same time, courting my daughter 
without permission? I dealt with you in good faith, and here I find you 
plundering my house while my back is turned.” 


“I had hoped to do this properly,” said Roran, “but events have con- 
spired against me. It was never my intention to cause you grief. Even 
though this hasn’t gone the way either of us wanted, I still want your 
blessing, if you are willing.” 


“I would rather have a maggot-riddled pig for a son than you! You have 
no farm. You have no family. And you will have naught to do with my 
daughter!” The butcher cursed again. “And she'll have naught to do with 
the Spine!” 


Sloan reached for Katrina, but Roran blocked the way, his face as hard 
as his clenched fists. Only a handsbreadth apart, they stared directly at 
each other, trembling from the strength of their emotions. Sloan’s red- 
rimmed eyes shone with manic intensity. 


“Katrina, come here,” Sloan commanded. 

Roran withdrew from Sloan—so that the three of them formed a trian- 
gle—and looked at Katrina. Tears streamed down her face as she glanced 
between him and her father. She stepped forward, hesitated, then with a 
long, anguished cry, tore at her hair in a frenzy of indecision. 

“Katrina!” exclaimed Sloan with a burr of fear. 

“Katrina,” murmured Roran. 

At the sound of his voice, Katrina’s tears ceased and she stood straight 


and tall with a calm expression. She said, “I’m sorry, Father, but I have 
decided to marry Roran,” and stepped to his side. 


175 


Sloan turned bone white. He bit his lip so hard that a bead of ruby 
blood appeared. “You can’t leave me! You're my daughter!” He lunged at 
her with crooked hands. In that instant, Roran bellowed and struck the 
butcher with all his strength, knocking him sprawling in the dirt before 
the entire village. 


Sloan rose slowly, his face and neck flushed with humiliation. When he 
saw Katrina again, the butcher seemed to crumple inward, losing height 
and stature until Roran felt as if he were looking at a specter of the origi- 
nal man. In a low whisper, he said, “It is always so; those closest to the 
heart cause the most pain. Thou will have no dowry from me, snake, nor 
your mother’s inheritance.” Weeping bitterly, Sloan turned and fled to- 
ward his shop. 


Katrina leaned against Roran, and he put an arm around her. Together 
they clung to each other as people crowded against them offering condo- 
lences, advice, congratulations, and disapproval. Despite the commotion, 
Roran was aware of nothing but the woman whom he held, and who 


held him. 


Just then, Elain bustled up as fast as her pregnancy would allow. “Oh, 
you poor dear!” she cried, and embraced Katrina, drawing her from Ro- 
ran’s arms. “Is it true you are engaged?” Katrina nodded and smiled, then 
erupted into hysterical tears against Elain’s shoulder. “There now, there 
now.” Elain cradled Katrina gently, petting her and trying to soothe her, 
but without avail—every time Roran thought she was about to recover, 
Katrina began to cry with renewed intensity. Finally, Elain peered over 
Katrina’s quaking shoulder and said, “I’m taking her back to the house.” 


‘Tl come.” 


“No, you won't,” retorted Elain. “She needs time to calm down, and you 
have work to do. Do you want my advice?” Roran nodded dumbly. “Stay 
away until evening. I guarantee that she will be as right as rain by then. 
She can join the others tomorrow.” Without waiting for his response, 
Elain escorted the sobbing Katrina away from the wall of sharpened trees. 


Roran stood with his hands hanging limply by his sides, feeling dazed 
and helpless. What have we done? He regretted that he had not revealed 
their engagement to Sloan sooner. He regretted that he and Sloan could 
not work together to shield Katrina from the Empire. And he regretted 
that Katrina had been forced to relinquish her only family for him. He 
was now doubly responsible for her welfare. They had no choice but to 


176 


get married. I’ve made a terrible mess of this. He sighed and clenched his 
fist, wincing as his bruised knuckles stretched. 


“How are you?” asked Baldor, coming alongside him. 


Roran forced a smile. “It didn’t turn out quite how I hoped. Sloan’s be- 
yond reason when it comes to the Spine.” 


“And Katrina.” 
“That too. I—” Roran fell silent as Loring stopped before them. 


“That was a blasted fool thing to do!” growled the shoemaker, wrinkling 
his nose. Then he stuck out his chin, grinned, and bared his stumps of 
teeth. “But I ‘ope you and the girl have the best of luck.” He shook his 
head. “Heh, you're going to need it, Stronghammer!” 


“We're all going to need it,” snapped Thane as he walked past. 


Loring waved a hand. “Bah, sourpuss. Listen, Roran; I’ve lived in Carva- 
hall for many, many years, and in my experience, it’s better that this hap- 
pened now, instead of when we're all warm and cozy.” 


Baldor nodded, but Roran asked, “Why so?” 


“Isn't it obvious? Normally, you and Katrina would be the meat of gos- 
sip for the next nine months.” Loring put a finger on the side of his nose. 
“Ah, but this way, you'll soon be forgotten amid everything else that’s go- 
ing on, and then the two of you might even have some peace.” 


Roran frowned. “I'd rather be talked about than have those desecrators 
camped on the road.” 


“So would we all. Still, it’s something to be grateful for, and we all need 
something to be grateful for—'specially once you're married!” Loring 
cackled and pointed at Roran. “Your face just turned purple, boy!” 


Roran grunted and set about gathering Katrina’s possessions off the 
ground. As he did, he was interrupted by comments from whoever hap- 
pened to be nearby, none of which helped to settle his nerves. “Rotgut,” 
he muttered to himself after a particularly invidious remark. 


177 


Although the expedition into the Spine was delayed by the unusual 
scene the villagers had just witnessed, it was only slightly after midmorn- 
ing when the caravan of people and donkeys began to ascend the bare 
trail scratched into the side of Narnmor Mountain to the crest of the 
Igualda Falls. It was a steep climb and had to be taken slowly, on account 
of the children and the size of the burdens everyone carried. 


Roran spent most of his time caught behind Calitha—Thane’s wife— 
and her five children. He did not mind, as it gave him an opportunity to 
indulge his injured calf and to consider recent events at length. He was 
disturbed by his confrontation with Sloan. At least, he consoled himself, 
Katrina won't remain in Carvahall much longer. For Roran was convinced, 
in his heart of hearts, that the village would soon be defeated. It was a 
sobering, yet unavoidable, realization. 


He paused to rest three-quarters of the way up the mountain and 
leaned against a tree as he admired the elevated view of Palancar Valley. 
He tried to spot the Ra’zac’s camp—which he knew was just to the left 
of the Anora River and the road south—but was unable to discern even a 
wisp of smoke. 


Roran heard the roar of the Igualda Falls long before they came into 
sight. The falls appeared for all the world like a great snowy mane that 
billowed and drifted off Narnmor’s craggy head to the valley floor a half 
mile below. The massive stream curved in several directions as it fell, the 
result of different layers of wind. 


Past the slate ledge where the Anora River became airborne, down a 
glen filled with thimbleberries, and then finally into a large clearing 
guarded on one side by a pile of boulders, Roran found that those at the 
head of the procession had already begun setting up camp. The forest 
rang with the children’s shouts and cries. 


Removing his pack, Roran untied an ax from the top, then set about 
clearing the underbrush from the site along with several other men. 
When they finished, they began chopping down enough trees to encircle 
the camp. The aroma of pine sap filled the air. Roran worked quickly, the 
wood chips flying in unison with his rhythmic swings. 


By the time the fortifications were complete, the camp had already 


been erected with seventeen wool tents, four small cookfires, and glum 
expressions from people and donkeys alike. No one wanted to leave, and 


178 


no one wanted to stay. 


Roran surveyed the assortment of boys and old men clutching spears, 
and thought, Too much experience and too little. The grandfathers know 
how to deal with bears and the like, but will the grandsons have the 
strength to actually do it? Then he noticed the hard glint in the women’s 
eyes and realized that while they might hold a babe or be busy tending a 
scraped arm, their own shields and spears were never far from reach. Ro- 
ran smiled. Perhaps... perhaps we still have hope. 


He saw Nolfavrell sitting alone on a log—staring back toward Palancar 
Valley—and joined the boy, who looked at him seriously. “Are you leav- 
ing soon?” asked Nolfavrell. Roran nodded, impressed by his poise and 
determination. “You will do your best, won't you, to kill the Ra’zac and 
avenge my father? I would do it, except that Mama says I must guard my 
brothers and sisters.” 


‘Tll bring you their heads myself, if I can,” promised Roran. 
The boy’s chin trembled. “That is good!” 


“Nolfavrell...” Roran paused as he searched for the right words. “You are 
the only one here, besides me, who has killed a man. It doesn’t mean that 
we are better or worse than anyone else, but it means that I can trust you 
to fight well if you are attacked. When Katrina comes here tomorrow, 
will you make sure that she’s well protected?” 


Nolfavrell’s chest swelled with pride. “Ill guard her wherever she goes!” 
Then he looked regretful. “That is... when I don’t have to look after—’ 


Roran understood. “Oh, your family comes first. But maybe Katrina can 
stay in the tent with your brothers and sisters.” 


“Yes,” said Nolfavrell slowly. “Yes, I think that would work. You can 
rely on me.” 


“Thank you.” Roran clapped him on the shoulder. He could have asked 
an older and more capable person, but the adults were too busy with 
their own responsibilities to defend Katrina as he hoped. Nolfavrell, 
however, would have the opportunity and inclination to assure that she 
remained safe. He can hold my place while we are apart. Roran stood as 
Birgit approached. 


Eyeing him flatly, she said, “Come, it is time.” Then she hugged her son 


179 


and continued toward the falls with Roran and the other villagers who 
were returning to Carvahall. Behind them, everyone in the small camp 
clustered against the felled trees and stared forlornly out through their 
wooden bars. 


HIS ENEMY’S FACE 





As Roran proceeded about his work throughout the rest of the day, he 
felt Carvahall’s emptiness deep inside. It was as if part of himself had 
been extracted and hidden in the Spine. And with the children gone, the 
village now felt like an armed camp. The change seemed to have made 
everyone grim and grave. 


When the sun finally sank into the waiting teeth of the Spine, Roran 
climbed the hill to Horst’s house. He stopped before the front door and 
placed a hand on the knob, but remained there, unable to enter. Why 
does this frighten me as much as fighting? 


In the end, he forsook the front door entirely and went to the side of 
the house, where he slipped into the kitchen and, to his dismay, saw 
Elain knitting on one side of the table, speaking to Katrina, who was op- 
posite her. They both turned toward him, and Roran blurted, “Are... are 
you all right?” 


Katrina came to his side. “I’m fine.” She smiled softly. “It just was a ter- 
rible shock when Father... when...” She ducked her head for a moment. 
“Elain has been wonderfully kind to me. She agreed to lend me Baldor’s 
room for the night.” 


“I’m glad you are better,” said Roran. He hugged her, trying to convey 
all of his love and adoration through that simple touch. 


Elain wrapped up her knitting. “Come now. The sun has set, and it’s 
time you were off to bed, Katrina.” 


Roran reluctantly let go of Katrina, who kissed him on the cheek and 
said, “I'll see you in the morning.” 


He started to follow her out, but stopped when Elain said with a 
barbed tone, “Roran.” Her delicate face was hard and stern. 


“Yes?” 
Elain waited until they heard the creak of stairs that indicated Katrina 
was out of earshot. “I hope that you meant every promise you gave that 


girl, because if you didn’t, I'll call an assembly and have you exiled within 
a week.” 


181 


Roran was dumbfounded. “Of course I meant them. I love her.” 


“Katrina just surrendered everything she owned or cared about for you.” 
Elain stared up at him with unwavering eyes. “I’ve seen men who throw 
their affection at young maids, like grain tossed at chickens. The maids 
sigh and weep and believe that they are special, yet for the man, it’s only 
a trifling amusement. You have always been honorable, Roran, but one’s 
loins can turn even the most sensible person into a prancing booby or a 
sly, wicked fox. Are you one? For Katrina requires neither a fool, a trick- 
ster, nor even love; what she requires above all else is a man who will 
provide for her. If you abandon her, she will be the meanest person in 
Carvahall, forced to live off her friends, our first and only beggar. By the 
blood in my veins, I won't let that happen.” 


“Nor would I,” protested Roran. “I would have to be heartless, or worse, 
to do so.” 


Elain jerked her chin. “Exactly. Don’t forget that you intend to marry a 
woman who has lost both her dowry and her mother’s inheritance. Do 
you understand what it means for Katrina to lose her inheritance? She has 
no silver, no linens, no lace, nor any of the things needed for a well-run 
home. Such items are all we own, passed from mother to daughter since 
the day we first settled Alagaésia. They determine our worth. A woman 
without her inheritance is like... is like—’” 


“Is like a man without a farm or a trade,” said Roran. 


“Just so. It was cruel of Sloan to deny Katrina her inheritance, but that 
can't be helped now. Both you and she have no money or resources. Life 
is difficult enough without that added hardship. You'll be starting from 
nothing and with nothing. Does the prospect frighten you or seem un- 
bearable? So I ask you once again—and don't lie or the two of you will 
regret it for the rest of your lives—will you care for her without grudge 
or resentment?” 


“Ves.” 


Elain sighed and filled two earthen cups with cider from a jug hanging 
among the rafters. She handed one to Roran as she seated herself back at 
the table. “Then I suggest that you devote yourself to replacing Katrina’s 
home and inheritance so that she and any daughters you may have can 
stand without shame among the wives of Carvahall.” 


Roran sipped the cool cider. “If we live that long.” 


182 


“Aye.” She brushed back a strand of her blond hair and shook her head. 


“You've chosen a hard path, Roran.” 
“T had to make sure that Katrina would leave Carvahall.” 


Elain lifted an eyebrow. “So that was it. Well, I won't argue about it, 
but why on earth didn’t you speak to Sloan about your engagement be- 
fore this morning? When Horst asked my father, he gave our family 
twelve sheep, a sow, and eight pairs of wrought-iron candlesticks before 
he even knew if my parents would agree. That’s how it should be done. 
Surely you could have thought of a better strategy than striking your fa- 
ther-in-law-to-be.” 


A painful laugh escaped Roran. “I could have, but it never seemed the 
right time with all the attacks.” 


“The Ra’zac haven't attacked for almost six days now.” 


He scowled. “No, but... it was... Oh, I don’t know!” He banged his fist 
on the table with frustration. 


Elain put down her cup and wrapped her tiny hands around his. “If you 
can mend this rift between you and Sloan now, before years of resent- 
ment accumulate, your life with Katrina will be much, much easier. To- 
morrow morning you should go to his house and beg his forgiveness.” 


“I won't beg! Not to him.” 


“Roran, listen to me. It’s worth a month of begging to have peace in 
your family. I know from experience; strife does naught but make you 
miserable.” 


“Sloan hates the Spine. He'll have nothing to do with me.” 


“You have to try, though,” said Elain earnestly. “Even if he spurns your 
apology, at least you can’t be blamed for not making the effort. If you 
love Katrina, then swallow your pride and do what’s right for her. Don’t 
make her suffer for your mistake.” She finished her cider, used a tin hat to 
snuff the candles, and left Roran sitting alone in the dark. 


Several minutes elapsed before Roran could bring himself to stir. He 


stretched out an arm and traced along the counter’s edge until he felt the 
doorway, then proceeded upstairs, all the while running the tips of his 


183 


fingers over the carved walls to keep his balance. In his room, he disrobed 
and threw himself lengthwise on the bed. 


Wrapping his arms around his wool-stuffed pillow, Roran listened to 
the faint sounds that drifted through the house at night: the scrabble of a 
mouse in the attic and its intermittent squeaks, the groan of wood beams 
cooling in the night, the whisper and caress of wind at the lintel of his 
window, and... and the rustle of slippers in the hall outside his room. 


He watched as the latch above the doorknob was pulled free of its 
hook, then the door inched forward with a rasp of protest. It paused. A 
dark form slipped inside, the door closed, and Roran felt a curtain of hair 
brush his face along with lips like rose petals. He sighed. 


Katrina. 


A thunderclap tore Roran from sleep. 


Light flared on his face as he struggled to regain awareness, like a diver 
desperate to reach the surface. He opened his eyes and saw a jagged hole 
blasted through his door. Six soldiers rushed through the yawning cleft, 
followed by the two Ra’zac, who seemed to fill the room with their 
ghastly presence. A sword was pressed against Roran’s neck. Beside him, 
Katrina screamed and pulled the blankets around her. 


“Up,” ordered the Ra’zac. Roran cautiously got to his feet. His heart felt 
like it was about to explode in his chest. “Tie his handsss and bring him.” 


As a soldier approached Roran with rope, Katrina screamed again and 
jumped on the men, biting and clawing furiously. Her sharp nails fur- 
rowed their faces, drawing streams of blood that blinded the cursing sol- 
diers. 


Roran dropped to one knee and grabbed his hammer from the floor, 
then planted his feet, swinging the hammer over his head and roaring like 
a bear. The soldiers threw themselves at him in an attempt to subdue 
him through sheer numbers, but to no avail: Katrina was in danger, and 
he was invincible. Shields crumpled beneath his blows, brigandines and 
mail split under his merciless weapon, and helmets caved in. Two men 
were wounded, and three fell to rise no more. 


The clang and clamor had roused the household; Roran dimly heard 


184 


Horst and his sons shouting in the hall. The Ra’zac hissed to one another, 
then scuttled forward and grasped Katrina with inhuman strength, lifting 
her off the floor as they fled the room. 


“Roran!” she shrieked. 


Summoning his energy, Roran bowled past the two remaining men. He 
stumbled into the hall and saw the Ra’zac climbing out a window. Roran 
dashed toward them and struck at the last Ra’zac, just as it was about to 
descend below the windowsill. Jerking upward, the Ra’zac caught Roran’s 
wrist in midair and chittered with delight, blowing its fetid breath onto 
his face. “Yesss! You are the one we want!” 


Roran tried to twist free, but the Ra’zac did not budge. With his free 
hand, Roran buffeted the creature’s head and shoulders—which were as 
hard as iron. Desperate and enraged, he seized the edge of the Ra’zac’s 
hood and wrenched it back, exposing its features. 


A hideous, tortured face screamed at him. The skin was shiny black, 
like a beetle carapace. The head was bald. Each lidless eye was the size of 
his fist and gleamed like an orb of polished hematite; no iris or pupil ex- 
isted. In place of a nose, mouth, and chin, a thick beak hooked to a sharp 
point that clacked over a barbed purple tongue. 


Roran yelled and jammed his heels against the sides of the window 
frame, struggling to free himself from the monstrosity, but the Ra’zac in- 
exorably drew him out of the house. He could see Katrina on the ground, 
still screaming and fighting. 


Just as Roran’s knees buckled, Horst appeared by his side and wrapped 
a knotted arm around his chest, locking him in place. “Someone get a 
spear!” shouted the smith. He snarled, veins bulging on his neck from the 
strain of holding Roran. “It'll take more than this demon spawn to best 
us!” 


The Ra’zac gave a final yank, then, when it failed to dislodge Roran, 
cocked its head and said, “You areoursss |” It lunged forward with blind- 
ing speed, and Roran howled as he felt the Ra’zac’s beak close on his right 
shoulder, snipping through the front of the muscle. His wrist cracked at 
the same time. With a malicious cackle, the Ra’zac released him and fell 
backward into the night. 


Horst and Roran sprawled against each other in the hallway. “They 
have Katrina,” groaned Roran. His vision flickered and went black around 


185 


the edges as he pushed himself upright on his left arm—his right hung 
useless. Albriech and Baldor emerged from his room, splattered with 
gore. Only corpses remained behind them. Now I have killed eight. Roran 
retrieved his hammer and staggered down the hall, finding his way 
blocked by Elain in her white sleeping shift. 


She looked at him with wide eyes, then took his arm and pushed him 
down onto a wood chest set against the wall. “You have to see Gertrude.” 


“But—’ 
“You'll pass out if this bleeding isn’t stopped.” 


He looked down at his right side; it was drenched in crimson. “We have 
to rescue Katrina before’—he clenched his teeth as the pain surged— 
“before they do anything to her.” 


“He’s right; we can’t wait,” said Horst, looming over them. “Bind him up 
as best you can, then we'll go.” Elain pursed her lips and hurried to the 
linen closet. She returned with several rags, which she wrapped tightly 
around Roran’s torn shoulder and his fractured wrist. Meanwhile, Al- 
briech and Baldor scavenged armor and swords from the soldiers. Horst 
contented himself with just a spear. 


Elain put her hands on Horst’s chest and said, “Be careful.” She looked 
at her sons. “All of you.” 


“We'll be fine, Mother,” promised Albriech. She forced a smile and 
kissed them on the cheek. 


They left the house and ran to the edge of Carvahall, where they found 
that the wall of trees had been pulled open and the watchman, Byrd, 
slain. Baldor knelt and examined the body, then said with a choked voice, 
“He was stabbed from behind.” Roran barely heard him through the 
pounding in his ears. Dizzy, he leaned against a house and panted for 


breath. 
“Ho! Who goes?” 


From their stations along Carvahall’s perimeter, the other watchmen 
congregated around their murdered compatriot, forming a huddle of 
shuttered lanterns. In hushed tones, Horst described the attack and 
Katrina’s plight. “Who will help us?” he asked. After a quick discussion, 
five men agreed to accompany them; the rest would remain to guard the 


186 


breach in the wall and rouse the villagers. 


Pushing himself off the house, Roran trotted to the head of the group as 
it slipped through the fields and down the valley toward the Ra’zac’s 
camp. Every step was agony, yet it did not matter; nothing mattered ex- 
cept Katrina. He stumbled once and Horst wordlessly caught him. 


Half a mile from Carvahall, Ivor spotted a sentry on a hillock, which 
compelled them to make a wide detour. A few hundred yards beyond, 
the ruddy glow of torches became visible. Roran raised his good arm to 
slow their advance, then began to dodge and crawl through the tangled 
grass, startling a jackrabbit. The men followed Roran’s lead as he worked 
his way to the edge of a grove of cattails, where he stopped and parted 
the curtain of stalks to observe the thirteen remaining soldiers. 


Where is she? 


In contrast to when they had first arrived, the soldiers appeared sullen 
and haggard, their weapons nicked and their armor dented. Most of them 
wore bandages that were rusty with splotches of dried blood. The men 
were clumped together, facing the two Ra’zac—both of whom were now 
hooded—across a low fire. 


One man was shouting: “... over half of us killed by a bunch of inbred, 
cockle-brained woodrats that can’t tell a pike from a poleax or find the 
point of a sword even if it’s lodged in their gut, because you don’t have 
half the sense my banner boy does! I don’t care if Galbatorix himself licks 
your boots clean, we won't do a thing until we have a new commander.” 
The men nodded. “One who’s human. ” 


“Really?” demanded the Ra’zac softly. 


“We've had enough taking orders from hunchbacks like you, with all 
your clicking and teapot whistling—makes us sick! And I don’t know 
what you did with Sardson, but if you stay another night, we'll put steel 
in you and find out if you bleed like us. You can leave the girl, though, 
she'll be—” 


The man did not get a chance to continue, for the largest Ra’zac 
jumped across the fire and landed on his shoulders, like a giant crow. 
Screaming, the soldier collapsed under the weight. He tried to draw his 
sword, but the Ra’zac pecked twice at his neck with its hidden beak, and 
he was still. 


“We have to fight that ?” muttered Ivor behind Roran. 


The soldiers remained frozen with shock as the two Ra’zac lapped from 
the neck of the corpse. When the black creatures rose, they rubbed their 
knobby hands together, as if they were washing, and said, “Yesss. We will 
go. Stay if you wisssh; reinforsssements are only daysss away.” The Ra’zac 
threw back their heads and began to shriek at the sky, the wail becoming 
increasingly shrill until it passed from hearing. 


Roran looked up as well. At first he saw nothing, but then a nameless 
terror gripped him as two barbed shadows appeared high over the Spine, 
eclipsing the stars. They advanced quickly, growing larger and larger until 
they obscured half the sky with their ominous presence. A foul wind 
rushed across the land, bringing with it a sulfurous miasma that made Ro- 
ran cough and gag. 


The soldiers were likewise afflicted; their curses echoed as they pressed 
sleeves and scarves over their noses. 


Above them, the shadows paused and then began to drift downward, 
enclosing the camp in a dome of menacing darkness. The sickly torches 
flickered and threatened to extinguish themselves, yet they still provided 
sufficient light to reveal the two beasts descending among the tents. 


Their bodies were naked and _ hairless—like newborn mice—with 
leathery gray skin pulled tight across their corded chests and bellies. In 
form they resembled starved dogs, except that their hind legs bulged 
with enough muscle to crush a boulder. A narrow crest extended from 
the back of each of their attenuated heads, opposite a long, straight, eb- 
ony beak made for spearing prey, and cold, bulbous eyes identical to the 
Ra’zac’s. From their shoulders and backs sprang huge wings that made the 
air moan under their weight. 


Flinging themselves to the ground, the soldiers cowered and hid their 
faces from the monsters. A terrible, alien intelligence emanated from the 
creatures, bespeaking a race far older and far more powerful than hu- 
mans. Roran was suddenly afraid that his mission might fail. Behind him, 
Horst whispered to the men, urging them to hold their ground and re- 
main hidden, else they would be slain. 


The Ra’zac bowed to the beasts, then slipped into a tent and returned 


carrying Katrina—who was bound with ropes—and leading Sloan. The 
butcher walked freely. 


188 


Roran stared, unable to comprehend how Sloan had been captured. His 
house isn’t anywhere near Horst’s. Then it struck him. “He betrayed us,” 
said Roran with wonder. His fist slowly tightened on his hammer as the 
true horror of the situation exploded within him.” He killed Byrd and he 
betrayed us!” Tears of rage streamed down his face. 


“Roran,” murmured Horst, crouching beside him. “We can’t attack now; 
they’d slaughter us. Roran... do you hear me?” 


He heard but a whisper in the distance as he watched the smaller 
Ra’zac jump onto one beast above the shoulders, then catch Katrina as 
the other Ra’zac tossed her up. Sloan seemed upset and frightened now. 
He began arguing with the Ra’zac, shaking his head and pointing at the 
ground. Finally, the Ra’zac struck him across the mouth, knocking him 
unconscious. Mounting the second beast, with the butcher slung over its 
shoulder, the largest Ra’zac declared, “We will return once it isss sssafe 
again. Kill the boy, and your livesss are forfeit.” Then the steeds flexed 
their massive thighs and leaped into the sky, once again shadows upon 
the field of stars. 


No words or emotions were left to Roran. He was utterly destroyed. 
All that remained was to kill the soldiers. He stood and raised his ham- 
mer in preparation to charge, but as he stepped forward, his head 
throbbed in unison with his wounded shoulder, the ground vanished in a 
burst of light, and he toppled into oblivion. 


ARROW TO THE HEART 





Every day since leaving the outpost of Ceris was a hazy dream of warm 
afternoons spent paddling up Eldor Lake and then the Gaena River. All 
around them, water gurgled through the tunnel of verdant pines that 
wound ever deeper into Du Weldenvarden. 


Eragon found traveling with the elves delightful. Nari and Lifaen were 
perpetually smiling, laughing, and singing songs, especially when Saphira 
was around. They rarely looked elsewhere or spoke of another subject 
but her in her presence. 


However, the elves were not human, no matter the similarity of ap- 
pearance. They moved too quickly, too fluidly, for creatures born of sim- 
ple flesh and blood. And when they spoke, they often used roundabout 
expressions and aphorisms that left Eragon more confused than when 
they began. In between their bursts of merriment, Lifaen and Nari would 
remain silent for hours, observing their surroundings with a glow of 
peaceful rapture on their faces. If Eragon or Orik attempted to talk with 
them during their contemplation, they would receive only a word or two 
in response. 


It made Eragon appreciate how direct and forthright Arya was by com- 
parison. In fact, she seemed uneasy around Lifaen and Nari, as if she were 
no longer sure how to behave with her own kind. 


From the prow of the canoe, Lifaen looked over his shoulder and said, 
“Tell me, Eragon-finiarel.... What do your people sing about in these dark 
days? I remember the epics and lays I heard in Ilirea—sagas of your proud 
kings and earls—but it was long, long ago and the memories are like 
withered flowers in my mind. What new works have your people cre- 
ated?” Eragon frowned as he tried to recall the names of stories Brom had 
recited. When Lifaen heard them, he shook his head sorrowfully and said, 
“So much has been lost. No court ballads survive, and, if you speak truly, 
nor does most of your history or art, except for fanciful tales Galbatorix 
has allowed to thrive.” 


“Brom once told us about the fall of the Riders,” said Eragon defen- 
sively. An image of a deer bounding over rotting logs flashed behind his 


eyes from Saphira, who was off hunting. 


“Ah, a brave man.” For a minute, Lifaen paddled silently. “We too sing 
about the Fall... but rarely. Most of us were alive when Vrael entered the 


190 


void, and we still grieve for our burned cities—the red lilies of Ewayéna, 
the crystals of Luthivira—and for our slain families. Time cannot dull the 
pain of those wounds, not if a thousand thousand years pass and the sun 
itself dies, leaving the world to float in eternal night.” 


Orik grunted in the back. “As it is with the dwarves. Remember, elf, 
we lost an entire clan to Galbatorix.” 


“And we lost our king, Evandar.” 
“I never heard that,” said Eragon, surprised. 


Lifaen nodded as he guided them around a submerged rock. “Few have. 
Brom could have told you about it; he was there when the fatal blow was 
struck. Before Vrael’s death, the elves faced Galbatorix on the plains of 
Ilirea in our final attempt to defeat him. There Evandar—’” 


“Where is Ilirea?” asked Eragon. 
“It’s Urt’baen, boy,” said Orik. “Used to be an elf city.” 


Unperturbed by the interruption, Lifaen continued: “As you say, Ilirea 
was one of our cities. We abandoned it during our war with the dragons, 
and then, centuries later, humans adopted it as their capital after King 
Palancar was exiled.” 


Eragon said, “King Palancar? Who was he? Is that how Palancar Valley 
got its name?” 


This time the elf turned and looked at him with amusement. “You 
have as many questions as leaves on a tree, Argetlam.” 


“Brom was of the same opinion.” 


Lifaen smiled, then paused, as if to gather his thoughts. “When your an- 
cestors arrived in Alagaésia eight hundred years ago, they roamed far 
across it, seeking a suitable place to live. Eventually, they settled in Palan- 
car Valley—though it was not called such then—as it was one of the few 
defendable locations that we or the dwarves had not claimed. There your 
king, Palancar, began to build a mighty state. 


“In an attempt to expand his borders, he declared war against us, 


though we had offered no provocation. Three times he attacked, and 
three times we prevailed. Our strength frightened Palancar’s nobles and 


191 


they pled with their liege for peace. He ignored their counsel. Then the 
lords approached us with a treaty, which we signed without the king’s 
knowledge. 


“With our help, Palancar was usurped and banished, but he, his family, 
and their vassals refused to leave the valley. Since we had no wish to 
murder them, we constructed the tower of Ristvak’baen so the Riders 
could watch over Palancar and ensure he would never again rise to power 
or attack anyone else in Alagaésia. 


“Before long Palancar was killed by a son who did not wish to wait for 
nature to take its course. Thereafter, family politics consisted of assassina- 
tion, betrayal, and other depravities, reducing Palancar’s house to a 
shadow of its former grandeur. However, his descendants never left, and 
the blood of kings still runs in Therinsford and Carvahall.” 


“I see,” said Eragon. 


Lifaen lifted one dark eyebrow. “Do you? It has more significance than 
you may think. It was this event that convinced Anurin—Vrael’s prede- 
cessor as head Rider—to allow humans to become Riders, in order to 
prevent similar disputes.” 


Orik emitted a bark of laughter. “That must have caused some argu- 
ment.” 


“It was an unpopular decision,” admitted Lifaen. “Even now some ques- 
tion the wisdom of it. It caused such a disagreement between Anurin and 
Queen Dellanir that Anurin seceded from our government and estab- 
lished the Riders on Vroengard as an independent entity.” 


“But if the Riders were separated from your government, then how 
could they keep the peace, as they were supposed to?” asked Eragon. 


“They couldn't,” said Lifaen. “Not until Queen Dellanir saw the wisdom 
of having the Riders free of any lord or king and restored their access to 
Du Weldenvarden. Still, it never pleased her that any authority could su- 
persede her own.” 


Eragon frowned. “Wasn't that the whole point, though?” 
“Yes... and no. The Riders were supposed to guard against the failings of 


the different governments and races, yet who watched the watchers? It 
was that very problem that caused the Fall. No one existed who could 


192 


descry the flaws within the Riders’ own system, for they were above 
scrutiny, and thus, they perished.” 


Eragon stroked the water—first on one side and then the other—while 
he considered Lifaen’s words. His paddle fluttered in his hands as it cut 
diagonally across the current. “Who succeeded Dellanir as king or queen?” 


“Evandar did. He took the knotted throne five hundred years ago— 
when Dellanir abdicated in order to study the mysteries of magic—and 
held it until his death. Now his mate, Islanzadi, rules us.” 


“That’s—” Eragon stopped with his mouth open. He was going to say 
impossible, but then realized how ridiculous the statement would sound. 
Instead, he asked, “Are elves immortal?” 


In a soft voice, Lifaen said, “Once we were like you, bright, fleeting, and 
as ephemeral as the morning dew. Now our lives stretch endlessly 
through the dusty years. Aye, we are immortal, although we are still vul- 
nerable to injuries of the flesh.” 


“You became immortal? How?” The elf refused to elaborate, though Er- 
agon pressed him for details. Finally, Eragon asked, “How old is Arya?” 


Lifaen turned his glittering eyes on him, probing Eragon with discon- 
certing acuteness. “Arya? What is your interest in her?” 


J...” Eragon faltered, suddenly unsure of his intentions. His attraction to 
Arya was complicated by the fact that she was an elf, and that her age, 
whatever it might be, was so much greater than his own. She must view 
me as a child. “I don’t know,” he said honestly. “But she saved both my 
life and Saphira’s, and I’m curious to know more about her.” 


“I feel ashamed,” said Lifaen, pronouncing each word carefully, “for ask- 
ing such a question. Among our kind, it is rude to pry into one’s affairs... 
Only, I must say, and I believe that Orik agrees with me, that you would 
do well to guard your heart, Argetlam. Now is not the time to lose it, nor 
would it be well placed in this instance.” 


“Aye,” grunted Orik. 
Heat suffused Eragon as blood rushed to his face, like hot tallow melt- 
ing through him. Before he could utter a retort, Saphira entered his mind 


and said, And now is the time to guard your tongue. They mean well. Don’t 
insult them. 


193 


He took a deep breath and tried to let his embarrassment drain away. 
Do you agree with them? 


I believe, Eragon, that you are full of love and that you are looking for one 
who will reciprocate your affection. No shame exists in that. 


He struggled to digest her words, then finally said, Will you be back 
soon? 


I’m on my way now. 


Returning his attention to his surroundings, Eragon found that both the 
elf and the dwarf were watching him. “I understand your concern... and 
I'd still like my question answered.” 


Lifaen hesitated briefly. “Arya is quite young. She was born a year be- 
fore the destruction of the Riders.” 


A hundred! Though he had expected such a figure, Eragon was still 
shocked. He concealed it behind a blank face, thinking, She could have 
great-grandchildren older than me! He brooded on the subject for several 
minutes and then, to distract himself, said, “You mentioned that humans 
discovered Alagaésia eight hundred years ago. Yet Brom said that we ar- 
rived three centuries after the Riders were formed, which was thousands 
of years ago.” 


“Two thousand, seven hundred, and four years, by our reckoning,” de- 
clared Orik. “Brom was right, if you consider a single ship with twenty 
warriors the ‘arrival’ of humans in Alagaésia. They landed in the south, 
where Surda is now. We met while they were exploring and exchanged 
gifts, but then they departed and we didn’t see another human for almost 
two millennia, or until King Palancar arrived with a fleet in tow. The 
humans had completely forgotten us by then, except for vague stories 
about hairy men-of-the-mountains that preyed on children in the night. 
Bah!” 


“Do you know where Palancar came from?” asked Eragon. 
Orik frowned and gnawed the tip of his mustache, then shook his head. 
“Our histories only say that his homeland was far to the south, beyond 


the Beors, and that his exodus was the result of war and famine.” 


Excited by an idea, Eragon blurted, “So there might be countries else- 


194 


where that could help us against Galbatorix.” 


“Possibly,” said Orik. “But they would be difficult to find, even on 
dragonback, and I doubt that you’d speak the same language. Who would 
want to help us, though? The Varden have little to offer another country, 
and it’s hard enough to get an army from Farthen Dtr to Urt’baen, much 
less bring forces from hundreds, if not thousands, of miles away.” 


“We could not spare you anyway,” said Lifaen to Eragon. 


“I still—’ Eragon broke off as Saphira soared over the river, followed by 
a furious crowd of sparrows and blackbirds intent on driving her away 
from their nests. At the same time, a chorus of squeaks and chatters burst 
from the armies of squirrels hidden among the branches. 


Lifaen beamed and cried, “Isn’t she glorious? See how her scales catch 
the light! No treasure in the world can match this sight.” Similar exclama- 
tions floated across the river from Nari. 


“Bloody unbearable, that’s what it is,’ muttered Orik into his beard. Er- 
agon hid a smile, though he agreed with the dwarf. The elves never 
seemed to tire of praising Saphira. 


Nothing’s wrong with a few compliments, said Saphira. She landed with a 
gigantic splash and submerged her head to escape a diving sparrow. 


Of course not, said Eragon. 
Saphira eyed him from underwater. Was that sarcasm? 


He chuckled and let it pass. Glancing at the other boat, Eragon watched 
Arya paddle, her back perfectly straight, her face inscrutable as she 
floated through webs of mottled light beneath the mossy trees. She 
seemed so dark and somber, it made him want to comfort her. “Lifaen,” 
he asked softly so that Orik would not hear, “why is Arya so... unhappy? 
You and—” 


Lifaen’s shoulders stiffened underneath his russet tunic and he whis- 
pered, so low that Eragon could barely hear, “We are honored to serve 
Arya Dréttningu. She has suffered more than you can imagine for our 
people. We celebrate out of joy for what she has achieved with Saphira, 
and we weep in our dreams for her sacrifice... and her loss. Her sorrows 
are her own, though, and I cannot reveal them without her permission.” 


195 


As Eragon sat by their nightly campfire, petting a swatch of moss that 
felt like rabbit fur, he heard a commotion deeper in the forest. Exchang- 
ing glances with Saphira and Orik, he crept toward the sound, drawing 
Zar roc. 


Eragon stopped at the lip of a small ravine and looked across to the 
other side, where a gyrfalcon with a broken wing thrashed in a bed of 
snowberries. The raptor froze when it saw him, then opened its beak and 
uttered a piercing screech. 


What a terrible fate, to be unable to fly, said Saphira. 


When Arya arrived, she eyed the gyrfalcon, then strung her bow and, 
with unerring aim, shot it through the breast. At first Eragon thought that 
she had done it for food, but she made no move to retrieve either the 
bird or her arrow. 


“Why?” he asked. 


With a hard expression, Arya unstrung her bow. “It was too injured for 
me to heal and would have died tonight or tomorrow. Such is the nature 
of things. I saved it hours of suffering.” 


Saphira lowered her head and touched Arya on the shoulder with her 
snout, then returned to their camp, her tail scraping bark off the trees. As 
Eragon started to follow, he felt Orik tug his sleeve and bent down to 
hear the dwarf say in an undertone, “Never ask an elf for help; they might 
decide that you're better off dead, eh?” 


THE DAGSHELGR INVOCATION 





Though he was tired from the previous day, Eragon forced himself to 
rise before dawn in an attempt to catch one of the elves asleep. It had 
become a game with him to discover when the elves got up—or if they 
slept at all—as he had yet to see any of them with their eyes closed. To- 
day was no exception. 


“Good morning,” said Nari and Lifaen from above him. Eragon craned 
back his head and saw that they each stood on the bough of a pine tree, 
over fifty feet in the air. Jumping from branch to branch with feline 
grace, the elves dropped to the ground alongside him. 


“We have been keeping watch,” explained Lifaen. 
“For what?” 


Arya stepped around a tree and said, “For my fears. Du Weldenvarden 
has many mysteries and dangers, especially for a Rider. We have lived 
here for thousands of years, and old spells still linger in unexpected 
places; magic permeates the air, the water, and the earth. In places it has 
affected the animals. Sometimes strange creatures are found roaming the 
forest, and not all of them friendly.” 


“Are they—” Eragon stopped as his gedwéy ignasia tingled. The silver 
hammer on the necklace Gannel had given him grew hot on his chest, 
and he felt the amulet’s spell draw upon his strength. 


Someone was trying to scry him. 

Is it Galbatorix? he wondered, frightened. He clutched the necklace 
and pulled it out of his tunic, ready to yank it off should he become too 
weak. From the other side of the camp, Saphira rushed to his side, bol- 
stering him with her own reserves of energy. 

A moment later, the heat leached out of the hammer, leaving it cold 
against Eragon’s skin. He bounced it on his palm, then tucked it back un- 
der his clothes, whereupon Saphira said, Our enemies are searching for us. 


Enemies? Could not it be someone in Du Vrangr Gata? 


I think Hrothgar would have told Nasuada that he ordered Gannel to en- 
chant you this necklace.... She might have even come up with the idea in the 


197 


first place. 


Arya frowned when Eragon explained what had occurred. “This makes 
it all the more important we reach Ellesméra quickly so your training can 
resume. Events in Alagaésia move apace, and I fear you won't have ade- 
quate time for your studies.” 


Eragon wanted to discuss it further, but lost the opportunity in the 
rush to leave camp. Once the canoes were loaded and the fire tamped 
out, they continued to forge up the Gaena River. 


They had only been on the water for an hour when Eragon noticed that 
the river was growing wider and deeper. A few minutes later, they came 
upon a waterfall that filled Du Weldenvarden with its throbbing rumble. 
The cataract was about a hundred feet tall, and streamed down a stone 
face with an overhang that made it impossible to climb. “How do we get 
past that?” He could already feel cool spray on his face. 


Lifaen pointed at the left shore, some distance from the falls, where a 
trail had been worn up the steep ridge. “We have to portage our canoes 
and supplies for half a league before the river clears.” 


The five of them untied the bundles wedged between the seats of the 
canoes and divided the supplies into piles that they stuffed into their 
packs. “Ugh,” said Eragon, hefting his load. It was twice as heavy as what 
he usually carried when traveling on foot. 


I could fly it upstream for you... all of it, offered Saphira, crawling onto 
the muddy bank and shaking herself dry. 


When Eragon repeated her suggestion, Lifaen looked horrified. “We 
would never dream of using a dragon as a beast of burden. It would dis- 
honor you, Saphira—and Eragon as Shur’tugal—and it would shame our 
hospitality.” 


Saphira snorted, and a plume of flame erupted from her nostrils, vapor- 
izing the surface of the river and creating a cloud of steam. This is non- 
sense. Reaching past Eragon with one scaly leg, she hooked her talons 
through the packs’ shoulder straps, then took off over their heads. Catch 
me if you can! 


A peal of clear laughter broke the silence, like the trill of a mocking- 


bird. Amazed, Eragon turned and looked at Arya. It was the first time he 
had ever heard her laugh; he loved the sound. She smiled at Lifaen. “You 


198 


have much to learn if you presume to tell a dragon what she may or may 
not do.” 


“But the dishonor—” 


‘It is no dishonor if Saphira does it of her free will,” asserted Arya. 
“Now, let us go before we waste any more time.” 


Hoping that the strain would not trigger the pain in his back, Eragon 
picked up his canoe with Lifaen and fit it over his shoulders. He was 
forced to rely on the elf to guide him along the trail, as he could only see 
the ground beneath his feet. 


An hour later, they had topped the ridge and hiked beyond the danger- 
ous white water to where the Gaena River was once again calm and 
glassy. Waiting for them was Saphira, who was busy catching fish in the 
shallows, jabbing her triangular head into the water like a heron. 


Arya called her over and said to both her and Eragon, “Beyond the next 
curve lies Ardwen Lake and, upon its western shore, Silthrim, one of our 
greatest cities. Past that, a vast expanse of forest still separates us from 
Ellesméra. We will encounter many elves close to Silthrim. However, I 
don’t want either of you to be seen until we speak with Queen Islanzadi.” 


Why? asked Saphira, echoing Eragon’s thoughts. 


In her musical accent, Arya answered: “Your presence represents a 
great and terrible change for our kingdom, and such shifts are dangerous 
unless handled with care. The queen must be the first to meet with you. 
Only she has the authority and wisdom to oversee this transition.” 


“You speak highly of her,” commented Eragon. 


At his words, Nari and Lifaen stopped and watched Arya with guarded 
eyes. Her face went blank, then she drew herself up proudly. “She has led 
us well.... Eragon, I know you carry a hooded cape from Tronjheim. Until 
we are free of possible observers, will you wear it and keep your head 
covered so that none can see your rounded ears and know that you are 
human?” He nodded. “And, Saphira, you must hide during the day and 
catch up with us at night. Ajihad told me that is what you did in the 
Empire.” 


And I hated every moment of it, she growled. 


199 


‘It’s only for today and tomorrow. After that we will be far enough 
away from Silthrim that we won't have to worry about encountering 
anyone of consequence,” promised Arya. 


Saphira turned her azure eyes on Eragon. When we escaped the Empire, I 
swore that I would always stay close enough to protect you. Every time I 
leave, bad things happen: Yazuac, Daret, Dras-Leona, the slavers. 


Not in Teirm. 


You know what I mean! I'm especially loath to leave since you can't de- 
fend yourself with your crippled back. 


I trust that Arya and the others will keep me safe. Don’t you? 


Saphira hesitated. I trust Arya. She twisted away and padded up the 
riverbank, sat for a minute, then returned. Very well. She broadcast her 
acceptance to Arya, adding, But I won’t wait any longer than tomorrow 
night, even if you’re in the middle of Silthrim at the time. 


“I understand,” said Arya. “You will still have to be careful when flying 
after dark, as elves can see clearly on all but the blackest nights. If you are 
sighted by chance, you could be attacked by magic.” 


Wonderful, commented Saphira. 


While Orik and the elves repacked the boats, Eragon and Saphira ex- 
plored the dim forest, searching for a suitable hiding place. They settled 
on a dry hollow rimmed by crumbling rocks and blanketed with a bed of 
pine needles that were pleasantly soft underfoot. Saphira curled up on 
the ground and nodded her head. Go now. I will be fine. 


Eragon hugged her neck—careful to avoid her sharp spines—and then 
reluctantly departed, glancing backward. At the river, he donned his cape 
before they resumed their journey. 


The air was motionless when Ardwen Lake came into view, and as a 
result, the vast mantle of water was smooth and flat, a perfect mirror for 
the trees and clouds. The illusion was so flawless, Eragon felt as if he 
were looking through a window at another world and that if they contin- 
ued forward, the canoes would fall endlessly into the reflected sky. He 
shivered at the thought. 


In the hazy distance, numerous white birch-bark boats darted like wa- 


200 


ter striders along both shores, propelled to incredible speeds by the elves’ 
strength. Eragon ducked his head and tugged on the edge of his hood to 
ensure that it covered his face. 


His link with Saphira grew ever more tenuous the farther apart they 
became, until only a wisp of thought connected them. By evening he 
could no longer feel her presence, even if he strained his mind to its lim- 
its. All of a sudden, Du Weldenvarden seemed much more lonely and 
desolate. 


As the gloom deepened, a cluster of white lights—placed at every con- 
ceivable height among the trees—sprang into existence a mile ahead. The 
sparks glowed with the silver radiance of the full moon, eerie and myste- 
rious in the night. 


“There lies Silthrim,” said Lifaen. 


With a faint splash, a dark boat passed them from the opposite direc- 
tion, accompanied by a murmur of “Kvetha Fricai” from the elf steering. 


Arya brought her canoe alongside Eragon’s. “We will stop here tonight.” 


They made camp a ways from Ardwen Lake, where the ground was 
dry enough to sleep on. The ferocious droves of mosquitoes forced Arya 
to cast a protective spell so that they could eat dinner in relative comfort. 


Afterward, the five of them sat around the fire, staring at the gold 
flames. Eragon leaned his head against a tree and watched a meteor streak 
across the sky. His eyelids were about to sink shut when a woman’s voice 
drifted through the woods from Silthrim, a faint susurration that brushed 
the inside of his ear like a down feather. He frowned and straightened, 
trying to better hear the tenuous whisper. 


Like a thread of smoke that thickens as a newborn fire blazes to life, so 
the voice rose in strength until the forest sighed with a teasing, twisting 
melody that leaped and fell with wild abandon. More voices joined the 
unearthly song, embroidering the original theme with a hundred varia- 
tions. The air itself seemed to shimmer with the fabric of the tempestu- 
ous music. 


The fey strains sent jolts of elation and fear down Eragon’s spine; they 
clouded his senses, drawing him into the velvet night. Seduced by the 
haunting notes, he jumped to his feet, ready to dash through the forest 
until he found the source of the voices, ready to dance among the trees 


201 


and moss, anything so that he could join the elves’ revels. But before he 
could move, Arya caught his arm and yanked him around to face her. 


“Eragon! Clear your mind!” He struggled in a futile attempt to break 
her grip. “Eyddr eyreya onr!” Empty your ears! Everything fell silent then, 
as if he had gone deaf. He stopped fighting and looked around, wondering 
what had just occurred. On the other side of the fire, Lifaen and Nari 
wrestled noiselessly with Orik. 


Eragon watched Arya’s mouth move as she spoke, then sound returned 
to the world with a pop, though he could no longer hear the music. 
“What... ?” he asked, dazed. 


“Gerr’off me,” growled Orik. Lifaen and Nari lifted their hands and 
backed away. 


“Your pardon, Orik-vodhr,” said Lifaen. 


Arya gazed toward Silthrim. “I miscounted the days; I didn’t want to be 
anywhere near a city during Dagshelgr. Our saturnalias, our celebrations, 
are perilous for mortals. We sing in the ancient language, and the lyrics 
weave spells of passion and longing that are difficult to resist, even for 


” 


us. 
Nari stirred restlessly. “We should be at a grove.” 
“We should,” agreed Arya, “but we will do our duty and wait.” 


Shaken, Eragon sat closer to the fire, wishing for Saphira; he was sure 
she could have protected his mind from the music’s influence. “What is 
the point of Dagshelgr?” he asked. 


Arya joined him on the ground, crossing her long legs. “It is to keep the 
forest healthy and fertile. Every spring we sing for the trees, we sing for 
the plants, and we sing for the animals. Without us, Du Weldenvarden 
would be half its size.” As if to emphasize her point, birds, deer, squir- 
rels—red and gray—striped badgers, foxes, rabbits, wolves, frogs, toads, 
tortoises, and every other nearby animal forsook their hiding and began to 
rush madly about with a cacophony of yelps and cries. “They are search- 
ing for mates,” explained Arya. “All across Du Weldenvarden, in each of 
our cities, elves are singing this song. The more who participate, the 
stronger the spell, and the greater Du Weldenvarden will be this year.” 


Eragon snatched back his hand as a trio of hedgehogs trundled past his 


202 


thigh. The entire forest yammered with noise. I’ve stepped into fairyland, 
he thought, hugging himself. 


Orik came around the fire and raised his voice above the clamor: “By 
my beard and my ax, I'll not be controlled against my will by magic. If it 
happens again, Arya, I swear on Helzvog’s stone girdle that I’ll return to 
Farthen Dar and you will have the wrath of Dirgrimst Ingeitum to deal 
with.” 


“It was not my intention for you to experience Dagshelgr,” said Arya. “I 
apologize for my mistake. However, though I am shielding you from this 
spell, you cannot escape magic in Du Weldenvarden; it permeates every- 
thing.” 


“So long as it doesn’t befoul my mind.” Orik shook his head and fin- 
gered the haft of his ax while eyeing the shadowy beasts that lumbered in 
the gloom beyond the pool of firelight. 


No one slept that night. Eragon and Orik remained awake because of 
the frightful din and the animals that kept crashing by their tents, the 
elves because they still listened to the song. Lifaen and Nari took to pac- 
ing in endless circles, while Arya stared toward Silthrim with a hungry 
expression, her tawny skin drawn thin and taut over her cheekbones. 


Four hours into the riot of sound and motion, Saphira dove out of the 
sky, her eyes sparkling with a queer aspect. She shivered and arched her 
neck, panting between her open jaws. The forest, she said, is alive. And I 
am alive. My blood burns like never before. It burns as yours burns when 
you think of Arya. I... understand! 


Eragon put his hand on her shoulder, feeling the tremors that racked 
her frame; her sides vibrated as she hummed along with the music. She 
gripped the ground with her ivory claws, her muscles coiled and clenched 
in a supreme effort to remain motionless. The tip of her tail twitched like 
she was about to pounce. 


Arya stood and joined Eragon on the opposite side of Saphira. The elf 
also put a hand on Saphira’s shoulder, and the three of them faced the 
darkness, united into a living chain. 


When dawn broke, the first thing Eragon noticed was that all the trees 


203 


now had buds of bright green needles at the ends of their branches. He 
bent and examined the snowberries at his feet and found that every 
plant, large or small, had acquired new growth during the night. The for- 
est vibrated with the ripeness of its colors; everything was lush and fresh 
and clean. The air smelled like it had just rained. 


Saphira shook herself beside Eragon and said, The fever has passed; I am 
myself again. Such things I felt... It was as if the world were being born 
anew and I was helping to create it with the fire in my limbs. 


How are you? On the inside, I mean. 
I will need some time to understand what I experienced. 


Since the music had ceased, Arya removed her spell from Eragon and 
Orik. She said, “Lifaen. Nari. Go to Silthrim and get horses for the five of 
us. We cannot walk all the way from here to Ellesméra. Also, alert Cap- 
tain Damitha that Ceris requires reinforcements.” 


Nari bowed. “And what shall we say when she asks why we have de- 
serted our post?” 


“Tell her that that which she once hoped for—and feared—has oc- 
curred; the wyrm has bitten its own tail. She will understand.” 


The two elves departed for Silthrim after the boats were emptied of 
supplies. Three hours later, Eragon heard a stick snap and looked up to 
see them returning through the forest on proud white stallions, leading 
four other identical horses. The magnificent beasts moved among the 
trees with uncanny stealth, their coats shimmering in the emerald twi- 
light. None of them wore saddles or harnesses. 


“Bléthr, bléthr,” murmured Lifaen, and his steed halted, pawing the 
ground with its dark hooves. 


“Are all your horses as noble as these?” asked Eragon. He cautiously ap- 
proached one, amazed by its beauty. The animals were only a few inches 
taller than ponies, which made it easy for them to navigate among the 


closely placed trunks. They did not seem frightened by Saphira. 


“Not all,” laughed Nari, tossing his silver hair, “but most. We have bred 
them for many centuries.” 


“How am I supposed to ride?” 


204 


Arya said, “An elf horse responds instantly to commands in the ancient 
language; tell it where you wish to go and it will take you. However, do 
not mistreat them with blows or harsh words, for they are not our slaves, 
but our friends and partners. They bear you only so long as they consent 
to; it is a great privilege to ride one. I was only able to save Saphira’s egg 
from Durza because our horses sensed that something was amiss and 
stopped us from riding into his ambush.... They won't let you fall unless 
you deliberately throw yourself off, and they are skilled in choosing the 
safest, quickest path through treacherous ground. The dwarves’ Feldtinost 
are like that.” 


“Right you are,” grunted Orik. “A Feldtinost can run you up a cliff and 
down without a single bruise. But how can we carry food and whatnot 
without saddles? I won't ride while wearing a full pack.” 


Lifaen tossed a pile of leather bags at Orik’s feet and indicated the sixth 
horse. “Nor will you have to.” 


It took half an hour to arrange their supplies in the bags and heap them 
into a lumpy mound on the horse’s back. Afterward, Nari told Eragon 
and Orik the words they could use to direct the horses: “Ganga framto go 
forward,bléthr to stop, hlaupa if needs you must run, and gdnga aptr to 
go back. You can give more precise instructions if you know more of the 
ancient language.” He led Eragon to a horse and said, “This is Folkvir. 
Hold out your hand.” 


Eragon did, and the stallion snorted, flaring his nostrils. Folkvir sniffed 
Eragon’s palm, then touched it with his muzzle and allowed Eragon to 
stroke his thick neck. “Good,” said Nari, appearing satisfied. The elf had 
Orik do the same with the next horse. 


As Eragon mounted Folkvir, Saphira drew closer. He looked up at her, 
noting how troubled she still seemed from the night. One more day, he 
said. 


Eragon...She paused. I thought of something while I was under the influ- 
ence of the elves’ spell, something that I have always considered of little 
consequence, but now looms within me like a mountain of black dread: 
Every creature, no matter how pure or monstrous, has a mate of their own 
kind. Yet I have none. She shuddered and closed her eyes. In this regard, I 
am alone. 


Her statements reminded Eragon that she was barely more than eight 


205 


months old. On most occasions, her youth did not show—due to the in- 
fluence of her hereditary instincts and memories—but, in this arena, she 
was even more inexperienced than he was with his feeble stabs at ro- 
mance in Carvahall and Tronjheim. Pity welled inside Eragon, but he 
suppressed it before it could seep across their mental link. Saphira would 
have only contempt for the emotion: it could neither solve her problem 
nor make her feel better. Instead, he said, Galbatorix still has two dragon 
eggs. During our first audience with Hrothgar, you mentioned that you 
would like to rescue them. If we can— 


Saphira snorted bitterly. It could take years, and even if we did retrieve 
the eggs, I have no guarantee that they would hatch, nor that they would be 
male, nor that we would be fit mates. Fate has abandoned my race to ex- 
tinction. She lashed her tail with frustration, breaking a sapling in two. 
She seemed perilously close to tears. 


What can I say? he asked, disturbed by her distress. You can’t give up 
hope. You still have a chance to find a mate, but you have to be patient. 
Even if Galbatorix’s eggs don’t work, dragons must exist elsewhere in the 
world, just like humans, elves, and Urgals do. The moment we are free of 
our obligations, I'll help you search for them. All right? 


All right, she sniffed. She craned back her head and released a puff of 
white smoke that dispersed among the branches overhead. I should know 
better than to let my emotions get the best of me. 


Nonsense. You would have to be made of stone not to feel this way. It’s 
perfectly normal.... But promise you won’t dwell on it while you're alone. 


She fixed one giant sapphire eye on him. I won't. He turned warm in- 
side as he felt her gratitude for his reassurances and companionship. Lean- 
ing out from Folkvir, he put a hand on her rough cheek and held it there 
for amoment. Go on, little one, she murmured. I will see you later. 


Eragon hated to leave her in such a state. He reluctantly entered the 
forest with Orik and the elves, heading west toward the heart of Du 
Weldenvarden. After an hour spent pondering Saphira’s plight, he men- 
tioned it to Arya. 


Faint lines creased Arya’s forehead as she frowned. “It is one of Galba- 


torix’s greatest crimes. I do not know if a solution exists, but we can 
hope. We must hope.” 


206 


THE PINEWOOD CITY 





Eragon had been in Du Weldenvarden for so long that he had begun to 
long for clearings, fields, or even a mountain, instead of the endless tree 
trunks and meager underbrush. His flights with Saphira provided no res- 
pite as they only revealed hills of prickly green that rolled unbroken into 
the distance like a verdant sea. 


Oftentimes, the branches were so thick overhead, it was impossible to 
tell from what direction the sun rose and set. That, combined with the 
repetitive scenery, made Eragon hopelessly lost, no matter how many 
times Arya or Lifaen troubled to show him the points of the compass. If 
not for the elves, he knew that he could wander in Du Weldenvarden for 
the rest of his life without ever finding his way free. 


When it rained, the clouds and the forest canopy plunged them into 
profound darkness, as if they were entombed deep underground. The fal- 
ling water would collect on the black pine needles above, then trickle 
through and pour a hundred feet or more down onto their heads, like a 
thousand little waterfalls. At such times, Arya would summon a glowing 
orb of green magic that floated over her right hand and provided the only 
light in the cavernous forest. They would stop and huddle underneath a 
tree until the storm abated, but even then water cached in the myriad 
branches would, at the slightest provocation, shower them with droplets 
for hours afterward. 


As they rode deeper into the heart of Du Weldenvarden, the trees 
grew thicker and taller, as well as farther apart to accommodate the in- 
creased span of their branches. The trunks—bare brown shafts that tow- 
ered up into the overarching ribbed ceiling, which was smudged and ob- 
scured by shadow—were over two hundred feet tall, higher than any tree 
in the Spine or the Beors. Eragon paced out the girth of one tree and 
measured it at seventy feet. 


He mentioned this to Arya, and she nodded, saying, “It means that we 
are near Ellesméra.” She reached out and rested her hand lightly on the 
gnarled root beside her, as if touching, with consummate delicacy, the 
shoulder of a friend or lover. “These trees are among the oldest living 
creatures in Alagaésia. Elves have loved them since first we saw Du Wel- 
denvarden, and we have done everything within our power to help them 
flourish.” A faint blade of light pierced the dusty emerald branches over- 
head and limned her arm and face with liquid gold, dazzlingly bright 
against the murky background. “We have traveled far together, Eragon, 


207 


but now you are about to enter my world. Tread softly, for the earth and 
air are heavy with memories and naught is as it seems.... Do not fly with 
Saphira today, as we have already triggered certain wards that protect 
Ellesméra. It would be unwise to stray from the path.” 


Eragon bowed his head and retreated to Saphira, who lay curled on a 
bed of moss, amusing herself by releasing plumes of smoke from her nos- 
trils and watching them roil out of sight. Without preamble, she said, 
There is plenty of room for me on the ground now. I will have no difficulty. 


Good. He mounted Folkvir and followed Orik and the elves farther 
into the empty, silent forest. Saphira crawled beside him. She and the 
white horses gleamed in the somber half light. 


Eragon paused, overcome by the solemn beauty of his surroundings. 
Everything had a feeling of wintry age, as if nothing had changed under 
the thatched needles for a thousand years and nothing ever would; time 
itself seemed to have fallen into a slumber from which it would never 
wake. 


In late afternoon, the gloom lifted to reveal an elf standing before them, 
sheathed in a brilliant ray of light that slanted down from the ceiling. He 
was garbed in flowing robes, with a circlet of silver upon his brow. His 
face was old, noble, and serene. 


“Eragon,” murmured Arya. “Show him your palm and your ring.” 


Baring his right hand, Eragon raised it so that first Brom’s ring and then 
the gedwéy ignasia was visible. The elf smiled, closed his eyes, and spread 
his arms in a gesture of welcome. He held the posture. 


“The way is clear,” said Arya. At a soft command, her steed moved 
forward. They rode around the elf—like water parting at the base of a 
weathered boulder—and when they had all passed, he straightened, 
clasped his hands, and vanished as the light that illuminated him ceased 
to exist. 


Who is he? asked Saphira. 
Arya said, “He is Gilderien the Wise, Prince of House Miolandra, 
wielder of the White Flame of Vandil, and guardian of Ellesméra since 


the days of Du Fyrn Skulblaka, our war with the dragons. None may en- 
ter the city unless he permits it.” 


208 


A quarter of a mile beyond, the forest thinned and breaks appeared 
within the canopy, allowing planks of mottled sunlight to bar the way. 
Then they passed underneath two burled trees that leaned against each 
other and stopped at the edge of an empty glade. 


The ground was strewn with dense patches of flowers. From pink roses 
to bluebells and lilies, spring’s fleeting treasure was heaped about like 
piles of rubies, sapphires, and opals. Their intoxicating aromas attracted 
hordes of bumblebees. To the right, a stream chuckled behind a row of 
bushes, while a pair of squirrels chased each other around a rock. 


At first it looked to Eragon like a place where deer might bed for the 
night. But as he continued to stare, he began to pick out paths hidden 
among the brush and trees; soft warm light where normally there would 
be auburn shadows; an odd pattern in the shapes of the twigs and 
branches and flowers, so subtle that it nearly escaped detection—clues 
that what he saw was not entirely natural. He blinked, and his vision 
suddenly shifted as if a lens had been placed over his eyes, resolving eve- 
rything into recognizable shapes. Those were paths, aye. And those were 
flowers, aye. But what he had taken to be clusters of lumpy, twisted trees 
were in fact graceful buildings that grew directly out of the pines. 


One tree bulged at the base to form a two-story house before sinking 
its roots into the loam. Both stories were hexagonal, although the upper 
level was half as small as the first, which gave the house a tiered appear- 
ance. The roofs and walls were made of webbed sheets of wood draped 
over six thick ridges. Moss and yellow lichen bearded the eaves and hung 
over jeweled windows set into each side. The front door was a mysteri- 
ous black silhouette recessed under an archway wrought with symbols. 


Another house was nestled between three pines, which were joined to 
it through a series of curved branches. Reinforced by those flying but- 
tresses, the house rose five levels, light and airy. Beside it sat a bower 
woven out of willow and dogwood and hung with flameless lanterns dis- 
guised as galls. 


Each unique building enhanced and complemented its surroundings, 
blending seamlessly with the rest of the forest until it was impossible to 
tell where artifice ended and nature resumed. The two were in perfect 
balance. Instead of mastering their environment, the elves had chosen to 
accept the world as it was and adapt themselves to it. 


The inhabitants of Ellesméra eventually revealed themselves as a flicker 
of movement at the fringe of Eragon’s sight, no more than needles stirring 


209 


in the breeze. Then he caught glimpses of hands, a pale face, a sandaled 
foot, an upraised arm. One by one, the wary elves stepped into view, 
their almond eyes fixed upon Saphira, Arya, and Eragon. 


The women wore their hair unbound. It rippled down their backs in 
waves of silver and sable braided with fresh blossoms, like a garden wa- 
terfall. They all possessed a delicate, ethereal beauty that belied their un- 
breakable strength; to Eragon, they seemed flawless. The men were just 
as striking, with high cheekbones, finely sculpted noses, and heavy eye- 
lids. Both sexes were garbed in rustic tunics of green and brown, fringed 
with dusky colors of orange, russet, and gold. 


The Fair Folk indeed, thought Eragon. He touched his lips in greeting. 


As one, the elves bowed from the waist. Then they smiled and laughed 
with unrestrained happiness. From within their midst, a woman sang: 


Gala O Wyrda brunhvitr, 
Abr Berundal vandr-fédhr, 
Burthro laufsbladar ekar undir, 


Eom kona dauthleikr... 


Eragon clapped his hands over his ears, fearing that the melody was a 
spell like the one he had heard at Silthrim, but Arya shook her head and 
lifted his hands. “It is not magic.” Then she spoke to her horse, saying, 
“Ganga.” The stallion nickered and trotted away. “Release your steeds as 
well. We have no further need of them and they deserve to rest in our 
stables.” 


The song waxed stronger as Arya proceeded along a cobblestone path 
set with bits of green tourmaline, which looped among the hollyhocks 
and the houses and the trees before finally crossing a stream. The elves 
danced around their party as they walked, flitting here and there as the 
fancy struck them, laughing, and occasionally leaping up onto a branch to 
run over their heads. They praised Saphira with names like “Longclaws” 
and “Daughter of Air and Fire” and “Strong One.” 


Eragon smiled, delighted and enchanted. I could live here, he thought 
with a sense of peace. Tucked away in Du Weldenvarden, as much out- 


doors as in, safe from the rest of the world... Yes, he liked Ellesméra very 
much indeed, more than any of the dwarf cities. He pointed to a dwelling 
situated within a pine tree and asked Arya, “How is that done? 


“We sing to the forest in the old tongue and give it our strength to 
grow in the shape that we desire. All our buildings and tools are made in 
that manner.” 


The path ended at a net of roots that formed steps, like bare pools of 
earth. They climbed to a door embedded within a wall of saplings. Er- 
agon’s heart quickened as the door swung open, seemingly of its own ac- 
cord, and revealed a hall of trees. Hundreds of branches melded together 
to form the honeycombed ceiling. Below, twelve chairs were arrayed 
along each wall. 


In them reposed four-and-twenty elf lords and ladies. 


Wise and handsome were they, with smooth faces unmarked by age 
and keen eyes that gleamed with excitement. They leaned forward, grip- 
ping the arms of their chairs, and stared at Eragon’s group with open 
wonder and hope. Unlike the other elves, they had swords belted at their 
waists—hilts studded with beryls and garnets—and circlets that adorned 
their brows. 


And at the head of the assembly stood a white pavilion that sheltered a 
throne of knotted roots. Queen Islanzadi sat upon it. She was as beautiful 
as an autumn sunset, proud and imperious, with two dark eyebrows 
slanted like upraised wings, lips as bright and red as holly berries, and 
midnight hair bound under a diamond diadem. Her tunic was crimson. 
Round her hips hung a girdle of braided gold. And clasped at the hollow 
of her neck was a velvet cloak that fell to the ground in languid folds. De- 
spite her imposing countenance, the queen seemed fragile, as if she con- 
cealed a great pain. 


By her left hand was a curved rod with a chased crosspiece. A brilliant- 
white raven perched on it, shuffling impatiently from foot to foot. He 
cocked his head and surveyed Eragon with uncanny intelligence, then 
gave a long, low croak and shrieked, “Wyrda!” Eragon shivered from the 
force of that single cracked word. 


The door closed behind the six of them as they entered the hall and 
approached the queen. Arya knelt on the moss-covered ground and 
bowed first, then Eragon, Orik, Lifaen, and Nari. Even Saphira, who had 
never bowed to anyone, not even Ajihad or Hrothgar, lowered her head. 


Islanzadi stood and descended from the throne, her cloak trailing be- 
hind her. She stopped before Arya, placed trembling hands on her shoul- 
ders, and said in a rich vibrato, “Rise.” Arya did, and the queen scrutinized 
her face with increasing intensity, until it seemed as if she were trying to 
decipher an obscure text. 


At last Islanzadi cried out and embraced Arya, saying, “O my daughter, 
I have wronged you!” 


QUEEN ISLANZADI 





Eragon knelt before the queen of the elves and her councilors in a fan- 
tastic room made from the boles of living trees in a near-mythic land, and 
the only thing that filled his mind was shock. Arya is a princess! It was 
fitting in a way—she had always possessed an air of command—but he 
bitterly regretted the fact, for it placed another barrier between them 
when he would have torn them all away. The knowledge filled his mouth 
with the taste of ashes. He remembered Angela’s prophecy that he would 
love one of noble birth... and her warning that she could not see if it 
would end for good or for ill. 


He could feel Saphira’s own surprise, then her amusement. She said, It 
appears that we have been traveling in the presence of royalty without know- 
ing tt. 


Why didn't she tell us? 
Perhaps it would have placed her in greater danger. 
“Islanzadi Dréttning,” said Arya formally. 


The queen withdrew as if she had been stung and then repeated in the 
ancient language, “O my daughter, I have wronged you.” She covered her 
face. “Ever since you disappeared, I’ve barely slept or eaten. I was haunted 
by your fate, and feared that I would never see you again. Banning you 
from my presence was the greatest mistake I have ever made.... Can you 
forgive me?” 


The gathered elves stirred with amazement. 
Arya’s response was long in coming, but at last she said, “For seventy 
years, I have lived and loved, fought and killed without ever speaking to 


you, my mother. Our lives are long, but even so, that is no small span.” 


Islanzadi drew herself upright, lifting her chin. A tremor ran her length. 
“I cannot undo the past, Arya, no matter how much I might desire to.” 


“And I cannot forget what I endured.” 
“Nor should you.” Islanzadi clasped her daughter’s hands. “Arya, I love 
you. You are my only family. Go if you must, but unless you wish to re- 


nounce me, I would be reconciled with you.” 


213 


For a terrible moment, it seemed as if Arya would not answer, or 
worse, would reject the offer. Eragon saw her hesitate and quickly look at 
her audience. Then she lowered her eyes and said, “No, Mother. I could 
not leave.” Islanzadi smiled uncertainly and embraced her daughter again. 
This time Arya returned the gesture, and smiles broke out among the as- 
sembled elves. 


The white raven hopped on his stand, cackling, “And on the door was 
graven evermore, what now became the family lore, Let us never do but to 
adore!” 


“Hush, Blagden,” said Islanzadi to the raven. “Keep your doggerel to 
yourself.” Breaking free, the queen turned to Eragon and Saphira. “You 
must excuse me for being discourteous and ignoring you, our most im- 
portant guests.” 


Eragon touched his lips and then twisted his right hand over his ster- 
num, as Arya had taught him. “Islanzadi Dréttning. Atra esterni ono 
thelduin.” He had no doubt that he was supposed to speak first. 


Islanzadi’s dark eyes widened. “Atra du evarinya ono varda.” 


“Un atra mor’ranr lifa unin hjarta onr,” replied Eragon, completing the 
ritual. He could tell that the elves were caught off guard by his knowl- 
edge of their customs. In his mind, he listened as Saphira repeated his 
greeting to the queen. 


When she finished, Islanzadi asked, “Dragon, what is your name?” 
Saphira. 


A flash of recognition appeared in the queen’s expression, but she made 
no comment on it. “Welcome to Ellesméra, Saphira. And yours, Rider?” 


“Eragon Shadeslayer, Your Majesty.” This time an audible stir rippled 
among the elves seated behind them; even Islanzadi appeared startled. 


“You carry a powerful name,” she said softly, “one that we rarely be- 
stow upon our children... Welcome to Ellesméra, Eragon Shadeslayer. 
We have waited long for you.” She moved on to Orik, greeted him, then 
returned to her throne and draped her velvet cloak over her arm. “I as- 
sume by your presence here, Eragon, so soon after Saphira’s egg was cap- 
tured, and by the ring on your hand and the sword on your hip, that 


214 


Brom is dead and that your training with him was incomplete. I wish to 
hear your full story, including how Brom fell and how you came to meet 
my daughter, or how she met you, as it may be. Then I will hear of your 
mission here, dwarf, and of your adventures, Arya, since your ambush in 
Du Weldenvarden.” 


Eragon had narrated his experiences before, so he had no trouble reiter- 
ating them now for the queen. The few occasions where his memory fal- 
tered, Saphira was able to provide an accurate description of events. In 
several places, he simply left the telling to her. When they finished, Er- 
agon retrieved Nasuada’s scroll from his pack and presented it to Islan- 
zadi. 


She took the roll of parchment, broke the red wax seal, and, upon 
completing the missive, sighed and briefly closed her eyes. “I see now the 
true depth of my folly. My grief would have ended so much sooner if I 
had not withdrawn our warriors and ignored Ajihad’s messengers after 
learning that Arya had been ambushed. I should have never blamed the 
Varden for her death. For one so old, I am still far too foolish...” 


A long silence followed, as no one dared to agree or disagree. Summon- 
ing his courage, Eragon said, “Since Arya has returned alive, will you agree 
to help the Varden, like before? Nasuada cannot succeed otherwise, and I 
am pledged to her cause.” 


“My quarrel with the Varden is as dust in the wind,” said Islanzadi. 
“Fear not; we will assist them as we once did, and more, because of you 
and their victory over the Urgals.” She leaned forward on one arm. “Will 
you give me Brom’s ring, Eragon?” Without hesitation, he pulled it off his 
finger and offered it to the queen, who plucked it from his palm with her 
slim fingers. “You should not have worn this, Eragon, as it was not meant 
for you. However, because of the aid you have rendered the Varden and 
my family, I now name you Elf Friend and bestow this ring, Aren, upon 
you, so that all elves, wherever you go, will know that you are to be 
trusted and helped.” 


Eragon thanked her and returned the ring to his finger, acutely aware of 
the queen’s gaze, which remained upon him with disturbing perception, 
studying and analyzing. He felt as if she knew everything that he might 
say or do. She said, “Such tidings as yours, we have not heard the like of 
in Du Weldenvarden for many a year. We are accustomed to a slower 
way of life here than the rest of Alagaésia, and it troubles me that so 
much could occur so swiftly without word of it reaching my ear.” 


215 


“And what of my training?” Eragon snatched a furtive glance at the 
seated elves, wondering if any of them could be Togira Ikonoka, the be- 
ing who had reached into his mind and freed him of Durza’s foul influ- 
ence after the battle in Farthen Dar—and who had also encouraged Er- 
agon to travel to Ellesméra. 


“It will begin in the fullness of time. Yet I fear that instructing you is 
futile so long as your infirmity persists. Unless you can overcome the 
Shade’s magic, you will be reduced to no more than a figurehead. You 
may still be useful, but only as a shadow of the hope that we have nur- 
tured for over a century.” Islanzadi spoke without reproach, yet her 
words struck Eragon like hammer blows. He knew that she was right. 
“Your situation is not your fault, and it pains me to voice such things, but 
you must understand the gravity of your disability... | am sorry.” 


Then Islanzadi addressed Orik: “It has been long since one of your race 
entered our halls, dwarf. Eragon-finiarel has explained your presence, but 
do you have aught to add?” 


“Only royal greetings from my king, Hrothgar, and a plea, now un- 
needed, for you to resume contact with the Varden. Beyond that, I am 
here to see that the pact that Brom forged between you and the humans 
is honored.” 


“We keep our promises whether we utter them in this language or in 
the ancient language. I accept Hrothgar’s greetings and return them in 
kind.” Finally, as Eragon was sure she had longed to do since they first ar- 
rived, Islanzadi looked at Arya and asked, “Now, daughter, what befell 
you?” 


Arya began to speak in a slow monotone, first of her capture and then 
of her long imprisonment and torture in Gil’ead. Saphira and Eragon had 
deliberately avoided the details of her abuse, but Arya herself seemed to 
have no difficulty recounting what she had been subjected to. Her emo- 
tionless descriptions roused the same rage within Eragon as when he first 
saw her wounds. The elves remained completely silent throughout Arya’s 
tale, although they gripped their swords and their faces hardened into ra- 
zor lines of cold anger. A single tear rolled down Islanzadi’s cheek. 


Afterward, a lithe elf lord paced along the mossy sward between the 
chairs. “I know that I speak for us all, Arya Dréttningu, when I say that 
my heart burns with sorrow for your ordeal. It is a crime beyond apology, 
mitigation, or reparation, and Galbatorix must be punished for it. Also, 
we are in your debt for keeping the locations of our cities hidden from 


216 


the Shade. Few of us could have withstood him for so long.” 
“Thank you, Dathedr-vor.” 


Now Islanzadi spoke, and her voice rang like a bell among the trees. 
“Enough. Our guests wait tired on their feet, and we have spoken of evil 
things for far too long. I will not have this occasion marred by lingering 
on past injuries.” A glorious smile brightened her expression. “My daugh- 
ter has returned, a dragon and her Rider have appeared, and I will see us 
celebrate in the proper fashion!” She stood, tall and magnificent in her 
crimson tunic, and clapped her hands. At the sound, the chairs and pavil- 
ion were showered with hundreds of lilies and roses that appeared 
twenty feet above their heads and drifted down like colorful snowflakes, 
suffusing the air with their heady fragrance. 


She didn’t use the ancient language, observed Eragon. 


He noticed that, while everyone was occupied by the flowers, Islanzadi 
touched Arya gently on the shoulder and murmured, almost too softly to 
hear, “You never would have suffered so if you had taken my counsel. I 
was right to oppose your decision to accept the yawé.” 


“It was my decision to make.” 


The queen paused, then nodded and extended her arm. “Blagden.” With 
a flutter of wings, the raven flew from his perch and landed on her left 
shoulder. The entire assembly bowed as Islanzadi proceeded to the end of 
the hall and threw open the door to the hundreds of elves outside, 
whereupon she made a brief declaration in the ancient language that Er- 
agon did not understand. The elves burst into cheers and began to rush 
about. 


“What did she say?” whispered Eragon to Nari. 


Nari smiled. “To break open our finest casks and light the cook-fires, 
for tonight shall be a night of feast and song. Come!” He grabbed Eragon’s 
hand and pulled him after the queen as she threaded her way between 
the shaggy pines and through banks of cool ferns. During their time in- 
doors, the sun had dropped low in the sky, drenching the forest with an 
amber light that clung to the trees and plants like a layer of glistering oil. 


You do realize, don’t you, said Saphira, that the king Lifaen mentioned, 
Evandar, must be Arya’s father? 


217 


Eragon almost stumbled. You’re right.... And that means he was killed 
by either Galbatorix or the Forsworn. 


Circles within circles. 


They stopped on the crest of a small hill, where a team of elves had set 
out a long trestle table and chairs. All around them, the forest hummed 
with activity. As evening approached, the cheery glow of fires appeared 
scattered throughout Ellesméra, including a bonfire near the table. 


Someone handed Eragon a goblet made of the same odd wood that he 
had noticed in Ceris. He drank the cup’s clear liqueur and gasped as it 
blazed down his throat. It tasted like mulled cider mixed with mead. The 
potion made the tips of his fingers and ears tingle and gave him a marvel- 
ous sense of clarity. “What is this?” he asked Nari. 


Nari laughed. “Faelnirv? We distill it from crushed elderberries and 
spun moonbeams. If he needs must, a strong man can travel for three 
days on naught else.” 


Saphira, you have to taste this. She sniffed the goblet, then opened her 
mouth and allowed him to pour the rest of the faelnirv down her throat. 
Her eyes widened and her tail twitched. 


Now that’s a treat! Is there more? 


Before Eragon could reply, Orik stomped over to them. “Daughter to 
the queen,” he grumbled, shaking his head. “I wish that I could tell 
Hrothgar and Nasuada. They'd want to know.” 


Islanzadi seated herself in a high-backed chair and clapped her hands 
once again. From within the city came a quartet of elves bearing musical 
instruments. Two had harps of cherrywood, the third a set of reed pipes, 
and the fourth nothing but her voice, which she immediately put to use 
with a playful song that danced about their ears. 


Eragon caught only every third word or so, but what he did understand 
made him grin. It was the story of a stag who could not drink at a pond 
because a magpie kept harassing him. 


As Eragon listened, his gaze wandered and alighted upon a small girl 
prowling behind the queen. When he looked again, he saw that her 
shaggy hair was not silver, like many of the elves, but bleached white 
with age, and that her face was creased and lined like a dry, withered ap- 


218 


ple. She was no elf, nor dwarf, nor—Eragon felt—even human. She 
smiled at him, and he glimpsed rows of sharp teeth. 


When the singer finished, and the pipes and lutes filled the silence, Er- 
agon found himself approached by scores of elves who wished to meet 
him and—more importantly, he sensed—Saphira. 


The elves presented themselves by bowing softly and touching their 
lips with their first and middle fingers, to which Eragon responded in 
kind, along with endless repetitions of their greeting in the ancient lan- 
guage. They plied Eragon with polite questions about his exploits, but 
they reserved the bulk of their conversation for Saphira. 


At first Eragon was content to let Saphira talk, since this was the first 
place where anyone was interested in having a discussion just with her. 
But he soon grew annoyed at being ignored; he had become used to hav- 
ing people listen when he spoke. He grinned ruefully, dismayed that he 
had come to rely on people’s attention so much since he had joined the 
Varden, and forced himself to relax and enjoy the celebration. 


Before long the scent of food permeated the glade and elves appeared 
carrying platters piled with delicacies. Aside from loaves of warm bread 
and stacks of small, round honeycakes, the dishes were made entirely of 
fruit, vegetables, and berries. The berries predominated; they were in 
everything from blueberry soup to raspberry sauce to thimbleberry jelly. 
A bowl of sliced apples dripped with syrup and sprinkled with wild 
strawberries sat beside a mushroom pie stuffed with spinach, thyme, and 
currants. 


No meat was to be found, not even fish or fowl, which still puzzled Er- 
agon. In Carvahall and elsewhere in the Empire, meat was a symbol of 
status and luxury. The more gold you had, the more often you could af- 
ford steak and veal. Even the minor nobility ate meat with every meal. 
To do otherwise would indicate a deficit in their coffers. And yet the 
elves did not subscribe to this philosophy, despite their obvious wealth 
and the ease with which they could hunt with magic. 


The elves rushed to the table with an enthusiasm that surprised Eragon. 
Soon all were seated: Islanzadi at the head of the table with Blagden, the 
raven; Dathedr to her left; Arya and Eragon by her right hand; Orik across 
from them; and then all the rest of the elves, including Nari and Lifaen. 
No chair was at the far end of the table, only a huge carved plate for 
Saphira. 


219 


As the meal progressed, everything dissolved around Eragon into a blur 
of talk and mirth. He was so caught up in the festivities, he lost track of 
time, aware of only the laughter and the foreign words swirling over his 
head and the warm glow left in his stomach by the faelnirv. The elusive 
harp music sighed and whispered at the edges of his hearing and sent 
shivers of excitement down his side. Occasionally, he found himself dis- 
tracted by the lazy slit-eyed stare of the woman-child, which she kept 
focused on him with single-minded intensity, even when eating. 


During a lull in the conversation, Eragon turned toward Arya, who had 
uttered no more than a dozen words. He said nothing, only looked and 
wondered who she really was. 


Arya stirred. “Not even Ajihad knew.” 
“What?” 


“Outside of Du Weldenvarden, I told no one of my identity. Brom was 
aware of it—he first met me here—but he kept it a secret at my request.” 


Eragon wondered if she was explaining to him out of a sense of duty or 
because she felt guilty for deceiving him and Saphira. “Brom once said 
that what elves didn’t say was often more important that what they did.” 


“He understood us well.” 
“Why, though? Did it matter if anyone knew?” 


This time Arya hesitated. “When I left Ellesméra, I had no desire to be 
reminded of my position. Nor did it seem relevant to my task with the 
Varden and dwarves. It had nothing to do with who I became... with 
who I am.” She glanced at the queen. 


“You could have told Saphira and me.” 


Arya seemed to bridle at the reproach in his voice. “I had no reason to 
suspect that my standing with Islanzadi had improved, and telling you 
that would have changed nothing. My thoughts are my own, Eragon.” He 
flushed at her implied meaning: Why should she— who was a diplomat, 
a princess, an elf, and older than both his father and grandfather, whoever 
they were—confide in him, a sixteen-year-old human? 


“At least,” he muttered, “you made up with your mother.” 


She smiled oddly. “Did I have a choice?” 


At that moment, Blagden jumped from Islanzadi’s shoulder and strut- 
ted down the middle of the table, bobbing his head left and right in a 
mocking bow. He stopped before Saphira, uttered a hoarse cough, and 
then croaked: 


Dragons, like wagons, 
Have tongues. 

Dragons, like flagons, 
Have necks. 

But while two hold beer, 


The other eats deer! 


The elves froze with mortified expressions while they waited for 
Saphira’s reaction. After a long silence, Saphira looked up from her 
quince pie and released a puff of smoke that enveloped Blagden. And lit- 
tle birds too, she said, projecting her thoughts so that everyone could hear. 
The elves finally laughed as Blagden staggered back, cawing indignantly 
and flapping his wings to clear the air. 


“I must apologize for Blagden’s wretched verses,” said Islanzadi. “He has 
ever had a saucy tongue, despite our attempts to tame it.” 


Apology accepted, said Saphira calmly, and returned to her pie. 


“Where does he come from?” Eragon asked, eager to return to more 
cordial footing with Arya but also genuinely curious. 


“Blagden,” said Arya, “once saved my father’s life. Evandar was fighting 
an Urgal when he stumbled and lost his sword. Before the Urgal could 
strike, a raven flew at him and pecked out his eyes. No one knows why 
the bird did it, but the distraction allowed Evandar to regain his balance 
and so win the battle. My father was always generous, so he thanked the 
raven by blessing him with spells for intelligence and long life. However, 
the magic had two effects that he did not foresee: Blagden lost all color in 
his feathers and he gained the ability to predict certain events.” 


“He can see into the future?” asked Eragon, startled. 


“See? No. But perhaps he can sense what is to come. In any case, he al- 
ways speaks in riddles, most of which are a fair bit of nonsense. Just re- 
member that if Blagden ever comes to you and tells you something that is 
not a joke or a pun, you would do well to heed his words.” 


Once the meal had concluded, Islanzadi stood—causing a flurry of ac- 
tivity as everyone hastened to do likewise—and said, “It is late, I am tired, 
and I would return to my bower. Accompany me, Saphira and Eragon, 
and I will show you where you may sleep tonight.” The queen motioned 
with one hand to Arya, then left the table. Arya followed. 


As Eragon stepped around the table with Saphira, he paused by the 
woman-child, caught by her feral eyes. All the elements of her appear- 
ance, from her eyes to her shaggy hair to her white fangs, triggered Er- 
agon’s memory. “You're a werecat, aren’t you?” She blinked once and 
then bared her teeth in a dangerous smile. “I met one of your kin, Solem- 
bum, in Teirm and in Farthen Dar.” 


Her grin widened. “Aye. A good one he is. Humans bore me, but he 
finds it amusing to travel with the witch Angela.” Then her gaze switched 
to Saphira and she uttered a throaty half-growl, half-purr of appreciation. 


What is your name? asked Saphira. 


“Names be powerful things in the heart of Du Weldenvarden, dragon, 
yes they are. However... among the elves, I am known as The Watcher 
and as Quickpaw and as The Dream Dancer, but you may know me as 
Maud.” She tossed her mane of stiff white bangs. “You'd better catch up 
with the queen, younglings; she does not take lightly to fools or laggards.” 


“It was a pleasure meeting you, Maud,” said Eragon. He bowed, and 
Saphira inclined her head. Eragon glanced at Orik, wondering where the 
dwarf would be taken, and then pursued Islanzadi. 


They overtook the queen just as she reached the base of a tree. The 
trunk was ridged by a delicate staircase that spiraled up to a series of 
globular rooms cupped and suspended in the tree’s crown by a spray of 
branches. 


Islanzadi lifted an elegant hand and pointed at the eyrie. “You needs 
must fly there, Saphira. Our stairs were not grown with dragons in mind.” 


Then she spoke to Eragon: “This is where the leader of the Dragon Riders 
would dwell while in Ellesméra. I give it to you now, for you are the 
rightful heir to that title... It is your inheritance.” Before Eragon could 
thank her, the queen swept past and departed with Arya, who held his 
gaze for a long moment before vanishing deeper into the city. 


Shall we see what accommodations they've provided us with? asked 
Saphira. She jumped into the air and sailed around the tree in a tight cir- 
cle, balancing on one wing tip, perpendicular to the ground. 


As Eragon took the first step, he saw that Islanzadi had spoken true; 
the stairs were one with the tree. The bark beneath his feet was smooth 
and flat from the many elves who had traversed it, but it was still part of 
the trunk, as were the twisting cobweb banisters by his side and the 
curved railing that slid under his right hand. 


Because the stairs had been designed with the elves’ strength in mind, 
they were steeper than Eragon was used to, and his calves and thighs soon 
began to burn. He was breathing so hard when he reached the top—after 
climbing through a trapdoor in the floor of one of the rooms—he had to 
put his hands on his knees and bend over to pant. Once recovered, he 
straightened and examined his surroundings. 


He stood in a circular vestibule with a pedestal in the center, out of 
which spiraled a sculpture of two pale hands and forearms that twined 
around each other without touching. Three screen doors led from the 
vestibule—one to an austere dining room that might hold ten people at 
the most, one to a closet with an empty hollow in the floor that Eragon 
could think of no discernible use for, and the last to a bedroom overlook- 
ing, and open to, the wide expanse of Du Weldenvarden. 


Taking a lantern from its hook in the ceiling, Eragon entered the bed- 
room, creating a host of shadows that jumped and swirled like madcap 
dancers. A teardrop gap large enough for a dragon pierced the outer wall. 
Inside the room was a bed, situated so that he could watch the sky and 
the moon while lying on his back; a fireplace made of gray wood that felt 
as hard and cold as steel when he touched it, as if the timber had been 
compressed to unsurpassed density; and a huge low-rimmed bowl] set in 
the floor and lined with soft blankets where Saphira could sleep. 


Even as he watched, she swooped down and landed on the edge of the 
opening, her scales twinkling like a constellation of blue stars. Behind her, 
the last rays of the sun streaked across the forest, painting the various 
ridges and hills with a hazy amber that made the needles glow like hot 


223 


iron and chased the shadows back toward the violet horizon. From their 
height, the city appeared as a series of gaps in the voluminous canopy, is- 
lands of calm in a restless ocean. Ellesméra’s true scope was now revealed; 
it extended for several miles to the west and to the north. 


I respect the Riders even more if this is how Vrael normally lived, said Er- 
agon. It’s much simpler than I expected. The entire structure rocked 
slightly in response to a breath of wind. 


Saphira sniffed her blankets. We have yet to see Vroengard, she cau- 
tioned, although he sensed that she agreed with him. 


As Eragon closed the screen to the bedroom, he saw something in the 
corner that he had missed during his first inspection: a spiral staircase that 
wound up a dark wood chimney. Thrusting the lantern before him, he 
cautiously ascended, one step at a time. After about twenty feet, he 
emerged in a study furnished with a writing desk—stocked with quills, 
ink, and paper, but no parchment—and another padded roost for a 
dragon to curl up on. The far wall also had an opening to fly through. 


Saphira, come see this. 
How? she asked. 


Through the outside. Eragon winced as layers of bark splintered and 
cracked under Saphira’s claws while she crawled out of the bedroom and 
up the side of the compound to the study. Satisfied? he asked when she 
arrived. Saphira raked him with her sapphire eyes, then proceeded to 
scrutinize the walls and furniture. 


I wonder, she said, how you are supposed to stay warm when the rooms 
are open to the elements? 


I don’t know. Eragon examined the walls on either side of the breach, 
running his hands over abstract patterns that had been coaxed from the 
tree by the elves’ songs. He stopped when he felt a vertical ridge embed- 
ded in the bark. He tugged on it, and a diaphanous membrane unspooled 
from within the wall. Pulling it across the portal, he found a second 
groove to hold the hem of the cloth. As soon as it was fastened, the air 
thickened and became noticeably hotter. There’s your answer, he said. He 
released the cloth and it lashed back and forth as it rewound itself. 


When they returned to the bedroom, Eragon unpacked while Saphira 
coiled upon her dais. He carefully arranged his shield, bracers, greaves, 


224 


coif, and helm, then stripped off his tunic and removed his shirt of 
leather-backed mail. He sat bare-chested on the bed and studied the oiled 
links, struck by their similarity to Saphira’s scales. 


We made it, he said, bemused. 


A long journey... but yes, we made it. We're lucky that misfortune did not 
strike upon the road. 


He nodded. Now we'll find out if it was worth it. Sometimes I wonder if 
our time would have been better spent helping the Varden. 


Eragon! You know that we need further instruction. Brom would have 
wanted it. Besides, Ellesméra and Islanzadi were certainly worth coming all 
this way to see. 


Maybe. Finally, he asked, What do you make of all this? 


Saphira parted her jaws slightly to show her teeth. I don’t know. The 
elves keep more secrets than even Brom, and they can do things with magic 
that I never thought possible. I have no idea what methods they use to grow 
their trees into such shapes, nor how Islanzadi summoned those flowers. It is 
beyond my ken. 


Eragon was relieved that he was not the only one who felt over- 
whelmed. And Arya? 


What about her? 
You know, who she really is. 


She hasn't changed, only your perception of her. Saphira chuckled deep 
in her throat, where it sounded like stones grinding against each other, 
and rested her head on her two front feet. 


The stars were bright in the sky now, and the soft hoots of owls drifted 
through Ellesméra. All the world was calm and silent as it slumbered 
away the liquid night. 


Eragon clambered underneath his downy sheets and reached to shutter 
the lantern, then stopped, his hand an inch from the latch. Here he was 
in the elves’ capital, over a hundred feet in the air, lying in what used to 


be Vrael’s bed. 


225 


The thought was too much for him. 

Rolling upright, he grabbed the lantern with one hand, Zar’roc with the 
other, and surprised Saphira by crawling onto her dais and snuggling 
against her warm side. She hummed and dropped a velvet wing over him 


as he extinguished the light and closed his eyes. 


Together they slept long and deep in Ellesméra. 


226 


OUT OF THE PAST 





Eragon woke at dawn well rested. He tapped Saphira’s ribs, and she 
lifted her wing. Running his hands through his hair, he walked to the 
room’s precipice and leaned against one side, bark rough against his 
shoulder. Below, the forest sparkled like a field of diamonds as each tree 
reflected the morning light with a thousand thousand drops of dew. 


He jumped with surprise as Saphira dove past him, twisting like an au- 
ger toward the canopy before she pulled up and circled through the sky, 
roaring with joy. Morning, little one. He smiled, happy that she was 


happy. 


He opened the screen to their bedroom, where he found two trays of 
food—mostly fruit—that had been placed by the lintel during the night. 
By the trays was a bundle of clothes with a paper note pinned to it. Er- 
agon had difficulty deciphering the flowing script, since he had not read 
for over a month and had forgotten some of the letters, but at last he un- 
derstood that it said: 


Greetings, Saphira Bjartskular and Eragon Shadeslayer. 

I, Bellaen of House Miolandra, do humble myself and apologize to you, 
Saphira, for this unsatisfactory meal. Elves do not hunt, and no meat is to 
be had in Ellesméra, nor in any of our cities. If you wish, you can do as 
the dragons of old were wont, and catch what you may in Du Welden- 
varden. We only ask that you leave your kills in the forest so that our air 
and water remain untainted by blood. 

Eragon, these clothes are for you. They were woven by Niduen of Is- 
lanzadi’s house and are her gift to you. 

May good fortune rule over you, 


Peace live in your heart, 


And the stars watch over you. 


Bellaen du Hl]jédhr 


227 


When Eragon told Saphira the message, she said, It does not matter; I 
won't need to eat for a while after yesterday's meal. However, she did snap 
up a few seed cakes. Just so that I don’t appear rude, she explained. 


After Eragon finished breakfast, he hauled the bundle of clothes onto 
his bed and carefully unfolded them, finding two full-length tunics of rus- 
set trimmed with thimbleberry green, a set of creamy leggings to wrap 
his calves in, and three pairs of socks so soft, they felt like liquid when he 
pulled them through his hands. The quality of the fabric shamed the 
weaving of the women of Carvahall as well as the dwarf clothes he wore 
now. 


Eragon was grateful for the new raiment. His own tunic and breeches 
were sadly travel-worn from their weeks exposed to the rain and sun 
since Farthen Dar. Stripping, he donned one of the luxurious tunics, sa- 
voring its downy texture. 


He had just laced on his boots when someone knocked on the screen to 
the bedroom. “Come in,” he said, reaching for Zar'roc. 


Orik poked his head inside, then cautiously entered, testing the floor 
with his feet. He eyed the ceiling. “Give me a cave any day instead of a 
bird’s nest like this. How fared your night, Eragon? Saphira?” 


“Well enough. And yours?” said Eragon. 


“I slept like a rock.” The dwarf chuckled at his own jest, then his chin 
sank into his beard and he fingered the head of his ax. “I see you've eaten, 
so I'll ask you to accompany me. Arya, the queen, and a host of other 
elves await you at the base of the tree.” He fixed Eragon with a testy 
gaze. “Something is going on that they haven't told us about. I’m not sure 
what they want from you, but it’s important. Islanzadi’s as tense as a cor- 
nered wolf... I thought I’d warn you beforehand.” 


Eragon thanked him, then the two of them descended by way of the 
stairs, while Saphira glided to earth. They were met on the ground by Is- 
lanzadi arrayed in a mantle of ruffled swan feathers, which were like win- 
ter snow heaped upon a cardinal’s breast. She greeted them and said, “Fol- 
low me.” 


Her wending course took the group to the edge of Ellesméra, where 


the buildings were few and the paths were faint from disuse. At the base 
of a wooded knoll, Islanzadi stopped and said in a terrible voice, “Before 


228 


we go any farther, the three of you must swear in the ancient language 
that you will never speak to outsiders of what you are about to see, not 
without permission from me, my daughter, or whoever may succeed us 
to the throne.” 


“Why should I gag myself?” demanded Orik. 
Why indeed ?asked Saphira. Do you not trust us? 


“It is not a matter of trust, but of safety. We must protect this knowl- 
edge at all costs—it’s our greatest advantage over Galbatorix—and if you 
are bound by the ancient language, you will never willingly reveal our se- 
cret. You came to supervise Eragon’s training, Orik-vodhr. Unless you 
give me your word, you may as well return to Farthen Dar.” 


At last Orik said, “I believe that you mean no harm to dwarves or to 
the Varden, else I would never agree. And I hold you to the honor of 
your hall and clan that this isn’t a ploy to deceive us. Tell me what to 


” 


say. 


While the queen tutored Orik in the correct pronunciation of the de- 
sired phrase, Eragon asked Saphira, Should I do it? 


Do we have a choice? Eragon remembered that Arya had asked the 
same question yesterday, and he began to have an inkling of what she had 
meant: the queen left no room to maneuver. 


When Orik finished, Islanzadi looked expectantly at Eragon. He hesi- 
tated, then delivered the oath, as did Saphira. “Thank you,” said Islanzadi. 
“Now we may proceed.” 


At the top of the knoll, the trees were replaced by a bed of red clover 
that ran several yards to the edge of a stone cliff. The cliff extended a 
league in either direction and dropped a thousand feet to the forest be- 
low, which pooled outward until it merged with the sky. It felt as if they 
stood on the edge of the world, staring across an endless expanse of for- 
est. 


I know this place, realized Eragon, remembering his vision of Togira Ik- 
onoka. 


Thud. The air shivered from the strength of the concussion. Thud. An- 


other dull blow made Eragon’s teeth chatter. Thud. He jammed his fin- 
gers in his ears, trying to protect them from the painful spikes in pres- 


229 


sure. The elves stood motionless. Thud. The clover bent under a sudden 
gust of wind. 


Thud. From below the edge of the cliff rose a huge gold dragon with a 
Rider on its back. 


230 


CONVICTION 





Roran glared at Horst. 


They were in Baldor’s room. Roran was propped upright in bed, listen- 
ing as the smith said, “What did you expect me to do? We couldn't at- 
tack once you fainted. Besides, the men were in no state to fight. Can’t 
blame them either. I nearly bit off my tongue when I saw those mon- 
sters.” Horst shook his wild mane of hair. “We’ve been dragged into one 
of the old tales, Roran, and I don’t like it one bit.” Roran retained his 
stony expression. “Look, you can kill the soldiers if you want, but you 
have to get your strength back first. You'll have plenty of volunteers; 
people trust you in battle, especially after you defeated the soldiers here 
last night.” When Roran remained silent, Horst sighed, patted him on his 
good shoulder, and left the room, closing the door behind him. 


Roran did not even blink. So far in his life, he had only truly cared 
about three things: his family, his home in Palancar Valley, and Katrina. 
His family had been annihilated last year. His farm had been smashed and 
burned, though the land remained, which was all that really mattered. 


But now Katrina was gone. 


A choked sob escaped past the iron lump in his throat. He was faced 
with a quandary that tore at his very essence: the only way to rescue 
Katrina would be to somehow pursue the Ra’zac and leave Palancar Val- 
ley, yet he could not abandon Carvahall to the soldiers. Nor could he for- 
get Katrina. 


My heart or my home, he thought bitterly. They were worthless with- 
out each other. If he killed the soldiers it would only prevent the 
Ra’zac—and perhaps Katrina—from returning. Anyway, the slaughter 
would be pointless if reinforcements were nearby, for their arrival would 
surely signal Carvahall’s demise. 


Roran clenched his teeth as a fresh burst of pain emanated from his 
bound shoulder. He closed his eyes. I hope Sloan gets eaten like Quimby. 
No fate could be too terrible for that traitor. Roran cursed him with the 
blackest oaths he knew. 


Even if I were free to leave Carvahall, how could I find the Ra’zac? Who 
would know where they live? Who would dare inform on Galbatorix’s ser- 
vants? Despair rolled over him as he wrestled with the problem. He 


231 


imagined himself in one of the great cities of the Empire, searching aim- 
lessly among dirty buildings and hordes of strangers for a hint, a glimpse, 
a taste of his love. 


It was hopeless. 


A river of tears followed as he doubled over, groaning from the 
strength of his agony and fear. He rocked back and forth, blind to any- 
thing but the desolation of the world. 


An endless amount of time reduced Roran’s sobs to weak gasps of pro- 
test. He wiped his eyes and forced himself to take a long, shuddering 
breath. He winced. His lungs felt like they were filled with shards of 
glass. 


I have to think, he told himself. 


He leaned against the wall and—through the sheer strength of his 
will—began to gradually subdue each of his unruly emotions, wrestling 
them into submission to the one thing that could save him from insanity: 
reason. His neck and shoulders trembled from the violence of his efforts. 


Once he regained control, Roran carefully arranged his thoughts, like a 
master craftsman organizing his tools into precise rows. There must be a 
solution hidden amid my knowledge, if only I'm creative enough. 


He could not track the Ra’zac through the air. That much was clear. 
Someone would have to tell him where to find them, and of all the peo- 
ple he could ask, the Varden probably knew the most. However, they 
would be just as hard to find as the desecrators, and he could not waste 
time searching for them. Although... A small voice in his head reminded 
him of the rumors he had heard from trappers and traders that Surda se- 
cretly supported the Varden. 


Surda. The country lay at the bottom of the Empire, or so Roran had 
been told, as he had never seen a map of Alagaésia. Under ideal condi- 
tions, it would take several weeks to reach on horse, longer if he had to 
evade soldiers. Of course, the swiftest mode of transportation would be 
to sail south along the coast, but that would mean having to travel all the 
way to the Toark River and then to Teirm to find a ship. It would take 
far too long. And he still might be apprehended by soldiers. 


232 


“If, could, would, might, ” he muttered, repeatedly clenching his left 
hand. North of Teirm, the only port he knew of was Narda, but to reach 
it, he would have to cross the entire width of the Spine—a feat unheard 
of, even for the trappers. 


Roran swore quietly. The conjecture was pointless. I should be trying to 
save Carvahall, not desert it. The problem was, he had already deter- 
mined that the village and all who remained in it were doomed. Tears 
gathered at the corners of his eyes again. All who remain... 


What... what if everyone in Carvahall accompanied me to Narda and 
then to Surda? He would achieve both his desires simultaneously. 


The audacity of the idea stunned him. 


It was heresy, blasphemy, to think that he could convince the farmers 
to abandon their fields and the merchants their shops... and yet... and yet 
what was the alternative but slavery or death? The Varden were the only 
group that would harbor fugitives of the Empire, and Roran was sure that 
the rebels would be delighted to have a village’s worth of recruits, espe- 
cially ones who had proved themselves in battle. Also, by bringing the 
villagers to them, he would earn the Varden’s confidence, so that they 
would trust him with the location of the Ra’zac. Maybe they can explain 
why Galbatorix is so desperate to capture me. 


If the plan were to succeed, though, it would have to be implemented 
before the new troops reached Carvahall, which left only a few days—if 
that—to arrange the departure of some three hundred people. The logis- 
tics were frightening to consider. 


Roran knew that mere reason could not persuade anyone to leave; it 
would require messianic zeal to stir people’s emotions, to make them feel 
in the depths of their hearts the need to relinquish the trappings of their 
identities and lives. Nor would it be enough to simply instill fear—for he 
knew that fear often made those in peril fight harder. Rather, he had to 
instill a sense of purpose and destiny, to make the villagers believe, as he 
did, that joining the Varden and resisting Galbatorix’s tyranny was the 
noblest action in the world. 


It required passion that could not be intimidated by hardship, deterred 
by suffering, or quenched by death. 


In his mind, Roran saw Katrina standing before him, pale and ghostly 
with solemn amber eyes. He remembered the heat of her skin, the 


233 


mulled scent of her hair, and what it felt like to be with her under the 
cover of darkness. Then in a long line behind her appeared his family, 
friends, and everyone he had known in Carvahall, both dead and alive. If 
not for Eragon... and me... the Ra’zac would have never come here. I must 
rescue the village from the Empire as surely as I must rescue Katrina from 
those desecrators. 


Drawing upon the strength of his vision, Roran rose from bed, causing 
his maimed shoulder to burn and sting. He staggered and leaned against a 
wall. Will I ever regain the use of my right arm ? He waited for the pain to 
subside. When it did not, he bared his teeth, shoved himself upright, and 
marched from the room. 


Elain was folding towels in the hallway. She cried out with amazement. 
“Roran! What are you—’” 


“Come,” he growled, lurching past. 


With a worried expression, Baldor stepped out of a doorway. “Roran, 
you shouldn’t be walking around. You lost too much blood. I'll help—’ 


“Come.” 


Roran heard them follow as he descended the curved stairs toward the 
entrance of the house, where Horst and Albriech stood talking. They 
looked up with astonishment. 


“Come.” 


He ignored the babble of questions, opened the front door, and stepped 
into the evening’s faded light. Above, an imposing plume of clouds was 
laced with gold and purple. 


Leading the small group, Roran stomped to the edge of Carvahall— 
repeating his monosyllabic message whenever he passed a man or 
woman—pulled a torch mounted on a pole from the grasping mud, 
wheeled about, and retraced his path to the center of town. There he 
stabbed the pole between his feet, then raised his left arm and roared, 
“COME!” 


The village rang with his voice. He continued the summons as people 
drifted from the houses and shadowed alleyways and began to gather 
around him. Many were curious, others sympathetic, some awed, and 
some angry. Again and again, Roran’s chant echoed in the valley. Loring 


234 


arrived with his sons in tow. From the opposite direction came Birgit, 
Delwin, and Fisk with his wife, Isold. Morn and Tara left the tavern to- 
gether and joined the crush of spectators. 


When most of Carvahall stood before him, Roran fell silent, tightening 
his left fist until his fingernails cut into his palm. Katrina. Raising his 
hand, he opened it and showed everyone the crimson tears that dripped 
down his arm. “This,” he said, “is my pain. Look well, for it will be yours 
unless we defeat the curse wanton fate has set upon us. Your friends and 
family will be bound in chains, destined for slavery in foreign lands, or 
slain before your eyes, hewn open by soldiers’ merciless blades. Galba- 
torix will sow our land with salt so that it lies forever fallow. This I have 
seen. This I know.” He paced like a caged wolf, glowering and swinging 
his head. He had their attention. Now he had to stoke them into a frenzy 
to match his own. 


“My father was killed by the desecrators. My cousin has fled. My farm 
was razed. And my bride-to-be was kidnapped by her own father, who 
murdered Byrd and betrayed us all! Quimby eaten, the hay barn burned 
along with Fisk’s and Delwin’s houses. Parr, Wyglif, Ged, Bardrick, Far- 
old, Hale, Garner, Kelby, Melkolf, Albem, and Elmund: all slain. Many of 
you have been injured, like me, so that you can no longer support your 
family. Isn’t it enough that we toil every day of our lives to eke a living 
from the earth, subjected to the whims of nature? Isn’t it enough that we 
are forced to pay Galbatorix’s iron taxes, without also having to endure 
these senseless torments?” Roran laughed maniacally, howling at the sky 
and hearing the madness in his own voice. No one stirred in the crowd. 


“I know now the true nature of the Empire and of Galbatorix; they are 
evil. Galbatorix is an unnatural blight on the world. He destroyed the 
Riders and the greatest peace and prosperity we ever had. His servants 
are foul demons birthed in some ancient pit. But is Galbatorix content to 
grind us beneath his heel? No! He seeks to poison all of Alagaésia, to suf- 
focate us with his cloak of misery. Our children and their descendants 
shall live in the shadow of his darkness until the end of time, reduced to 
slaves, worms, vermin for him to torture at his pleasure. Unless...” 


Roran stared into the villagers’ wide eyes, conscious of his control over 
them. No one had ever dared say what he was about to. He let his voice 
rasp low in his throat: “Unless we have the courage to resist evil. 


“We've fought the soldiers and the Ra’zac, but it means nothing if we 


die alone and forgotten—or are carted away as chattel. We cannot stay 
here, and I won't allow Galbatorix to obliterate everything that’s worth 


235 


living for. I would rather have my eyes plucked out and my hands 
chopped off than see him triumph! I choose to fight! I choose to step 
from my grave and let my enemies bury themselves in it! 


“I choose to leave Carvahall. 


“I will cross the Spine and take a ship from Narda down to Surda, 
where I will join the Varden, who have struggled for decades to free us 
of this oppression.” The villagers looked shocked at the idea. “But I do not 
wish to go alone. Come with me. Come with me and seize this chance to 
forge a better life for yourselves. Throw off the shackles that bind you 
here.” Roran pointed at his listeners, moving his finger from one target to 
the next. “A hundred years from now, what names shall drop from the 
bards’ lips? Horst... Birgit... Kiselt... Thane; they will recite our sagas. They 
will sing “The Epic of Carvahall,” for we were the only village brave 
enough to defy the Empire.” 


Tears of pride flooded Roran’s eyes. “What could be more noble than 
cleansing Galbatorix’s stain from Alagaésia? No more would we live in 
fear of having our farms destroyed, or being killed and eaten. The grain 
we harvest would be ours to keep, save for any extra that we might send 
as a gift to the rightful king. The rivers and streams would run thick with 
gold. We would be safe and happy and fat! 


“It is our destiny.” 


Roran held his hand before his face and slowly closed his fingers over 
the bleeding wounds. He stood hunched over his injured arm—crucified 
by the scores of gazes—and waited for a response to his speech. None 
came. At last he realized that they wanted him to continue; they wanted 
to hear more about the cause and the future he had portrayed. 


Katrina. 


Then as darkness gathered around the radius of his torch, Roran drew 
himself upright and resumed speaking. He hid nothing, only labored to 
make them understand his thoughts and feelings, so they too could share 
the sense of purpose that drove him. “Our age is at an end. We must step 
forward and cast our lot with the Varden if we and our children are to 
live free.” He spoke with rage and honeyed tones in equal amount, but 
always with a fervid conviction that kept his audience entranced. 


When his store of images was exhausted, Roran looked into the faces of 
his friends and neighbors and said, “I march in two days. Accompany me 


236 


if you wish, but I go regardless.” He bowed his head and stepped out of 
the light. 


Overhead, the waning moon glowed behind a lens of clouds. A slight 
breeze wafted through Carvahall. An iron weather vane creaked on a 
roof as it swung in the direction of the current. 


From within the crowd, Birgit picked her way into the light, clutching 
the folds of her dress to avoid tripping. With a subdued expression, she 
adjusted her shawl. “Today we saw an...” She stopped, shook her head, 
and laughed in an embarrassed way. “I find it hard to speak after Roran. I 
don’t like his plan, but I believe that it’s necessary, although for a differ- 
ent reason: I would hunt down the Ra’zac and avenge my husband’s 
death. I will go with him. And I will take my children.” She too stepped 
away from the torch. 


A silent minute passed, then Delwin and his wife, Lenna, advanced 
with their arms around each other. Lenna looked at Birgit and said, “I un- 
derstand your need, Sister. We want our vengeance as well, but more 
than that, we want the rest of our children to be safe. For that reason, we 
too will go.” Several women whose husbands had been slain came for- 
ward and agreed with her. 


The villagers murmured among themselves, then fell silent and mo- 
tionless. No one else seemed willing to address the subject; it was too 
momentous. Roran understood. He was still trying to digest the implica- 
tions himself. 


Finally, Horst strode to the torch and stared with a drawn face into the 
flame. “It’s no good talking any more... We need time to think. Every 
man must decide for himself. Tomorrow... tomorrow will be another day. 
Perhaps things will be clearer then.” He shook his head and lifted the 
torch, then inverted it and extinguished it against the ground, leaving 
everyone to find their way home in the moonlight. 


Roran joined Albriech and Baldor, who walked behind their parents at 
a discreet distance, giving them privacy to talk. Neither of the brothers 
would look at Roran. Unsettled by their lack of expression, Roran asked, 
“Do you think anyone else will go? Was I good enough?” 


Albriech emitted a bark of laughter. “Good enough!” 


“Roran,” said Baldor in an odd voice, “you could have convinced an Ur- 
gal to become a farmer tonight.” 


237 


“No!” 


“When you finished, I was ready to grab my spear and dash into the 
Spine after you. I wouldn't have been alone either. The question isn’t 
who will leave, it's who won’t. What you said... I’ve never heard anything 
like it before.” 


Roran frowned. His goal had been to persuade people to accept his 
plan, not to get them to follow him personally. If that’s what it takes, he 
thought with a shrug. Still, the prospect had caught him unawares. At an 
earlier time, it would have disturbed him, but now he was just thankful 
for anything that could help him to rescue Katrina and save the villagers. 


Baldor leaned toward his brother. “Father would lose most of his tools.” 


Albriech nodded solemnly. 


Roran knew that smiths made whatever implement was required by 
the task at hand, and that these custom tools formed a legacy that was 
bequeathed from father to son, or from master to journeyman. One 
measure of a smith’s wealth and skill was the number of tools he owned. 
For Horst to surrender his would be...Would be no harder than what any- 
one else has to do, thought Roran. He only regretted that it would entail 
depriving Albriech and Baldor of their rightful inheritance. 


When they reached the house, Roran retreated to Baldor’s room and lay 
in bed. Through the walls, he could still hear the faint sound of Horst and 
Elain talking. He fell asleep imagining similar discussions taking place 
throughout Carvahall, deciding his—and their—fate. 


REPERCUSSIONS 





The morning after his speech, Roran looked out his window and saw 
twelve men leaving Carvahall, heading toward Igualda Falls. He yawned 
and limped downstairs to the kitchen. 


Horst sat alone at the table, twisting a mug of ale in his hands. “Morn- 
ing,” he said. 


Roran grunted, tore a heel of bread off the loaf on the counter, then 
seated himself at the opposite end of the table. As he ate, he noted 
Horst’s bloodshot eyes and unkempt beard. Roran guessed that the smith 
had been awake the entire night. “Do you know why a group is going 


” 


up— 


“Have to talk with their families,” said Horst abruptly. “They’ve been 
running into the Spine since dawn.” He put the mug down with a crack. 
“You have no idea what you did, Roran, by asking us to leave. The whole 
village is in turmoil. You backed us into a corner with only one way out: 
your way. Some people hate you for it. Of course a fair number of them 
already hated you for bringing this upon us.” 


The bread in Roran’s mouth tasted like sawdust as resentment flared 
inside him. Eragon was the one who brought back the stone, not me. “And 
the others?” 


Horst sipped his ale and grimaced. “The others adore you. I never 
thought I would see the day when Garrow’s son would stir my heart 
with words, but you did it, boy, you did it.” He swung a gnarled hand 
over his head. “All this? I built it for Elain and my sons. It took me seven 
years to finish! See that beam over the door right there? I broke three 
toes getting that into place. And you know what? I’m going to give it up 
because of what you said last night.” 


Roran remained silent; it was what he wanted. Leaving Carvahall was 
the right thing to do, and since he had committed himself to that course, 
he saw no reason to torment himself with guilt and regret. The decision is 
made. I will accept the outcome without complaint, no matter how dire, for 
this is our only escape from the Empire. 


“But,” said Horst, and leaned forward on one elbow, his black eyes 
burning beneath his brow, “just you remember that if reality falls short of 


the airy dreams you conjured, there’ll be debts to pay. Give people a 


239 


hope and then take it away, and they'll destroy you.” 


The prospect was of no concern to Roran. If we make it to Surda, we 
will be greeted as heroes by the rebels. If we don’t, our deaths will fulfill all 
debts. When it was clear that the smith had finished, Roran asked, 
“Where is Elain?” 


Horst scowled at the change of topic. “Out back.” He stood and 
straightened his tunic over his heavy shoulders. “I have to go clear out the 
smithy and decide what tools I’m going to take. I'll hide or destroy the 
rest. The Empire won't benefit from my work.” 


‘Tll help.” Roran pushed back his chair. 


“No,” said Horst roughly. “This is a task I can only do with Albriech and 
Baldor. That forge has been my entire life, and theirs.... You wouldn't be 
much help with that arm of yours anyway. Stay here. Elain can use you.” 


After the smith left, Roran opened the side door and found Elain talk- 
ing with Gertrude by the large pile of firewood Horst maintained year- 
round. The healer went up to Roran and put a hand on his forehead. “Ah, 
I was afraid that you might have a fever after yesterday's excitement. 
Your family heals at the most extraordinary rate. I could barely believe 
my eyes when Eragon started walking about after having his legs skinned 
and spending two days in bed.” Roran stiffened at the mention of his 
cousin, but she did not seem to notice. “Let’s see how your shoulder is 
doing, shall we?” 


Roran bowed his neck so that Gertrude could reach behind him and 
untie the knot to the wool sling. When it was undone, he carefully low- 
ered his right forearm—which was immobilized in a splint—until his 
arm was straight. Gertrude slid her fingers under the poultice packed on 
his wound and peeled it off. 


“Oh my,” she said. 


A thick, rancid smell clogged the air. Roran clenched his teeth as his 
gorge rose, then looked down. The skin under the poultice had turned 
white and spongy, like a giant birthmark of maggot flesh. The bite itself 
had been stitched up while he was unconscious, so all he saw was a jag- 
ged pink line caked with blood on the front of his shoulder. Swelling and 
inflammation had forced the twisted catgut threads to cut deep into his 
flesh, while beads of clear liquid oozed from the wound. 


240 


Gertrude clucked her tongue as she inspected him, then refastened the 
bandages and looked Roran in the eye. “You're doing well enough, but 
the tissue may become diseased. I can’t tell yet. If it does, we'll have to 
cauterize your shoulder.” 


Roran nodded. “Will my arm work once it heals?” 


“As long as the muscle knits together properly. It also depends on how 
you want to use it. You—’” 


“Will I be able to fight?” 


“If you want to fight,” said Gertrude slowly, “I suggest that you learn to 
use your left hand.” She patted his cheek, then hurried back toward her 
hut. 


My arm. Roran stared at his bound limb as if it no longer belonged to 
him. Until that moment, he had not realized how closely his sense of 
identity was linked to the condition of his body. Injuring his flesh caused 
injury to his psyche, as well as the other way around. Roran was proud of 
his body, and seeing it mutilated sent a jolt of panic through him, espe- 
cially since the damage was permanent. Even if he regained the use of his 
arm, he would always bear a thick scar as a memento of his injury. 


Taking his hand, Elain led Roran back into the house, where she crum- 
bled mint into a kettle, then set it on the stove to boil. “You really love 
her, don’t you?” 


“What?” He looked at her, startled. 


Elain rested a hand on her belly. “Katrina.” She smiled. “I’m not blind. I 
know what you've done for her, and I’m proud of you. Not every man 
would go as far.” 


“It won't matter, if I can’t free her.” 

The kettle began to whistle stridently. “You will, I’m sure of it—one 
way or another.” Elain poured the tea. “We had better start preparing for 
the trip. I’m going to sort through the kitchen first. While I do, can you 
go upstairs and bring me all the clothes, bedding, and anything else you 
think might be useful?” 


“Where should I put it?” asked Roran. 


241 


“The dining room will be fine.” 


Since the mountains were too steep—and the forest too dense—for 
wagons, Roran realized that their supplies were limited to however much 
they could carry themselves, as well as what they could pile onto Horst’s 
two horses, although one of those had to be left partially unburdened so 
that Elain could ride whenever the trail proved too strenuous for her 
pregnancy. 


Compounding the issue was the fact that some families in Carvahall did 
not have enough steeds for both provisions and the young, old, and infirm 
who would be unable to keep pace on foot. Everyone would have to 
share resources. The question, though, was with whom? They still did 
not know who else was going, besides Birgit and Delwin. 


Thus, when Elain finished packing the items she deemed essential— 
mainly food and shelter—she sent Roran to find out if anyone needed ex- 
tra storage space and, if not, if she could borrow some in turn, for there 
were plenty of nonessential items she wanted to bring but would other- 
wise abandon. 


Despite the people hurrying through the streets, Carvahall was heavy 
with a forced stillness, an unnatural calm that belied the feverish activity 
hidden within the houses. Almost everyone was silent and walked with 
downturned faces, engrossed in their own thoughts. 


When Roran arrived at Orval’s house, he had to pound on the knocker 
for almost a minute before the farmer answered the door. “Oh, it’s you, 
Stronghammer.” Orval stepped out on the porch. “Sorry for the wait, but 
I was busy. How can I help you?” He tapped a long black pipe against his 
palm, then began to roll it nervously between his fingers. Inside the 
house, Roran heard chairs being shoved across the floor and pots and pans 
banging together. 


Roran quickly explained Elain’s offer and request. Orval squinted up at 
the sky. “I reckon I’ve got enough room for my own stuff. Ask around, an’ 
if you still need space, I have a pair of oxen that could hold a bit more.” 


“So you are going?” 


Orval shifted uncomfortably. “Well, I wouldn't say that. We're just... 
getting ready in case of another attack.” 


242 


“Ah.” Puzzled, Roran trudged on to Kiselt’s house. He soon discovered 
that no one was willing to reveal whether they had decided to leave— 
even when evidence of their preparations was in plain sight. 


And they all treated Roran with a deference that he found unsettling. It 
manifested itself in small gestures: offers of condolences for his misfor- 
tune, respectful silence whenever he spoke, and murmurs of assent when 
he made a statement. It was as if his deeds had inflated his stature and in- 
timidated the people he had known since childhood, distancing him from 
them. 


I am branded, thought Roran, limping through the mud. He stopped at 
the edge of a puddle and bent to examine his reflection, curious if he 
could discern what made him so different. 


He saw a man in ragged, blood-stained clothes, with a humped back 
and a crooked arm tied across his chest. His neck and cheeks were scum- 
bled with an impending beard, while his hair was matted into snarled 
ropes that writhed in a halo around his head. Most frightening of all, 
though, were his eyes, which had sunk deep into the sockets, giving him 
a haunted appearance. From within those two morbid caverns, his gaze 
boiled like molten steel, full of loss, rage, and an obsessive craving. 


A lopsided smile crept across Roran’s face, rendering his visage even 
more shocking. He liked how he looked. It matched his feelings. Now he 
understood how he had managed to influence the villagers. He bared his 
teeth. I can use this image. I can use it to destroy the Ra’zac. 


Lifting his head, he slouched up the street, pleased with himself. Just 
then, Thane approached him and grasped his left forearm in a hearty grip. 
“Stronghammer! You don’t know how glad I am to see you.” 


“You are?” Roran wondered if the whole world had been turned inside 
out during the night. 


Thane nodded vigorously. “Ever since we attacked the soldiers, every- 
thing has seemed hopeless to me. It pains me to admit it, but so it was. 
My heart pounded all the time, like I was about to fall down a well; my 
hands shook; and I felt dreadfully ill. I thought someone had poisoned 
me! It was worse than death. But what you said yesterday healed me in- 
stantly and let me see purpose and meaning in the world again! I... I can’t 
even explain the horror you saved me from. I am in your debt. If you 
need or want anything, just ask and I'll help.” 


243 


Moved, Roran gripped the farmer’s forearm in return and said, “Thank 
you, Thane. Thank you.” Thane bowed his head, tears in his eyes, then 
released Roran and left him standing alone in the middle of the street. 


What have I done? 


244 


EXODUS 





Awall of thick, smoky air engulfed Roran as he entered the Seven 
Sheaves, Morn’s tavern. He stopped beneath the Urgal horns pegged over 
the door and let his eyes adjust to the dim interior. “Hello?” he called. 


The door to the back rooms banged open as Tara plowed forward, 
trailed by Morn. They both glared sullenly at Roran. Tara planted her 
meaty fists on her hips and demanded, “What do you want here?” 


Roran stared at her for a moment, trying to determine the source of her 
animosity. “Have you decided whether to accompany me into the Spine?” 


“That’s none of your business,” snapped Tara. 


Oh yes, it is. He restrained himself, though, and instead said, “Whatever 
your intentions are, if you were to go, Elain would like to know if you 
have room in your bags for a few more items, or if you need extra room 
yourself. She has—” 


“Extra room!” burst out Morn. He waved at the wall behind the bar, 
which was lined with oak casks. “I have, packed in straw, twelve barrels 
of the clearest winter ale, which have been kept at the perfect tempera- 
ture for the past five months. They were Quimby’s last batch! What am I 
supposed to do with them? Or my hogsheads of lager and stout? If I leave 
them, the soldiers will dispose of it in a week, or they'll spike the barrels 
and pour the beer into the ground, where the only creatures who'll enjoy 
it will be grubs and worms. Oh!” Morn sat and wrung his hands, shaking 
his head. “Twelve years of work! Ever since Father died I ran the tavern 
the same way he did, day in and day out. And then you and Eragon had 
to cause this trouble. It...” He stopped, breathing with difficulty, and 
wiped his mashed face with the edge of his sleeve. 


“There, there now,” said Tara. She put her arm around Morn and 
jabbed a finger at Roran. “Who gave you leave to stir up Carvahall with 
your fancy words? If we go, how will my poor husband make a living? 
He can't take his trade with him like Horst or Gedric. He can’t squat in 
an empty field and farm it like you! Impossible! Everyone will go and we 
will starve. Or we will go and we will still starve. You have ruined us!” 


Roran looked from her flushed, angry face to Morn’s distraught one, 
then turned and opened the door. He paused on the threshold and said in 


a low voice, “I have always counted you among my friends. I would not 


245 


have you killed by the Empire.” Stepping outside, he pulled his vest tight 
around himself and paced away from the tavern, ruminating the whole 
way. 


At Fisk’s well, he stopped for a drink and found himself joined by 
Birgit. She watched him struggle to turn the crank with only one hand, 
then took it from him and brought up the water bucket, which she 
passed to him without drinking. He sipped the cool liquid, then said, “I’m 
glad that you are coming.” He handed the bucket back. 


Birgit eyed him. “I recognize the force that drives you, Roran, for it 
propels me as well; we both wish to find the Ra’zac. Once we do, 
though, I will have my compensation from you for Quimby’s death. 
Never forget that.” She pushed the full bucket back into the well and let 
it fall unchecked, the crank spinning wildly. A second later, the well ech- 
oed with a hollow splash. 


Roran smiled as he watched her walk away. He was more pleased than 
upset by her declaration; he knew that even if everyone else in Carvahall 
were to forsake the cause or die, Birgit would still help him to hunt the 
Ra’zac. Afterward, though—if an afterward existed—he would have to 
pay her price or kill her. That was the only way to resolve such matters. 


By evening Horst and his sons had returned to the house, bearing two 
small bundles wrapped in oilcloth. “Is that all?” asked Elain. Horst nodded 
curtly, lay the bundles on the kitchen table, and unwrapped them to ex- 
pose four hammers, three tongs, a clamp, a medium-sized bellows, and a 
three-pound anvil. 


As the five of them sat to dinner, Albriech and Baldor discussed the 
various people they had seen making covert preparations. Roran listened 
intently, trying to keep track of who had lent donkeys to whom, who 
showed no signs of departing, and who might need help to leave. 


“The biggest problem,” said Baldor, “is food. We can only carry so 
much, and it'll be difficult to hunt enough in the Spine to feed two or 
three hundred people.” 


“Mmm.” Horst shook his finger, his mouth full of beans, then swal- 
lowed. “No, hunting won't work. We have to bring our flocks with us. 
Combined, we own enough sheep and goats to feed the lot of us for a 
month or more.” 


246 


Roran raised his knife. “Wolves.” 


‘I’m more worried about keeping the animals from wandering off into 
the forest,” replied Horst. “Herding them will be a chore.” 


Roran spent the following day assisting whomever he could, saying lit- 
tle, and generally allowing people to see him working for the good of the 
village. Late that night, he tumbled into bed exhausted but hopeful. 


The advent of dawn pierced Roran’s dreams and woke him with a 
sense of momentous expectation. He stood and tiptoed downstairs, then 
went outside and stared at the misty mountains, absorbed by the morn- 
ing’s silence. His breath formed a white plume in the air, but he felt 
warm, for his heart throbbed with fear and eagerness. 


After a subdued breakfast, Horst brought the horses to the front of the 
house, where Roran helped Albriech and Baldor load them with saddle- 
bags and other bundles of supplies. Next Roran took up his own pack, 
hissing as the leather shoulder strap pressed down on his injury. 


Horst closed the door to the house. He lingered for a moment with his 
fingers on the steel doorknob, then took Elain’s hand and said, “Let’s go.” 


As they walked through Carvahall, Roran saw somber families gather- 
ing by their houses with their piles of possessions and yammering live- 
stock. He saw sheep and dogs with bags tied on their backs, teary-eyed 
children on donkeys, and makeshift sledges hitched to horses with crates 
of fluttering chickens hung on each side. He saw the fruits of his success, 
and he knew not whether to laugh or to cry. 


They stopped at Carvahall’s north end and waited to see who would 
join them. A minute passed, then Birgit approached from the side, ac- 
companied by Nolfavrell and his younger siblings. Birgit greeted Horst 
and Elain and stationed herself nearby. 


Ridley and his family arrived outside the wall of trees, driving over a 
hundred sheep from the east side of Palancar Valley. “I figured that it 
would be better to keep them out of Carvahall,” shouted Ridley over the 


animals. 


“Good thinking!” replied Horst. 


247 


Next came Delwin, Lenna, and their five children; Orval and his family; 
Loring with his sons; Calitha and Thane—who gave Roran a large smile; 
and then Kiselt’s clan. Those women who had been recently widowed, 
like Nolla, clustered around Birgit. Before the sun had cleared the moun- 
tain peaks, most of the village had assembled along the wall. But not all. 


Morn, Tara, and several others had yet to show themselves, and when 
Ivor arrived, it was without any supplies. “You're staying,” observed Ro- 
ran. He sidestepped a knot of testy goats that Gertrude was attempting to 
restrain. 


“Aye,” said Ivor, drawing out the word into a weary admission. He 
shivered, crossed his bony arms for warmth, and faced the rising sun, lift- 
ing his head so as to catch the transparent rays. “Svart refused to leave. 
Heh! It was like carving against the grain to get him into the Spine in the 
first place. Someone has to look after him, an’ I don’t have any children, 
so...” He shrugged. “Doubt I could give up the farm anyway.” 


“What will you do when the soldiers arrive?” 
“Give them a fight that they'll remember.” 


Roran laughed hoarsely and clapped Ivor on the arm, doing his best to 
ignore the unspoken fate that they both knew awaited anyone who re- 
mained. 


A thin, middle-aged man, Ethlbert, marched to the edge of the congre- 
gation and shouted, “You're all fools!” With an ominous rustle, people 
turned to look at their accuser. “I’ve held my peace through this madness, 
but I'll not follow a nattering lunatic! If you weren’t blinded by his 
words, you'd see that he’s leading you to destruction! Well, I won't go! I'll 
take my chances sneaking past the soldiers and finding refuge in Therins- 
ford. They’re our own people at least, not the barbarians you'll find in 
Surda.” He spat on the ground, then spun on his heel and stomped away. 


Afraid that Ethlbert might convince others to defect, Roran scanned 
the crowd and was relieved to see nothing more than restless muttering. 
Still, he did not want to dawdle and give people a chance to change their 
minds. He asked Horst under his breath, “How long should we wait?” 


“Albriech, you and Baldor run around as fast as you can and check if 


anyone else is coming. Otherwise, we'll leave.” The brothers dashed off in 
opposite directions. 


248 


Half an hour later, Baldor returned with Fisk, Isold, and their borrowed 
horse. Leaving her husband, Isold hurried toward Horst, shooing her 
hands at anyone who got in her way, oblivious to the fact that most of 
her hair had escaped imprisonment in its bun and stuck out in odd tufts. 
She stopped, wheezing for breath. “I am sorry we're so late, but Fisk had 
trouble closing up the shop. He couldn't pick which planers or chisels to 
bring.” She laughed in a shrill tone, almost hysterical. “It was like watch- 
ing a cat surrounded by mice trying to decide which one to chase. First 
this one, then that one.” 


A wry smile tugged at Horst’s lips. “I understand perfectly.” 


Roran strained for a glimpse of Albriech, but to no avail. He gritted his 
teeth. “Where is he?” 


Horst tapped his shoulder. “Right over there, I do believe.” 


Albriech advanced between the houses with three beer casks tied to his 
back and an aggrieved look that was comic enough to make Baldor and 
several others laugh. On either side of Albriech walked Morn and Tara, 
who staggered under the weight of their enormous packs, as did the don- 
key and two goats that they towed behind them. To Roran’s astonish- 
ment, the animals were burdened with even more casks. 


“They won't last a mile,” said Roran, growing angry at the couple’s fool- 
ishness. “And they don’t have enough food. Do they expect us to feed 
them or—” 


With a chuckle, Horst cut him off. “I wouldn't worry about the food. 
Morn’s beer will be good for morale, and that’s worth more than a few 
extra meals. You'll see.” 


As soon as Albriech had freed himself of the casks, Roran asked him 
and his brother, “Is that everyone?” When they answered in the affirma- 
tive, Roran swore and struck his thigh with a clenched fist. Excluding 
Ivor, three families were determined to remain in Palancar Valley: Ethl- 
bert’s, Parr’s, and Knute’s. I can’t force them to come. He sighed. “All right. 
There’s no sense in waiting longer.” 


Excitement rippled through the villagers; the moment had finally ar- 


rived. Horst and five other men pulled open the wall of trees, then laid 
planks across the trench so that the people and animals could walk over. 


249 


Horst gestured. “I think that you should go first, Roran.” 


“Wait!” Fisk ran up and, with evident pride, handed Roran a blackened 
six-foot-long staff of hawthorn wood with a knot of polished roots at the 
top, and a blued-steel ferrule that tapered into a blunt spike at the base. 
“I made it last night,” said the carpenter. “I thought that you might have 
need of it.” 


Roran ran his left hand over the wood, marveling at its smoothness. “I 
couldn't have asked for anything better. Your skill is masterful... Thank 
you.” Fisk grinned and backed away. 


Conscious of the fact that the entire crowd was watching, Roran faced 
the mountains and the Igualda Falls. His shoulder throbbed beneath the 
leather strap. Behind him lay his father’s bones and everything he had 
known in life. Before him the jagged peaks piled high into the pale sky 
and blocked his way and his will. But he would not be denied. And he 
would not look back. 


Katrina. 
Lifting his chin, Roran strode forward. His staff knocked against the 


hard planks as he crossed the trench and passed out of Carvahall, leading 
the villagers into the wilderness. 


250 


ON THE CRAGS OF TEL’NAEIR 





Thud. 


Bright as a flaming sun, the dragon hung before Eragon and everyone 
clustered along the Crags of Tel’naeir, buffeting them with gusts from its 
mighty wings. The dragon’s body appeared to be on fire as the brilliant 
dawn illuminated its golden scales and sprayed the ground and trees with 
dazzling chips of light. It was far larger than Saphira, large enough to be 
several hundred years old, and proportionally thicker in its neck, limbs, 
and tail. Upon its back sat the Rider, robes startling white against the bril- 
liance of the scales. 


Eragon fell to his knees, his face upturned. I’m not alone.... Awe and re- 
lief coursed through him. No more would he have to bear the responsi- 
bility of the Varden and of Galbatorix by himself. Here was one of the 
guardians of old resurrected from the depths of time to guide him, a liv- 
ing symbol, and a testament to the legends he had been raised with. Here 
was his master. Here was a legend! 


As the dragon turned to land, Eragon gasped; the creature’s left foreleg 
had been severed by a terrible blow, leaving a helpless white stump in 
place of the once mighty limb. Tears filled his eyes. 


A whirlwind of dry twigs and leaves enveloped the hilltop as the 
dragon settled on the sweet clover and folded its wings. The Rider care- 
fully descended from his steed along the dragon’s intact front right leg, 
then approached Eragon, his hands clasped before him. He was an elf 
with silver hair, old beyond measure, though the only sign of age was the 
expression of great compassion and sadness upon his face. 


“Osthato Chetowa,” said Eragon. “The Mourning Sage... As you asked, I 
have come.” With a jolt, he remembered his manners and touched his 
lips. “Atra esterni ono thelduin.” 


The Rider smiled. He took Eragon by the shoulders and lifted him up- 
right, staring at him with such kindness that Eragon could look at nothing 
else; he was consumed by the endless depths within the elf’s eyes. 
“Oromis is my proper name, Eragon Shadeslayer.” 


“You knew,” whispered Islanzadi with a hurt expression that quickly 
transformed into a storm of rage. “You knew of Eragon’s existence and 


yet you did not tell me? Why have you betrayed me, Shur’tugal?” 


251 


Oromis released Eragon from his gaze and transferred it onto the queen. 
“I kept my peace because it was uncertain if Eragon or Arya would live 
long enough to come here; I had no wish to give you a fragile hope that 
might have been torn away at any moment.” 


Islanzadi spun about, her cape of swan feathers billowing like wings. 
“You had no right to withhold such information from me! I could have 
sent warriors to protect Arya, Eragon, and Saphira in Farthen Dtr and to 
escort them safely here.” 


Oromis smiled sadly. “I hid nothing from you, Islanzadi, but what you 
had already chosen not to see. If you had scryed the land, as is your duty, 
you would have discerned the source of the chaos that has swept Ala- 
gaésia and learned the truth of Arya and Eragon. That you might forget 
the Varden and the dwarves in your grief is understandable, but Brom? 
Vinr Alfakyn? The last of the Elf Friends? You have been blind to the 
world, Islanzadi, and lax upon your throne. I could not risk driving you 
further away by subjecting you to another loss.” 


Islanzadi’s anger drained away, leaving her face pale and her shoulders 
slumped. “I am diminished,” she whispered. 


A cloud of hot, moist air pressed against Eragon as the gold dragon bent 
to examine him with eyes that glittered and sparked. We are well met, 
Eragon Shadeslayer. I am Glaedr. His voice—for it was unmistakably 
male—rumbled and shook through Eragon’s mind, like the growl of a 
mountain avalanche. 


All Eragon could do was touch his lips and say, “I am honored.” 


Then Glaedr brought his attention to bear on Saphira. She remained 
perfectly still, her neck arched stiffly as Glaedr sniffed her cheek and 
along the line of her wing. Eragon saw Saphira’s clenched leg muscles 
flutter with an involuntary tremor. You smell of humans, said Glaedr, and 
all you know of your own race is what your instincts have taught you, but 
you have the heart of a true dragon. 


During this silent exchange, Orik presented himself to Oromis. “Truly, 
this is beyond anything that I dared hope or expect. You are a pleasant 
surprise in these dark times, Rider.” He clapped his fist over his heart. “If 
it is not too presumptuous, I would ask a boon on behalf of my king and 
my clan, as was the custom between our people.” 


252 


Oromis nodded. “And I will grant it if it is within my power.” 


“Then tell me: Why have you remained hidden for all these years? You 
were sorely needed, Argetlam.” 


“Ah,” said Oromis. “Many sorrows exist in this world, and one of the 
greatest is being unable to help those in pain. I could not risk leaving this 
sanctuary, for if I had died before one of Galbatorix’s eggs had hatched, 
then there would have been no one to pass on our secrets to the new 
Rider, and it would have been even harder to defeat Galbatorix.” 


“That was your reason?” spat Orik. “Those are the words of a coward! 
The eggs might have never hatched.” 


Everyone went deathly quiet, except for a faint growl that emanated 
from between Glaedr’s teeth. “If you were not my guest here,” said Islan- 
zadi, “I would strike you down myself for that insult.” 


Oromis spread his hands. “Nay, I am not offended. It is an apt reaction. 
Understand, Orik, that Glaedr and I cannot fight. Glaedr has his disabil- 
ity, and I,” he touched the side of his head, “I am also maimed. The For- 
sworn broke something within me when I was their captive, and while I 
can still teach and learn, I can no longer control magic, except for the 
smallest of spells. The power escapes me, no matter how much I struggle. 
I would be worse than useless in battle, I would be a weakness and a li- 
ability, one who could easily be captured and used against you. So I re- 
moved myself from Galbatorix’s influence for the good of the many, even 
though I yearned to openly oppose him.” 


“The Cripple Who Is Whole,” murmured Eragon. 
“Forgive me,” said Orik. He appeared stricken. 


“It is of no consequence.” Oromis placed a hand on Eragon’s shoulder. 
“Islanzadi Dréttning, by your leave?” 


“Go,” she said wearily. “Go and be done with you.” 

Glaedr crouched low to the ground, and Oromis nimbly climbed up his 
leg and into the saddle on his back. “Come, Eragon and Saphira. We have 
much to talk about.” The gold dragon leaped off the cliff and circled 


overhead, rising on an updraft. 


Eragon and Orik solemnly clasped arms. “Bring honor to your clan,” said 


253 


the dwarf. 


As Eragon mounted Saphira, he felt as if he were about to embark on a 
long journey and that he should say farewell to those who remained be- 
hind. Instead, he just looked at Arya and smiled, letting his wonder and 
joy show. She half frowned, appearing troubled, but then he was gone, 
swept into the sky by the eagerness of Saphira’s flight. 


Together the two dragons followed the white cliff northward for sev- 
eral miles, accompanied only by the sound of their wings. Saphira flew 
abreast of Glaedr. Her enthusiasm boiled over into Eragon’s mind, 
heightening his own emotions. 


They landed in another clearing situated on the edge of the cliff, just 
before the wall of exposed stone crumbled back into the earth. A bare 
path led from the precipice to the doorstep of a low hut grown between 
the trunks of four trees, one of which straddled a stream that emerged 
from the moody depths of the forest. Glaedr would not fit inside; the hut 
could have easily sat between his ribs. 


“Welcome to my home,” said Oromis as he alighted on the ground with 
uncommon ease. “I live here, on the brink of the Crags of Tel’naeir, be- 
cause it provides me the opportunity to think and study in peace. My 
mind works better away from Ellesméra and the distractions of other 
people.” 


He disappeared inside the hut, then returned with two stools and flag- 
ons of clear, cold water for both himself and Eragon. Eragon sipped his 
drink and admired the spacious view of Du Weldenvarden in an attempt 
to conceal his awe and nervousness while he waited for the elf to speak. 
I’m in the presence of another Rider! Beside him, Saphira crouched with 
her eyes fixed on Glaedr, slowly kneading the dirt between her claws. 


The gap in their conversation stretched longer and longer. Ten minutes 
passed... half an hour... then an hour. It reached the point where Eragon 
began to measure the elapsed time by the sun’s progress. At first his mind 
buzzed with questions and thoughts, but those eventually subsided into 
calm acceptance. He enjoyed just observing the day. 


Only then did Oromis say, “You have learned the value of patience 
well. That is good.” 


It took Eragon a moment to find his voice. “You can’t stalk a deer if 
you are in a hurry.” 


254 


Oromis lowered his flagon. “True enough. Let me see your hands. I find 
that they tell me much about a person.” Eragon removed his gloves and 
allowed the elf to grip his wrists with thin, dry fingers. He examined Er- 
agon’s calluses, then said, “Correct me if 1 am wrong. You have wielded a 
scythe and plow more often than a sword, though you are accustomed to 
a bow.” 


“Aye.” 
“And you have done little writing or drawing, maybe none at all.” 
“Brom taught me my letters in Teirm.” 


“Mmm. Beyond your choice of tools, it seems obvious that you tend to 
be reckless and disregard your own safety.” 


“What makes you say that, Oromis-elda?” asked Eragon, using the most 
respectful and formal honorific that he could think of. 


“Not elda, ” corrected Oromis. “You may call me master in this tongue 
and ebrithil in the ancient language, nothing else. You will extend the 
same courtesy to Glaedr. We are your teachers; you are our students; and 
you will act with proper respect and deference.” Oromis spoke gently, 
but with the authority of one who expects absolute obedience. 

“Yes, Master Oromis.” 


“As will you, Saphira.” 


Eragon could sense how hard it was for Saphira to unbend her pride 
enough to say, Yes, Master. 


Oromis nodded. “Now. Anyone with such a collection of scars has ei- 
ther been hopelessly unfortunate, fights like a berserker, or deliberately 
pursues danger. Do you fight like a berserker?” 


“No ” 


“Nor do you seem unfortunate; quite the opposite. That leaves only 
one explanation. Unless you think differently?” 


Eragon cast his mind over his experiences at home and on the road, in 
an attempt to categorize his behavior. “I would say, rather, that once I 


255 


dedicate myself to a certain project or path, I see it through, no matter 
the cost... especially if someone I love is in danger.” His gaze flicked to- 
ward Saphira. 


“And do you undertake challenging projects?” 
“I like to be challenged.” 


“So you feel the need to pit yourself against adversity in order to test 
your abilities.” 


“I enjoy overcoming challenges, but I’ve faced enough hardship to know 
that it’s foolish to make things more difficult than they are. It’s all I can 
do to survive as it is.” 


“Yet you chose to follow the Ra’zac when it would have been easier to 
remain in Palancar Valley. And you came here.” 


“It was the right thing to do... Master.” 


For several minutes, no one spoke. Eragon tried to guess what the elf 
was thinking, but could glean no information from his masklike visage. 
Finally, Oromis stirred. “Were you, perchance, given a trinket of some 
kind in Tarnag, Eragon? A piece of jewelry, armor, or even a coin?” 


“Aye.” Eragon reached inside of his tunic and fished out the necklace 
with the tiny silver hammer. “Gannel made this for me on Hrothgar’s or- 
ders, to prevent anyone from scrying Saphira or me. They were afraid 
that Galbatorix might have discovered what I look like... How did you 
know?” 


“Because,” said Oromis, “I could no longer sense you.” 


“Someone tried to scry me by Silthrim about a week ago. Was that 
you?” 


Oromis shook his head. “After I first scryed you with Arya, I had no 
need to use such crude methods to find you. I could reach out and touch 
your mind with mine, as I did when you were injured in Farthen Dar.” 
Lifting the amulet, he murmured several lines in the ancient language, 
then released it. “It contains no other spells I can detect. Keep it with you 
at all times; it is a valuable gift.” He pressed the tips of his long fingers to- 
gether, his nails as round and bright as fish scales, and stared between the 
arches they formed toward the white horizon. “Why are you here, Er- 


256 


agon?” 
“To complete my training.” 
“And what do you think that process entails?” 


Eragon shifted uncomfortably. “Learning more about magic and fight- 
ing. Brom wasn’t able to finish teaching me everything that he knew.” 


“Magic, swordsmanship, and other such skills are useless unless you 
know how and when to apply them. This I will teach you. However, as 
Galbatorix has demonstrated, power without moral direction is the most 
dangerous force in the world. My main task, then, is to help you, Eragon 
and Saphira, to understand what principles guide you, so that you do not 
make the right choices for the wrong reasons. You must learn more 
about yourself, who you are and what you are capable of doing. That is 
why you are here.” 


When do we begin? asked Saphira. 


Oromis began to answer when he stiffened and dropped his flagon. His 
face went crimson and his fingers tightened into hooked claws that 
dragged at his robe like cockleburs. The change was frightening and in- 
stantaneous. Before Eragon could do more than flinch, the elf had relaxed 
again, although his entire body now bespoke weariness. 


Concerned, Eragon dared to ask, “Are you well?” 


A trace of amusement lifted the corner of Oromis’s mouth. “Less so 
than I might wish. We elves fancy ourselves immortal, but not even we 
can escape certain maladies of the flesh, which are beyond our knowl- 
edge of magic to do more than delay. No, do not worry... it isn’t conta- 
gious, but neither can I rid myself of it.” He sighed. “I have spent decades 
binding myself with hundreds of small, weak spells that, layered one 
upon another, duplicate the effect of enchantments that are now beyond 
my reach. I bound myself with them so that I might live long enough to 
witness the birth of the last dragons and to foster the Riders’ resurrection 
from the ruin of our mistakes.” 


“How long until...” 
Oromis lifted a sharp eyebrow. “How long until I die? We have time, 


but precious little for you or me, especially if the Varden decide to call 
upon your help. As a result—to answer your question, Saphira—we will 


257 


begin your instruction immediately, and we will train faster than any 
Rider ever has or ever will, for I must condense decades of knowledge 
into months and weeks.” 


“You do know,” said Eragon, struggling against the embarrassment and 
shame that made his cheeks burn, “about my... my own infirmity. ” He 
ground out the last word, hating the sound of it. “I am as crippled as you 


” 


are. 


Sympathy tempered Oromis’s gaze, though his voice was firm. “Eragon, 
you are only a cripple if you consider yourself one. I understand how you 
feel, but you must remain optimistic, for a negative outlook is more of a 
handicap than any physical injury. I speak from personal experience. Pity- 
ing yourself serves neither you nor Saphira. I and the other spellweavers 
will study your malady to see if we might devise a way to alleviate it, but 
in the meantime, your training will proceed as if nothing were amiss.” 


Eragon’s gut clenched and he tasted bile as he considered the implica- 
tions. Surely Oromis wouldn't make me endure that torment again! “The 
pain is unbearable,” he said frantically. “It would kill me. I—’” 


“No, Eragon. It will not kill you. That much I know about your curse. 
However, we both have our duty; you to the Varden, and I to you. We 
cannot shirk it for the sake of mere pain. Far too much is at risk, and we 
can ill afford to fail.” All Eragon could do was shake his head as panic 
threatened to overwhelm him. He tried to deny Oromis’s words, but 
their truth was inescapable. “Eragon. You must accept this burden freely. 
Have you no one or nothing that you are willing to sacrifice yourself for?” 


His first thought was of Saphira, but he was not doing this for her. Nor 
for Nasuada. Nor even for Arya. What drove him, then? When he had 
pledged fealty to Nasuada, he had done so for the good of Roran and the 
other people trapped within the Empire. But did they mean enough to 
him to put himself through such anguish? Yes, he decided. Yes, they do, 
because I am the only one who has a chance to help them, and because I 
won't be free of Galbatorix’s shadow until they are as well. And because 
this is my only purpose in life. What else would I do? He shuddered as he 
mouthed the ghastly phrase, “I accept on behalf of those I fight for: the 
people of Alagaésia—of all races—who have suffered from Galbatorix’s 
brutality. No matter the pain, I swear that I will study harder than any 
student you've had before.” 


Oromis nodded gravely. “I ask for nothing less.” He looked at Glaedr for 
a moment, then said, “Stand and remove your tunic. Let me see what you 


258 


are made of.” 


Wait, said Saphira. Was Brom aware of your existence here, Master? Er- 
agon paused, struck by the possibility. 


“Of course,” said Oromis. “He was my pupil as a boy in Ilirea. 1 am glad 
that you gave him a proper burial, for he had a hard life and few enough 
ever showed him kindness. I hope that he found peace before he entered 
the void.” 


Eragon slowly frowned. “Did you know Morzan as well?” 
“He was my apprentice before Brom.” 
“And Galbatorix?” 


“I was one of the Elders who denied him another dragon after his first 
was killed, but no, I never had the misfortune to teach him. He made 
sure to personally hunt down and kill each of his mentors.” 


Eragon wanted to inquire further, but he knew that it would be better 
to wait, so he stood and unlaced the top of his tunic. It seems, he said to 
Saphira, that we will never learn all of Brom’s secrets. He shivered as he 
pulled off the tunic in the cool air, then squared his shoulders and lifted 
his chest. 


Oromis circled him, stopping with an astonished exclamation as he saw 
the scar that crossed Eragon’s back. “Did not Arya or one of the Varden’s 
healers offer to remove this weal? You should not have to carry it.” 

“Arya did offer, but...” Eragon stopped, unable to articulate his feelings. 
Finally, he just said, “It’s part of me now, just as Murtagh’s scar is part of 
him.” 


“Murtagh’s scar?” 


“Murtagh bore a similar mark. It was inflicted when his father, Morzan, 
threw Zar’roc at him while he was only a child.” 


Oromis stared at him seriously for a long time before he nodded and 
moved on. “You have a fair amount of muscle, and you are not as lop- 


sided as most swordsmen. Are you ambidextrous?” 


“Not really, but I had to teach myself to fight with my left hand after I 


259 


broke my wrist by Teirm.” 


“Good. That will save some time. Clasp your hands behind your back 
and lift them as high as possible.” Eragon did as he was told, but the pos- 
ture hurt his shoulders and he could barely make his hands meet. “Now 
bend forward while keeping your knees straight. Try to touch the 
ground.” This was even harder for Eragon; he ended up bowed like a 
hunchback, with his arms hanging uselessly by his head while his ham- 
strings twinged and burned. His fingers were still nine or ten inches from 
the ground. “At least you can stretch without hurting yourself. I had not 
hoped for so much. You can perform a number of exercises for flexibility 
without overexerting. Yes.” 


Then Oromis addressed Saphira: “I would know your capabilities as 
well, dragon.” He gave her a number of complex poses that had her con- 
tort every foot of her sinuous length in fantastic ways, culminating in a 
series of aerial acrobatics the likes of which Eragon had never seen before. 
Only a few things exceeded her ability, such as executing a backward 
loop while corkscrewing through the air. 


When she landed, it was Glaedr who said, I fear that we coddled the 
Riders. If our hatchlings had been forced to care for themselves in the 
wild—as you were, and so our ancestors were—then perhaps they would 
have possessed your skill. 


“No,” said Oromis, “even if Saphira had been raised on Vroengard using 
the established methods, she would still be an extraordinary flier. I’ve 
rarely seen a dragon so naturally suited to the sky.” Saphira blinked, then 
shuffled her wings and busied herself cleaning one of her claws in a man- 
ner that hid her head from view. “You have room to improve, as do we 
all, but little, very little.” The elf reseated himself, his back perfectly 
straight. 


For the next five hours, by Eragon’s reckoning, Oromis delved into 
every aspect of his and Saphira’s knowledge, from botany to woodwork- 
ing to metallurgy and medicine, although he mainly concentrated on their 
grasp of history and the ancient language. The interrogation comforted 
Eragon, as it reminded him of how Brom used to quiz him during their 
long treks to Teirm and Dras-Leona. 


When they broke for lunch, Oromis invited Eragon into his house, 
leaving the two dragons alone. The elf’s quarters were barren except for 
those few essentials necessary for food, hygiene, and the pursuit of an in- 
tellectual life. Two entire walls were dotted with cubbyholes that held 


260 


hundreds of scrolls. Next to the table hung a golden sheath—the same 
color as Glaedr’s scales—and a matching sword with a blade the color of 
iridescent bronze. 


On the inner pane of the door, set within the heart of the wood, was a 
flat panel one span high and two wide. It depicted a beautiful, towering 
city built against an escarpment and caught in the ruddy light of a rising 
harvest moon. The pitted lunar face was bisected by the horizon and ap- 
peared to sit on the ground like a maculated dome as large as a mountain. 
The picture was so clear and perfectly detailed, Eragon at first took it to 
be a magical window; it was only when he saw that the image was indeed 
static that he could accept it as a piece of art. 


“Where is this?” he asked. 


Oromis’s slanted features tightened for an instant. “You would do well 
to memorize that landscape, Eragon, for there lies the heart of your mis- 
ery. You see what was once our city of Ilirea. It was burned and aban- 
doned during Du Fyrn Skulblaka and became the capital of the Broddring 
Kingdom and now is the black city of Urd’baen. I made that fairth on the 
night that I and others were forced to flee our home before Galbatorix 
arrived.” 


“You painted this... fairth?” 


“No, no such thing. A fairth is an image fixed by magic upon a square 
of polished slate that is prepared beforehand with layers of pigments. The 
landscape upon that door is exactly how Ilirea presented itself to me at 
the moment I uttered my spell.” 


“And,” said Eragon, unable to stop the flow of questions, “what was the 
Broddring Kingdom?” 


Oromis’s eyes widened with dismay. “You don’t know?” Eragon shook 
his head. “How can you not? Considering your circumstances and the fear 
that Galbatorix wields among your people, I might understand that you 
were raised in darkness, ignorant of your heritage. But I cannot credit 
Brom with being so lax with your instruction as to neglect subjects that 
even the youngest elf or dwarf knows. The children of your Varden 
could tell me more about the past.” 


“Brom was more concerned with keeping me alive than teaching me 
about people who are already dead,” retorted Eragon. 


261 


This drew silence from Oromis. Finally, he said, “Forgive me. I did not 
mean to impugn Brom’s judgment, only I am impatient beyond reason; 
we have so little time, and each new thing you must learn reduces that 
which you can master during your tenure here.” He opened a series of 
cupboards hidden within the curved wall and removed bread rolls and 
bowls of fruit, which he rowed out on the table. He paused for a mo- 
ment over the food with his eyes closed before beginning to eat. “The 
Broddring Kingdom was the human’s country before the Riders fell. After 
Galbatorix killed Vrael, he flew on Ilirea with the Forsworn and deposed 
King Angrenost, taking his throne and titles for his own. The Broddring 
Kingdom then formed the core of Galbatorix’s conquests. He added Vro- 
engard and other lands to the east and south to his holdings, creating the 
empire you are familiar with. Technically, the Broddring Kingdom still 
exists, though, at this point, I doubt that it is much more than a name on 
royal decrees.” 


Afraid to pester the elf with further inquiries, Eragon concentrated on 
his food. His face must have betrayed him, though, because Oromis said, 
“You remind me of Brom when I chose him as my apprentice. He was 
younger than you, only ten, but his curiosity was just as great. I doubt I 
heard aught from him for a year but how, what, when, and, above all else, 
why. Do not be shy to ask what lies in your heart.” 


“I want to know so much,” whispered Eragon. “Who are you? Where 
do you come from?... Where did Brom come from? What was Morzan 
like? How, what, when, why ? And I want to know everything about 
Vroengard and the Riders. Maybe then my own path will be clearer.” 


Silence fell between them as Oromis meticulously disassembled a 
blackberry, prying out one plump segment at a time. When the last cor- 
puscle vanished between his port-red lips, he rubbed his hands flat to- 
gether—‘polishing his palms,” as Garrow used to say—and said, “Know 
this about me, then: I was born some centuries past in our city of Lu- 
thivira, which stood in the woods by Lake Tiidosten. At the age of 
twenty, like all elf children, I was presented to the eggs that the dragons 
had given the Riders, and Glaedr hatched for me. We were trained as 
Riders, and for near a century, we traveled the world over, doing Vrael’s 
will. Eventually, the day arrived when it was deemed appropriate for us 
to retire and pass on our experience to the next generation, so we took a 
position in Ilirea and taught new Riders, one or two at a time, until Gal- 
batorix destroyed us.” 


“And Brom?” 


262 


“Brom came from a family of illuminators in Kuasta. His mother was 
Nelda and his father Holcomb. Kuasta is so isolated by the Spine from 
the rest of Alagaésia, it has become a peculiar place, full of strange cus- 
toms and superstitions. When he was still new to Ilirea, Brom would 
knock on a door frame three times before entering or leaving a room. 
The human students teased him about it until he abandoned the practice 
along with some of his other habits. 


“Morzan was my greatest failure. Brom idolized him. He never left his 
side, never contradicted him, and never believed that he could best Mor- 
zan in any venture. Morzan, I’m ashamed to admit—for it was within my 
power to stop—was aware of this and took advantage of Brom’s devotion 
in a hundred different ways. He grew so proud and cruel that I consid- 
ered separating him from Brom. But before I could, Morzan helped Gal- 
batorix to steal a dragon hatchling, Shruikan, to replace the one Galba- 
torix had lost, killing the dragon’s original Rider in the process. Morzan 
and Galbatorix then fled together, sealing our doom. 


“You cannot begin to fathom the effect Morzan’s betrayal had on Brom 
until you understand the depth of Brom’s affection for him. And when 
Galbatorix at last revealed himself and the Forsworn killed Brom’s 
dragon, Brom focused all of his anger and pain on the one who he felt 
was responsible for the destruction of his world: Morzan.” 


Oromis paused, his face grave. “Do you know why losing your dragon, 
or vice versa, usually kills the survivor?” 


“I can imagine,” said Eragon. He quailed at the thought. 


“The pain is shock enough—although it isn’t always a factor—but what 
really causes the damage is feeling part of your mind, part of your iden- 
tity, die. When it happened to Brom, I fear that he went mad for a time. 
After I was captured and escaped, I brought him to Ellesméra for safety, 
but he refused to stay, instead marching with our army to the plains of 
Ilirea, where King Evandar was slain. 


“The confusion then was indescribable. Galbatorix was busy consolidat- 
ing his power, the dwarves were in retreat, the southwest was a mass of 
war as the humans rebelled and fought to create Surda, and we had just 
lost our king. Driven by his desire for vengeance, Brom sought to use the 
turmoil to his advantage. He gathered together many of those who had 
been exiled, freed some who had been imprisoned, and with them he 
formed the Varden. He led them for a few years, then surrendered the 
position to another so that he was free to pursue his true passion, which 


263 


was Morzan’s downfall. Brom personally killed three of the Forsworn, in- 
cluding Morzan, and he was responsible for the deaths of five others. He 
was rarely happy during his life, but he was a good Rider and a good man, 
and I am honored to have known him.” 


‘T never heard his name mentioned in connection to the Forsworn’s 
deaths,” objected Eragon. 


“Galbatorix did not want to publicize the fact that any still existed who 
could defeat his servants. Much of his power resides in the appearance of 
invulnerability.” 


Once again, Eragon was forced to revise his conception of Brom, from 
the village storyteller that Eragon had first taken him to be, to the warrior 
and magician he had traveled with, to the Rider he was at last revealed as, 
and now firebrand, revolutionary leader, and assassin. It was hard to rec- 
oncile all of those roles. I feel as if I barely knew him. I wish that we had 
had a chance to talk about all of this at least once. “He was a good man,” 
agreed Eragon. 


He looked out one of the round windows that faced the edge of the 
cliff and allowed the afternoon warmth to suffuse the room. He watched 
Saphira, noting how she acted with Glaedr, seeming both shy and coy. 
One moment she would twist around to examine some feature of the 
clearing, the next she would shuffle her wings and make small advances 
on the larger dragon, weaving her head from side to side, the tip of her 
tail twitching as if she were about to pounce on a deer. She reminded Er- 
agon of a kitten trying to bait an old tomcat into playing with her, only 
Glaedr remained impassive throughout her machinations. 


Saphira, he said. She responded with a distracted flicker of her 
thoughts, barely acknowledging him. Saphira, answer me. 


What? 

I know you're excited, but don’t make a fool of yourself. 

You’ve made a fool of yourself plenty of times, she snapped. 

Her reply was so unexpected, it stunned him. It was the sort of casually 
cruel remark that humans often make, but that he had never thought to 
hear from her. He finally managed to say, That doesn’t make it any better. 


She grunted and closed her mind to his, although he could still feel the 
thread of her emotions connecting them. 


264 


Eragon returned to himself to find Oromis’s gray eyes heavy upon him. 
The elf’s gaze was so perceptive, Eragon was sure that Oromis under- 
stood what had transpired. Eragon forced a smile and motioned toward 
Saphira. “Even though we're linked, I can never predict what she’s going 
to do. The more I learn about her, the more I realize how different we 


” 


are. 


Then Oromis made his first statement that Eragon thought was truly 
wise: “Those whom we love are often the most alien to us.” The elf 
paused. “She is very young, as are you. It took Glaedr and I decades be- 
fore we fully understood each other. A Rider’s bond with his dragon is 
like any relationship—that is, a work in progress. Do you trust her?” 


“With my life.” 
“And does she trust you?” 
“Ves.” 


“Then humor her. You were brought up as an orphan. She was brought 
up to believe that she was the last sane individual of her entire race. And 
now she has been proved wrong. Don’t be surprised if it takes some 
months before she stops pestering Glaedr and returns her attention to 


” 


you. 


Eragon rolled a blueberry between his thumb and forefinger; his appe- 
tite had vanished. “Why don’t elves eat meat?” 


“Why should we?” Oromis held up a strawberry and rotated it so that 
the light reflected off its dimpled skin and illuminated the tiny hairs that 
bearded the fruit. “Everything that we need or want we sing from the 
plants, including our food. It would be barbaric to make animals suffer 
that we might have additional courses on the table... Our choice will 
make greater sense to you before long.” 


Eragon frowned. He had always eaten meat and did not look forward to 
living solely on fruit and vegetables while in Ellesméra. “Don’t you miss 
the taste?” 


“You cannot miss that which you have never had.” 


“What about Glaedr, though? He can’t live off grass.” 


265 


“No, but neither does he needlessly inflict pain. We each do the best 
we can with what we are given. You cannot help who or what you are 
born as.” 


“And Islanzadi? Her cape was made of swan feathers.” 


“Loose feathers gathered over the course of many years. No birds were 
killed to make her garment.” 


They finished the meal, and Eragon helped Oromis to scour the dishes 
clean with sand. As the elf stacked them in the cupboard, he asked, “Did 
you bathe this morning?” The question startled Eragon, but he answered 
that no, he had not. “Please do so tomorrow then, and every day follow- 
ing. 


“Every day! The water's too cold for that. I'll catch the ague.” 
Oromis eyed him oddly. “Then make it warmer.” 


Now it was Eragon’s turn to look askance. “I’m not strong enough to 
heat an entire stream with magic,” he protested. 


The house echoed as Oromis laughed. Outside, Glaedr swung his head 
toward the window and inspected the elf, then returned to his earlier po- 
sition. “I assume that you explored your quarters last night.” Eragon nod- 
ded. “And you saw a small room with a depression in the floor?” 


“I thought that it might be for washing clothes or linens.” 


“It is for washing you. Two nozzles are concealed in the side of the wall 
above the hollow. Open them and you can bathe in water of any tem- 
perature. Also,” he gestured at Eragon’s chin, “while you are my student, I 
expect you to keep yourself clean-shaven until you can grow a full 
beard—if you so choose—and not look like a tree with half its leaves 
blown off. Elves do not shave, but I will have a razor and mirror found 
and sent to you.” 


Wincing at the blow to his pride, Eragon agreed. They returned out- 
side, whereupon Oromis looked at Glaedr and the dragon said, We have 
decided upon a curriculum for Saphira and you. 


The elf said, “You will start—’ 


—an hour after sunrise tomorrow, in the time of the Red Lily. Return here 


266 


then. 


“And bring the saddle that Brom made for you, Saphira,” continued 
Oromis. “Do what you wish in the meantime; Ellesméra holds many 
wonders for a foreigner, if you care to see them.” 


‘Tll keep that in mind,” said Eragon, bowing his head. “Before I go, Mas- 
ter, I want to thank you for helping me in Tronjheim after I killed Durza. 


I doubt that I would have survived without your assistance. I am in your 


debt.” 
We are both in your debt, added Saphira. 


Oromis smiled slightly and inclined his head. 


THE SECRET LIVES OF ANTS 





The moment that Oromis and Glaedr were out of sight, Saphira said, 
Eragon, another dragon! Can you believe it? 


He patted her shoulder. It’s wonderful. High above Du Weldenvarden, 
the only sign of habitation in the forest was an occasional ghostly plume 
of smoke that rose from the crown of a tree and soon faded into clear air. 


I never expected to encounter another dragon, except for Shruikan. Maybe 
rescue the eggs from Galbatorix, yes, but that was the extent of my hopes. 
And now this! She wriggled underneath him with joy. Glaedr is incredible, 
isn’t he? He’s so old and strong and his scales are so bright. He must be two, 
no, three times bigger than me. Did you see his claws? They... 


She continued on in that manner for several minutes, waxing eloquent 
about Glaedr’s attributes. But stronger than her words were the emotions 
Eragon sensed roiling within her: eagerness and enthusiasm, twined over 
what he could only identify as a longing adoration. 


Eragon tried to tell Saphira what he had learned from Oromis—since 
he knew that she had not paid attention—but he found it impossible to 
change the subject of conversation. He sat silently on her back, the world 
an emerald ocean below, and felt himself the loneliest man in existence. 


Back at their quarters, Eragon decided against any sightseeing; he was 
far too tired from the day’s events and the weeks of traveling. And 
Saphira was more than content to sit on her bed and chatter about 
Glaedr while he examined the mysteries of the elves’ wash closet. 


Morning came, and with it a package wrapped in onionskin paper con- 
taining the razor and mirror that Oromis had promised. The blade was of 
elvish make, so it needed no sharpening or stropping. Grimacing, Eragon 
first bathed in steaming hot water, then held up the mirror and con- 
fronted his visage. 


I look older. Older and worn. Not only that, but his features had be- 
come far more angled, giving him an ascetic, hawklike appearance. He 
was no elf, but neither would anyone take him to be a purebred human 
if they inspected him closely. Pulling back his hair, he bared his ears, 
which now tapered to slight points, more evidence of how his bond with 


268 


Saphira had changed him. He touched one ear, letting his fingers wander 
over the unfamiliar shape. 


It was difficult for him to accept the transformation of his flesh. Even 
though he had known it would occur—and occasionally welcomed the 
prospect as the last confirmation that he was a Rider—the reality of it 
filled him with confusion. He resented the fact that he had no say in how 
his body was being altered, yet at the same time he was curious where 
the process would take him. Also, he was aware that he was still in the 
midst of his own, human adolescence, and its attendant realm of myster- 
ies and difficulties. 


When will I finally know who and what I am? 


He placed the edge of the razor against his cheek, as he had seen Gar- 
row do, and dragged it across his skin. The hairs came free, but they were 
cut long and ragged. He altered the angle of the blade and tried again 
with a bit more success. 


When he reached his chin, though, the razor slipped in his hand and 
cut him from the corner of his mouth to the underside of his jaw. He 
howled and dropped the razor, clapping his hand over the incision, which 
poured blood down his neck. Spitting the words past bared teeth, he said, 
“Waise heill.” The pain quickly receded as magic knitted his flesh back 
together, though his heart still pounded from the shock. 


Eragon! cried Saphira. She forced her head and shoulders into the vesti- 
bule and nosed open the door to the closet, flaring her nostrils at the 
scent of blood. 

I'll live, he assured her. 

She eyed the sanguine water. Be more careful. I’d rather you were as 
ragged as a molting deer than have you decapitate yourself for the sake of a 
close shave. 

So would I. Go on, I’m fine. 

Saphira grunted and reluctantly withdrew. 

Eragon sat, glaring at the razor. Finally, he muttered, “Forget this.” 
Composing himself, he reviewed his store of words from the ancient lan- 


guage, selected those that he needed, and then allowed his invented spell 
to roll off his tongue. A faint stream of black powder fell from his face as 


269 


his stubble crumbled into dust, leaving his cheeks perfectly smooth. 


Satisfied, Eragon went and saddled Saphira, who immediately took to 
the air, aiming their course toward the Crags of Tel’naeir. They landed 
before the hut and were met by Oromis and Glaedr. 


Oromis examined Saphira’s saddle. He traced each strap with his fin- 
gers, pausing on the stitching and buckles, and then pronounced it pass- 
able handiwork considering how and when it had been constructed. 
“Brom was always clever with his hands. Use this saddle when you must 
travel with great speed. But when comfort is allowed—’” He stepped into 
his hut for a moment and reappeared carrying a thick, molded saddle 
decorated with gilt designs along the seat and leg pieces. “—use this. It 
was crafted in Vroengard and imbued with many spells so that it will 
never fail you in time of need.” 


Eragon staggered under the weight of the saddle as he received it from 
Oromis. It had the same general shape as Brom’s, with a row of buckles— 
intended to immobilize his legs—hanging from each side. The deep seat 
was sculpted out of the leather in such a way that he could fly for hours 
with ease, both sitting upright and lying flat against Saphira’s neck. Also, 
the straps encircling Saphira’s chest were rigged with slips and knots so 
that they could extend to accommodate years of growth. A series of 
broad ties on either side of the head of the saddle caught Eragon’s atten- 
tion. He asked their purpose. 


Glaedr rumbled, Those secure your wrists and arms so that you are not 
killed like a rat shaken to death when Saphira performs a complex maneu- 
ver. 


Oromis helped Eragon relieve Saphira of her current saddle. “Saphira, 
you will go with Glaedr today, and I will work with Eragon here.” 


As you wish, she said, and crowed with excitement. Heaving his golden 
bulk off the ground, Glaedr soared off to the north, Saphira close behind. 


Oromis did not give Eragon long to ponder Saphira’s departure; the elf 
marched him to a square of hard-packed dirt beneath a willow tree at the 
far side of the clearing. Standing opposite him in the square, Oromis said, 
“What I am about to show you is called the Rimgar, or the Dance of 
Snake and Crane. It is a series of poses that we developed to prepare our 
warriors for combat, although all elves use it now to maintain their 
health and fitness. The Rimgar consists of four levels, each more difficult 
than the last. We will start with the first.” 


270 


Apprehension for the coming ordeal sickened Eragon to the point 
where he could barely move. He clenched his fists and hunched his 
shoulders, his scar tugging at the skin of his back as he glared between his 
feet. 


“Relax,” advised Oromis. Eragon jerked open his hands and let them 
hang limply at the end of his rigid arms. “I asked you to relax, Eragon. 
You can’t do the Rimgar if you are as stiff as a piece of rawhide.” 


“Yes, Master.” Eragon grimaced and reluctantly loosened his muscles 
and joints, although a knot of tension remained coiled in his belly. 


“Place your feet together and your arms at your sides. Look straight 
ahead. Now take a deep breath and lift your arms over your head so that 
your palms meet.... Yes, like that. Exhale and bend down as far as you 
can, put your palms on the ground, take another breath... and jump back. 
Good. Breathe in and bend up, looking toward the sky... and exhale, lift- 
ing your hips until you form a triangle. Breathe in through the back of 
your throat... and out. In... and out. In...” 


To Eragon’s utter relief, the stances proved gentle enough to hold with- 
out igniting the pain in his back, yet challenging enough that sweat 
beaded his forehead and he panted for breath. He found himself grinning 
with joy at his reprieve. His wariness evaporated and he flowed through 
the postures—most of which far exceeded his flexibility—with more en- 
ergy and confidence than he had possessed since before the battle in Far- 
then Dir. Maybe I've healed! 


Oromis performed the Rimgar with him, displaying a level of strength 
and flexibility that astounded Eragon, especially for one so old. The elf 
could touch his forehead to his toes. Throughout the exercise, Oromis 
remained impeccably composed, as if he were doing no more than stroll- 
ing down a garden path. His instruction was calmer and more patient 
than Brom’s, yet completely unyielding. No deviation was allowed from 
the correct path. 


“Let us wash the sweat from our limbs,” said Oromis when they fin- 


ished. 


Going to the stream by the house, they quickly disrobed. Eragon sur- 
reptitiously watched the elf, curious as to what he looked like without 
his clothes. Oromis was very thin, yet his muscles were perfectly defined, 
etched under his skin with the hard lines of a woodcut. No hair grew 


271 


upon his chest or legs, not even around his groin. His body seemed al- 
most freakish to Eragon, compared to the men he was used to seeing in 
Carvahall—although it had a certain refined elegance to it, like that of a 
wildcat. 


When they were clean, Oromis took Eragon deep into Du Welden- 
varden to a hollow where the dark trees leaned inward, obscuring the sky 
behind branches and veils of snarled lichen. Their feet sank into the moss 
above their ankles. All was silent about them. 


Pointing to a white stump with a flat, polished top three yards across 
that rested in the center of the hollow, Oromis said, “Sit here.” Eragon did 
as he was told. “Cross your legs and close your eyes.” The world went 
dark around him. From his right, he heard Oromis whisper, “Open your 
mind, Eragon. Open your mind and listen to the world around you, to the 
thoughts of every being in this glade, from the ants in the trees to the 
worms in the ground. Listen until you can hear them all and you under- 
stand their purpose and nature. Listen, and when you hear no more, 
come tell me what you have learned.” 


Then the forest was quiet. 


Unsure if Oromis had left, Eragon tentatively lowered the barriers 
around his mind and reached out with his consciousness, like he did 
when trying to contact Saphira at a great distance. Initially only a void 
surrounded him, but then pricks of light and warmth began to appear in 
the darkness, strengthening until he sat in the midst of a galaxy of swirl- 
ing constellations, each bright point representing a life. Whenever he had 
contacted other beings with his mind, like Cadoc, Snowfire, or Solem- 
bum, the focus had always been on the one he wanted to communicate 
with. But this... this was as if he had been standing deaf in the midst of a 
crowd and now he could hear the rivers of conversation whirling around 
him. 


He felt suddenly vulnerable; he was completely exposed to the world. 
Anyone or anything that might want to leap into his mind and control 
him could now do so. He tensed unconsciously, withdrawing back into 
himself, and his awareness of the hollow vanished. Remembering one of 
Oromis’s lessons, Eragon slowed his breathing and monitored the sweep 
of his lungs until he had relaxed enough to reopen his mind. 


Of all the lives he could sense, the majority were, by far, insects. Their 


sheer number astounded him. Tens of thousands dwelled in a square foot 
of moss, teeming millions throughout the rest of the small hollow, and 


272 


uncounted masses beyond. Their abundance actually frightened Eragon. 
He had always known that humans were scarce and beleaguered in Ala- 
gaésia, but he had never imagined that they were so outnumbered by 
even beetles. 


Since they were one of the few insects that he was familiar with, and 
Oromis had mentioned them, Eragon concentrated his attention on the 
columns of red ants marching across the ground and up the stems of a 
wild rosebush. What he gleaned from them were not so much 
thoughts—their brains were too primitive—but urges: the urge to find 
food and avoid injury, the urge to defend one’s territory, the urge to 
mate. By examining the ants’ instincts, he could begin to puzzle out their 
behavior. 


It fascinated him to discover that—except for the few individuals ex- 
ploring outside the borders of their province—the ants knew exactly 
where they were going. He was unable to ascertain what mechanism 
guided them, but they followed clearly defined paths from their nest to 
food and back. Their source of food was another surprise. As he had ex- 
pected, the ants killed and scavenged other insects, but most of their ef- 
forts were directed toward the cultivation of... of something that dotted 
the rosebush. Whatever the life-form was, it was barely large enough for 
him to sense. He focused all of his strength on it in an attempt to identify 
it and satisfy his curiosity. 


The answer was so simple, he laughed out loud when he compre- 
hended it: aphids. The ants were acting as shepherds for aphids, driving 
and protecting them, as well as extracting sustenance from them by mas- 
saging the aphids’ bellies with the tips of their antennae. Eragon could 
hardly believe it, but the longer he watched, the more he became con- 
vinced that he was correct. 


He traced the ants underground into their complex matrix of warrens 
and studied how they cared for a certain member of their species that 
was several times bigger than a normal ant. However, he was unable to 
determine the insect’s purpose; all he could see were servants swarming 
around it, rotating it, and removing the specks of matter it produced at 
regular intervals. 


After a time, Eragon decided that he had gleaned all the information 
from the ants that he could—unless he was willing to sit there for the 
rest of the day—and was about to return to his body when a squirrel 
jumped into the glade. Its appearance was like a blast of light to him, at- 
tuned as he was to the insects. Stunned, he was overwhelmed by a rush 


273 


of sensations and feelings from the animal. He smelled the forest with its 
nose, felt the bark give under his hooked claws and the air swish through 
his upraised plume of a tail. Compared to an ant, the squirrel burned 
with energy and possessed unquestionable intelligence. 


Then it leaped to another branch and faded from his awareness. 


The forest seemed much darker and quieter than before when Eragon 
opened his eyes. He took a deep breath and looked about, appreciating 
for the first time how much life existed in the world. Unfolding his 
cramped legs, he walked over to the rosebush. 


He bent down and examined the branches and twigs. Sure enough, 
aphids and their crimson guardians clung to them. And near the base of 
the plant was the mound of pine needles that marked the entrance to the 
ants’ lair. It was strange to see with his own eyes; none of it betrayed the 
numerous and subtle interactions that he was now aware of. 


Engrossed in his thoughts, Eragon returned to the clearing, wondering 
what he might be crushing under his feet with every step. When he 
emerged from under the trees’ shelter, he was startled by how far the sun 
had fallen. I must have been sitting there for at least three hours. 


He found Oromis in his hut, writing with a goose-feather quill. The elf 
finished his line, then wiped the nib of the quill clean, stoppered his ink, 
and asked, “And what did you hear, Eragon?” 


Eragon was eager to share. As he described his experience, he heard his 
voice rise with enthusiasm over the details of the ants’ society. He re- 
counted everything that he could recall, down to the minutest and most 
inconsequential observation, proud of the information that he had gath- 
ered. 


When he finished, Oromis raised an eyebrow. “Is that all?” 


“J...” Dismay gripped Eragon as he understood that he had somehow 
missed the point of the exercise. “Yes, Ebrithil.” 


“And what about the other organisms in the earth and the air? Can you 
tell me what they were doing while your ants tended their droves?” 


“No, Ebrithil.” 


“Therein lies your mistake. You must become aware of all things 


274 


equally and not blinker yourself in order to concentrate on a particular 
subject. This is an essential lesson, and until you master it, you will medi- 
tate on the stump for an hour each day.” 


“How will I know when I have mastered it?” 
“When you can watch one and know all.” 


Oromis motioned for Eragon to join him at the table, then set a fresh 
sheet of paper before him, along with a quill and a bottle of ink. “So far 
you have made do with an incomplete knowledge of the ancient lan- 
guage. Not that any of us knows all the words in the language, but you 
must be familiar with its grammar and structure so that you do not kill 
yourself through an incorrectly placed verb or similar mistake. I do not 
expect you to speak our language like an elf—that would take a life- 
time—but I do expect you to achieve unconscious competence. That is, 
you must be able to use it without thinking. 


“In addition, you must learn to read and write the ancient language. Not 
only will this help you to memorize words, it is an essential skill if you 
need to compose an especially long spell and you don’t trust your mem- 
ory, or if you find such a spell recorded and you want to use it. 


“Every race has evolved their own system of writing the ancient lan- 
guage. The dwarves use their runic alphabet, as do humans. They are only 
makeshift techniques, though, and are incapable of expressing the lan- 
guage’s true subtleties as well as our Liduen Kvaedhi, the Poetic Script. 
The Liduen Kvaedhi was designed to be as elegant, beautiful, and precise 
as possible. It is composed of forty-two different shapes that represent 
various sounds. These shapes can be combined in a nearly infinite range 
of glyphs that represent both individual words and entire phrases. The 
symbol on your ring is one such glyph. The symbol on Zar’roc is an- 
other.... Let us start: What are the basic vowel sounds of the ancient lan- 
guage?” 


“What?” 


Eragon’s ignorance of the underpinnings of the ancient language quickly 
became apparent. When he had traveled with Brom, the old storyteller 
had concentrated on having Eragon memorize lists of words that he 
might need to survive, as well as perfecting his pronunciation. In those 
two areas, he excelled, but he could not even explain the difference be- 
tween a definite and indefinite article. If the gaps in his education frus- 
trated Oromis, the elf did not betray it through word or action, but la- 


273 


bored persistently to mend them. 


At a certain point during the lesson, Eragon commented, “I’ve never 
needed very many words in my spells; Brom said it was a gift that I could 
do so much with just brisingr. 1 think the most I ever said in the ancient 
language was when I spoke to Arya in her mind and when I blessed an 
orphan in Farthen Dar.” 


“You blessed a child in the ancient language?” asked Oromis, suddenly 
alert. “Do you remember how you worded this blessing?” 


“Aye.” 


“Recite it for me.” Eragon did so, and a look of pure horror engulfed 


Oromis. He exclaimed, “You used skélir! Are you sure? Wasn't it skéliro 
” 


Eragon frowned. “No, skélir. Why shouldn't I have used it? Skélir means 
shielded. ‘.. and may you be shielded from misfortune.’ It was a good 
blessing.” 


“That was no blessing, but a curse.” Oromis was more agitated than Er- 
agon had ever seen him. “The suffix o forms the past tense of verbs end- 
ing with r and i. Skéliro means shielded, but skélir means shield. What 
you said was ‘May luck and happiness follow you and may you be a 
shield from misfortune.’ Instead of protecting this child from the vagaries 
of fate, you condemned her to be a sacrifice for others, to absorb their 
misery and suffering so that they might live in peace.” 


No, no! It can’t be! Eragon recoiled from the possibility. “The effect a 
spell has isn’t only determined by the word's sense, but also by your in- 
tent, and I didn’t intend to harm—’” 


“You cannot gainsay a word's inherent nature. Twist it, yes. Guide it, 
yes. But not contravene its definition to imply the very opposite.” Oromis 
pressed his fingers together and stared at the table, his lips reduced to a 
flat white line. “I will trust that you did not mean harm, else I would re- 
fuse to teach you further. If you were honest and your heart was pure, 
then this blessing may cause less evil than I fear, though it will still be the 
nucleus of more pain than either of us could wish.” 


Violent trembling overtook Eragon as he realized what he had done to 


the child’s life. “It may not undo my mistake,” he said, “but perhaps it will 
alleviate it; Saphira marked the girl on the brow, just like she marked my 


276 


palm with the gedwéy ignasia.” 


For the first time in his life, Eragon witnessed an elf dumbstruck. 
Oromis’s gray eyes widened, his mouth opened, and he clutched the arms 
of his chair until the wood groaned with protest. “One who bears the sign 
of the Riders, and yet is not a Rider,” he murmured. “In all my years, I 
have never met anyone such as the two of you. Every decision you make 
seems to have an impact far beyond what anyone could anticipate. You 
change the world with your whims.” 


“Is that good or bad?” 
“Neither, it just is. Where is the babe now?” 


It took a moment for Eragon to compose his thoughts. “With the 
Varden, either in Farthen Dtr or Surda. Do you think that Saphira’s mark 
will help her?” 


“I know not,” said Oromis. “No precedent exists to draw upon for wis- 
dom.” 


“There must be ways to remove the blessing, to negate a spell.” Eragon 
was almost pleading. 


“There are. But for them to be most effective, you should be the one to 
apply them, and you cannot be spared here. Even under the best of cir- 
cumstances, remnants of your magic will haunt this girl evermore. Such is 
the power of the ancient language.” He paused. “I see that you understand 
the gravity of the situation, so I will say this only once: you bear full re- 
sponsibility for this girl’s doom, and, because of the wrong you did her, it 
is incumbent upon you to help her if ever the opportunity should arise. 
By the Riders’ law, she is your shame as surely as if you had begotten her 
out of wedlock, a disgrace among humans, if I remember correctly.” 


“Aye,” whispered Eragon. “I understand.” I understand that I forced a de- 
fenseless baby to pursue a certain destiny without ever giving her a choice in 
the matter. Can someone be truly good if they never have the opportunity to 
act badly? I made her a slave. He also knew that if he had been bound in 
that manner without permission, he would hate his jailer with every fiber 
of his being. 


“Then we will speak of this no more.” 


“Yes, Ebrithil.” 


277 


Eragon was still subdued, even depressed, by the end of the day. He 
barely looked up when they went outside to meet Saphira and Glaedr 
upon their return. The trees shook from the fury of the gale that the two 
dragons created with their wings. Saphira seemed proud of herself; she 
arched her neck and pranced toward Eragon, opening her chops in a lu- 
pine grin. 


A stone cracked under Glaedr’s weight as the ancient dragon turned a 
giant eye—as large as a dinner platter—on Eragon and asked, What are 
the rules three to spotting downdrafts, and the rules five for escaping them? 


Startled out of his reverie, Eragon could only blink dumbly. “I don’t 
know.” 


Then Oromis confronted Saphira and asked, “What creatures do ants 
farm, and how do they extract food from them?” 


I wouldn’t know, declared Saphira. She sounded affronted. 


A gleam of anger leaped into Oromis’s eyes and he crossed his arms, 
though his expression remained calm. “After all the two of you have 
done together, I would think that you had learned the most basic lesson 
of being Shur'tugal: Share everything with your partner. Would you cut 
off your right arm? Would you fly with only one wing? Never. Then why 
would you ignore the bond that links you? By doing so, you reject your 
greatest gift and your advantage over any single opponent. Nor should 
you just talk to each other with your minds, but rather mingle your con- 
sciousnesses until you act and think as one. I expect both of you to know 
what either one of you is taught.” 


“What about our privacy?” objected Eragon. 


Privacy? said Glaedr. Keep your thoughts to thyself when you leave here, 
if it pleases you, but while we tutor you, you have no privacy. 


Eragon looked at Saphira, feeling even worse than before. She avoided 
his gaze, then stamped a foot and faced him directly. What? 


They’re right. We have been negligent. 


It’s not my fault. 


I didn't say that it was. She had guessed his opinion, though. He re- 
sented the attention she lavished on Glaedr and how it drew her away 
from him. We'll do better, won’t we? 


Of course! she snapped. 


She declined to offer Oromis and Glaedr an apology, though, leaving 
the task to Eragon. “We won't disappoint you again.” 


“See that you don’t. You will be tested tomorrow on what the other 
learned.” Oromis revealed a round wood bauble nestled in the middle of 
his palm. “So long as you take care to wind it regularly, this device will 
wake you at the proper time each morning. Return here as soon as you 
have bathed and eaten.” 


The bauble was surprisingly heavy when Eragon took it. The size of a 
walnut, it had been carved with deep whorls around a knob wrought in 
the likeness of a moss-rose blossom. He turned the knob experimentally 
and heard three clicks as a hidden ratchet advanced. “Thank you,” he said. 


279 


UNDER THE MENOA TREE 





After Eragon and Saphira had said their farewells, they flew back to 
their tree house with Saphira’s new saddle dangling between her front 
claws. Without acknowledging the fact, they gradually opened their 
minds and allowed their connection to widen and deepen, though neither 
of them consciously reached for the other. Eragon’s tumultuous emotions 
must have been strong enough for Saphira to sense anyway, though, for 


she asked, What happened, then? 


A throbbing pain built up behind his eyes as he explained the terrible 
crime he had committed in Farthen Dar. Saphira was as appalled by it as 
he was. He said, Your gift may help that girl, but what I did is inexcusable 
and will only hurt her. 


The blame isn’t all yours. I share your knowledge of the ancient language, 
and I didn’t spot the error any more than you did. When Eragon remained 
silent, she added, At least your back didn’t cause any trouble today. Be 
grateful for that. 


He grunted, unwilling to be tempted out of his black mood. And what 
did you learn this fine day? 


How to identify and avoid dangerous weather patterns. She paused, ap- 
parently ready to share the memories with him, but he was too busy 
worrying about his distorted blessing to inquire further. Nor could he 
bear the thought of being so intimate right then. When he did not pursue 
the matter, Saphira withdrew into a taciturn silence. 


Back in their bedroom, he found a tray of food by the screen door, as 
he had the previous night. Carrying the tray to his bed—which had been 
remade with fresh linens—he settled down to eat, cursing the lack of 
meat. Already sore from the Rimgar, he propped himself up with pillows 
and was about to take his first bite when there came a gentle rapping at 
the opening to his chamber. “Enter,” he growled. He took a drink of wa- 
ter. 


Eragon nearly choked as Arya stepped through the doorway. She had 
abandoned the leather clothes she usually wore in favor of a soft green 
tunic cinched at the waist with a girdle adorned with moonstones. She 
had also removed her customary headband, allowing her hair to tumble 
around her face and over her shoulders. The biggest change, however, 
was not so much in her dress but her bearing; the brittle tension that had 


280 


permeated her demeanor ever since Eragon first met her was now gone. 
She seemed to have finally relaxed. 


He scrambled to his feet, noticing that her own were bare. “Arya! Why 
are you here?” 


Touching her first two fingers to her lips, she said, “Do you plan on 
spending another evening inside?” 


“T ” 


“You have been in Ellesméra for three days now, and yet you have seen 
nothing of our city. I know that you always wished to explore it. Set 
aside your weariness this once and accompany me.” Gliding toward him, 
she took Zar’roc from where it lay by his side and beckoned to him. 


He rose from the bed and followed her into the vestibule, where they 
descended through the trapdoor and down the precipitous staircase that 
wound around the rough tree trunk. Overhead, the gathering clouds 
glowed with the sun’s last rays before it was extinguished behind the 
edge of the world. 


A piece of bark fell on Eragon’s head and he looked up to see Saphira 
leaning out of their bedroom, gripping the wood with her claws. Without 
opening her wings, she sprang into the air and dropped the hundred or so 
feet to the ground, landing in a thunderous cloud of dirt. I’m coming. 


“Of course,” said Arya, as if she expected nothing less. Eragon scowled; 
he had wanted to be alone with her, but he knew better than to com- 
plain. 


They walked under the trees, where dusk already extended its tendrils 
from inside hollow logs, dark crevices in boulders, and the underside of 
knobby eaves. Here and there, a gemlike lantern twinkled within the side 
of a tree or at the end of a branch, casting gentle pools of light on either 
side of the path. 


Elves worked on various projects in and around the lanterns’ radius, 
solitary except for a few, rare couples. Several elves sat high in the trees, 
playing mellifluous tunes on their reed pipes, while others stared at the 
sky with peaceful expressions—neither awake nor asleep. One elf sat 
cross-legged before a pottery wheel that whirled round and round with a 
steady rhythm while a delicate urn took form beneath his hands. The 


281 


werecat, Maud, crouched beside him in the shadows, watching his pro- 
gress. Her eyes flared silver as she looked at Eragon and Saphira. The elf 
followed her gaze and nodded to them without halting his work. 


Through the trees, Eragon glimpsed an elf—man or woman, he could 
not tell—squatting on a rock in the middle of a stream, muttering a spell 
over the orb of glass clutched in its hands. He twisted his neck in an at- 
tempt to get an unobstructed view, but the spectacle had already van- 


ished into the dark. 


“What,” asked Eragon, keeping his voice low so as to not disturb any- 
one, “do most elves do for a living or profession?” 


Arya answered just as quietly. “Our strength with magic grants us as 
much leisure as we desire. We neither hunt nor farm, and, as a result, we 
spend our days working to master our interests, whatever they might be. 
Very little exists that we must strive for.” 


Through a tunnel of dogwood draped with creepers, they entered the 
enclosed atrium of a house grown out of a ring of trees. An open-walled 
hut occupied the center of the atrium, which sheltered a forge and an as- 
sortment of tools that Eragon knew even Horst would covet. 


An elf woman held a pair of small tongs in a nest of molten coals, 
working bellows with her right hand. With uncanny speed, she pulled 
the tongs from the fire—revealing a ring of white-hot steel clamped in 
the pincers’ jaws—looped the ring through the edge of an incomplete 
mail corselet hung over the anvil, grasped a hammer, and welded shut the 
open ends of the ring with a blow and a burst of sparks. 


Only then did Arya approach. “Atra esterni ono thelduin.” 


The elf faced them, her neck and cheek lit from underneath by the 
coals’ bloody light. Like taut wires embedded in her skin, her face was 
scribed with a delicate pattern of lines—the greatest display of age Er- 
agon had seen in an elf. She gave no response to Arya, which he knew 
was offensive and discourteous, especially since the queen’s daughter had 
honored her by speaking first. 


“Rhun6on-elda, I have brought you the newest Rider, Eragon Shade- 
slayer.” 


“I heard you were dead,” said Rhunén to Arya. Rhun6n’s voice guttered 
and rasped unlike any other elf’s. It reminded Eragon of the old men of 


282 


Carvahall who sat on the porches outside their houses, smoking pipes and 
telling stories. 


Arya smiled. “When did you last leave your house, Rhunén?” 


“You should know. It was that Midsummer’s Feast you forced me to at- 
tend.” 


“That was three years ago.” 


“Was it?” Rhun6én frowned as she banked the coals and covered them 
with a grated lid. “Well, what of it? I find company trying. A gaggle of 
meaningless chatter that...” She glared at Arya. “Why are we speaking this 
foul language? I suppose you want me to forge a sword for him? You 
know I swore to never create instruments of death again, not after that 
traitor of a Rider and the destruction he wreaked with my blade.” 


“Eragon already has a sword,” said Arya. She raised her arm and pre- 
sented Zar’roc to the smith. 


Rhunén took Zar'roc with a look of wonder. She caressed the wine-red 
sheath, lingered on the black symbol etched into it, rubbed a bit of dirt 
from the hilt, then wrapped her fingers around the handle and drew the 
sword with all the authority of a warrior. She sighted down each of 
Zarroc’s edges and flexed the blade between her hands until Eragon 
feared it might break. Then, in a single movement, Rhunén swung 
Zar roc over her head and brought it down upon the tongs on her anvil, 
riving them in half with a resounding ring. 


“Zar'roc,” said Rhun6n. “I remember thee.” She cradled the weapon like 
a mother would her firstborn. “As perfect as the day you were finished.” 
Turning her back, she looked up at the knotted branches while she 
traced the curves of the pommel. “My entire life I spent hammering these 
swords out of ore. Then he came and destroyed them. Centuries of effort 
obliterated in an instant. So far as I knew, only four examples of my art 
still existed. His sword, Oromis’s, and two others guarded by families 
who managed to rescue them from the Wyrdfell.” 


Wyrdfell? Eragon dared ask Arya with his mind. 
Another name for the Forsworn. 


Rhun6n turned on Eragon. “Now Zar'roc has returned to me. Of all my 
creations, this I least expected to hold again, save for his. How came you 


283 


to possess Morzan’s sword?” 
“It was given to me by Brom.” 


“Brom?” She hefted Zar'roc. “Brom... I remember Brom. He begged me 
to replace the sword he had lost. Truly, I wished to help him, but I had 
already taken my oath. My refusal angered him beyond reason. Oromis 
had to knock him unconscious before he would leave.” 


Eragon seized on the information with interest. “Your handiwork has 
served me well, Rhunén-elda. I would be long dead were it not for 
Zar'roc. I killed the Shade Durza with it.” 


“Did you now? Then some good has come of it.” Sheathing Zar'roc, 
Rhunén returned it to him, though not without reluctance, then looked 
past him to Saphira. “Ah. Well met, Skulblaka.” 


Well met, Rhunén-elda. 


Without bothering to ask permission, Rhunén went up to Saphira’s 
shoulder and tapped a scale with one of her blunt fingernails, twisting her 
head from side to side in an attempt to peer into the translucent pebble. 
“Good color. Not like those brown dragons, all muddy and dark. Properly 
speaking, a Rider’s sword should match the hue of his dragon, and this 
blue would have made a gorgeous blade....” The thought seemed to drain 
the energy from her. She returned to the anvil and stared at the wrecked 
tongs, as if the will to replace them had deserted her. 


Eragon felt that it would be wrong to end the conversation on such a 
depressing note, but he could not think of a tactful way to change the 
subject. The glimmering corselet caught his attention and, as he studied 
it, he was astonished to see that every ring was welded shut. Because the 
tiny links cooled so quickly, they usually had to be welded before being 
attached to the main piece of mail, which meant that the finest mail— 
such as Eragon’s hauberk—was composed of links that were alternately 
welded and riveted closed. Unless, it seemed, the smith possessed an elf’s 
speed and precision. 


Eragon said, “I’ve never seen the equal of your mail, not even among 
the dwarves. How do you have the patience to weld every link? Why 


don’t you just use magic and save yourself the work?” 


He hardly expected the burst of passion that animated Rhunén. She 
tossed her short-cropped hair and said, “And rob myself of all pleasure in 


284 


this task? Aye, every other elf and I could use magic to satisfy our de- 
sires—and some do—but then what meaning is there in life? How would 
you fill your time? Tell me.” 


“I don’t know,” he confessed. 


“By pursuing that which you love the most. When you can have any- 
thing you want by uttering a few words, the goal matters not, only the 
journey to it. A lesson for you. You'll face the same dilemma one day, if 
you live long enough.... Now begone! I am weary of this talk.” With that 
Rhunén plucked the lid off the forge, retrieved a new pair of tongs, and 
immersed a ring in the coals while she worked the bellows with single- 
minded intensity. 


“Rhun6on-elda,” said Arya, “remember, I will return for you on the eve 
of the Agaeti Blédhren.” A grunt was her only reply. 


The rhythmic peal of steel on steel, as lonely as the cry of a death bird 
in the night, accompanied them back through the dogwood tunnel and 
onto the path. Behind them, Rhunén was no more than a black figure 
bowed over the sullen glow of her forge. 


“She made all the Riders’ swords?” asked Eragon. “Every last one?” 


“That and more. She’s the greatest smith who has ever lived. I thought 
that you should meet her, for her sake and yours.” 


“Thank you.” 
Is she always so brusque? asked Saphira. 


Arya laughed. “Always. For her, nothing matters except her craft, and 
she’s famously impatient with anything—or anyone—that interferes with 
it. Her eccentricities are well tolerated, though, because of her incredible 
skill and accomplishments.” 


While she spoke, Eragon tried to work out the meaning of Agaeti 
Blédhren. He was fairly sure that blédh stood for blood and, as a result, 
that blédhren was blood-oath, but he had never heard of agaeti. 


“Celebration,” explained Arya when he asked. “We hold the Blood-oath 
Celebration once every century to honor our pact with the dragons. Both 
of you are fortunate to be here now, for it is nigh upon us....” Her slanted 
eyebrows met as she frowned. “Fate has indeed arranged a most auspi- 


285 


cious coincidence.” 


She surprised Eragon by leading them deeper into Du Weldenvarden, 
down paths tangled with nettles and currant bushes, until the lights 
around them vanished and they entered the restless wilderness. In the 
darkness, Eragon had to rely on Saphira’s keen night vision so as to not 
lose his way. The craggy trees increased in width, crowding closer and 
closer together and threatening to form an impenetrable barrier. Just 
when it appeared that they could go no farther, the forest ended and they 
entered a clearing washed with moonlight from the bright sickle low in 
the eastern sky. 


A lone pine tree stood in the middle of the clearing. No taller than the 
rest of its brethren, it was thicker than a hundred regular trees combined; 
in comparison, they looked as puny as windblown saplings. A blanket of 
roots radiated from the tree’s massive trunk, covering the ground with 
bark-sheathed veins that made it seem as if the entire forest flowed out 
from the tree, as if it were the heart of Du Weldenvarden itself. The tree 
presided over the woods like a benevolent matriarch, protecting its in- 
habitants under the shelter of her branches. 


“Behold the Menoa tree,” whispered Arya. “We observe the Agaeti 
Blédhren in her shade.” 


A cold tingle crawled down Eragon’s side as he recognized the name. 
After Angela told his fortune in Teirm, Solembum had come up to him 
and said, When the time comes and you need a weapon, look under the roots 
of the Menoa tree. Then, when all seems lost and your power is insufficient, 
go to the rock of Kuthian and speak your name to open the Vault of Souls. 
Eragon could not imagine what kind of weapon might be buried under 
the tree, nor how he would go about finding it. 


Do you see anything? he asked Saphira. 


No, but then I doubt that Solembum’s words will make sense until our 
need is clear. 


Eragon told Arya about both parts of the werecat’s counsel, although— 
as he had with Ajihad and Islanzadi—he kept Angela’s prophecy a secret 
because of its personal nature, and because he feared that it might lead 
Arya to guess his attraction to her. 


When he finished, Arya said, “Werecats rarely offer help, and when 
they do, it’s not to be ignored. So far as I know, no weapon is hidden 


286 


here, not even in song or legend. As for the Rock of Kuthian... the name 
echoes in my head like a voice from a half-forgotten dream, familiar yet 
strange. I’ve heard it before, though I cannot recall where.” 


As they approached the Menoa tree, Eragon’s attention was caught by 
the multitude of ants crawling over the roots. Faint black smudges were 
all he could see of the insects, but Oromis’s assignment had sensitized 
him to the currents of life around him, and he could feel the ants’ primi- 
tive consciousness with his mind. He lowered his defenses and allowed 
his awareness to flood outward, lightly touching Saphira and Arya and 
then expanding beyond them to see what else lived in the clearing. 


With unexpected suddenness, he encountered an immense entity, a 
sentient being of such a colossal nature, he could not grasp the limits of 
its psyche. Even Oromis’s vast intellect, which Eragon had been in con- 
tact with in Farthen Dir, was dwarfed in comparison to this presence. 
The very air seemed to thrum with the energy and strength that ema- 
nated from...the tree? 


The source was unmistakable. 


Deliberate and inexorable, the tree’s thoughts moved at a measured 
pace as slow as the creep of ice over granite. It took no notice of Eragon 
nor, he was sure, of any single individual. It was entirely concerned with 
the affairs of things that grow and flourish in the bright sunlight, with the 
dogbane and the lily, the evening primrose and the silky foxglove and the 
yellow mustard tall beside the crabapple with its purple blossoms. 


“It’s awake!” exclaimed Eragon, shocked into speaking. “I mean... it’s in- 
telligent.” He knew that Saphira felt it too; she cocked her head toward 
the Menoa tree, as if listening, then flew to one of its branches, which 
were as thick as the road from Carvahall to Therinsford. There she 
perched with her tail hanging free, waving the tip of it back and forth, 
ever so gracefully. It was such an odd sight, a dragon in a tree, that Eragon 
almost laughed. 


“Of course she’s awake,” said Arya. Her voice was low and mellow in 
the night air. “Shall I tell you the story of the Menoa tree?” 


‘T’d like that.” 
A flash of white streaked across the sky, like a banished specter, and re- 


solved itself beside Saphira in the form of Blagden. The raven’s narrow 
shoulders and crooked neck gave him the appearance of a miser basking 


287 


in the radiance of a pile of gold. The raven lifted his pallid head and ut- 
tered his ominous cry,“ Wyrda!” 


“This is what happened. Once there lived a woman, Linnéa, in the years 
of spice and wine before our war with the dragons and before we became 
as immortal as any beings still composed of vulnerable flesh can be. Lin- 
néa had grown old without the comfort of a mate or children, nor did she 
feel the need to seek them out, preferring to occupy herself with the art 
of singing to plants, of which she was a master. That is, she did until a 
young man came to her door and beguiled her with words of love. His 
affections woke a part of Linnéa that she had never suspected existed, a 
craving to experience the things that she had unknowingly sacrificed. The 
offer of a second chance was too great an opportunity for her to ignore. 
She deserted her work and devoted herself to the young man and, for a 
time, they were happy. 


“But the young man was young, and he began to long for a mate closer 
to his own age. His eye fell upon a young woman, and he wooed and won 
her. And for a time, they too were happy. 


“When Linnéa discovered that she had been spurned, scorned, and 
abandoned, she went mad with grief. The young man had done the worst 
possible thing; he had given her a taste of the fullness of life, then torn it 
away with no more thought than a rooster flitting from one hen to the 
next. She found him with the woman and, in her fury, she stabbed him 
to death. 


“Linnéa knew that what she had done was evil. She also knew that even 
if she was exonerated of the murder, she could not return to her previous 
existence. Life had lost all joy for her. So she went to the oldest tree in 
Du Weldenvarden, pressed herself against it, and sang herself into the 
tree, abandoning all allegiance to her own race. For three days and three 
nights she sang, and when she finished, she had become one with her be- 
loved plants. And through all the millennia since has she kept watch over 
the forest.... Thus was the Menoa tree created.” 


At the conclusion of her tale, Arya and Eragon sat side by side on the 
crest of a huge root, twelve feet off the ground. Eragon bounced his heels 
against the tree and wondered if Arya had intended the story as a warning 
to him or if it was merely an innocent piece of history. 


His doubt hardened into certainty when she asked, “Do you think that 
the young man was to blame for the tragedy?” 


288 


“I think,” he said, knowing that a clumsy reply could turn her against 
him, “that what he did was cruel... and that Linnéa overreacted. They 
were both at fault.” 


Arya stared at him until he was forced to avert his gaze. “They weren't 
suited for each other.” 


Eragon began to deny it but then stopped himself. She was right. And 
she had maneuvered him so that he had to say it out loud, so that he had 
to say it to her. “Perhaps,” he admitted. 


Silence accumulated between them like sand piling into a wall that nei- 
ther of them was willing to breach. The high-pitched hum of cicadas 
echoed from the edge of the clearing. At last he said, “Being home seems 
to agree with you.” 


“It does.” With unconscious ease, she leaned over and picked up a thin 
branch that had fallen from the Menoa tree and began to weave the 
clumps of needles into a small basket. 


Hot blood rushed to Eragon’s face as he watched her. He hoped that 
the moon was not bright enough to reveal that his cheeks had turned 
mottled red. “Where... where do you live? Do you and Islanzadi have a 
palace or castle... ?” 


“We live in Tialdari Hall, our family’s ancestral buildings, in the west- 
ern part of Ellesméra. I would enjoy showing our home to you.” 


“Ah.” A practical question suddenly intruded in Eragon’s muddled 
thoughts, driving away his embarrassment. “Arya, do you have any sib- 
lings?” She shook her head. “Then you are the sole heir to the elven 
throne?” 


“Of course. Why do you ask?” She sounded bemused by his curiosity. 


“I don’t understand why you were allowed to become an ambassador to 
the Varden and dwarves, as well as ferry Saphira’s egg from here to Tron- 
jheim. It’s too dangerous an errand for a princess, much less the queen-in- 
waiting.” 


“You mean it’s too dangerous for a human woman. I told you before 
that I am not one of your helpless females. What you fail to realize is that 
we view our monarchs differently than you or the dwarves. To us, a king 
or queen’s highest responsibility is to serve their people however and 


289 


wherever possible. If that means forfeiting our lives in the process, we 
welcome the opportunity to prove our devotion to—as the dwarves 
say—hearth, hall, and honor. If I had died in the course of my duty, then 
a replacement successor would have been chosen from among our vari- 
ous Houses. Even now I would not be required to become queen if | 
found the prospect distasteful. We do not choose leaders who are unwill- 
ing to devote themselves wholeheartedly to their obligation.” She hesi- 
tated, then hugged her knees against her chest and propped her chin on 
them. “I had many years to perfect those arguments with my mother.” 
For a minute, the wheet-wheet of the cicadas went undisturbed in the 
clearing. Then she asked, “How go your studies with Oromis?” 


Eragon grunted as his foul temper returned on a wave of unpleasant 
memories, souring his pleasure at being with Arya. All he wanted to do 
was crawl into bed, go to sleep, and forget the day. “Oromis-elda,” he 
said, working each word around his mouth before letting it escape, “is 
quite thorough.” 


He winced as she gripped his upper arm with bruising strength. “What 
has gone amiss?” 


He tried to shrug her hand off. “Nothing.” 


‘I’ve traveled with you long enough to know when you're happy, an- 
gry... or in pain. Did something happen between you and Oromis? If so, 
you have to tell me so that it can be rectified as soon as possible. Or was 
it your back? We could—’” 


‘It’s not my training!” Despite his pique, Eragon noticed that she 
seemed genuinely concerned, which pleased him. “Ask Saphira. She can 
tell you.” 


“I want to hear it from you,” she said quietly. 


The muscles in Eragon’s jaw spasmed as he clenched his teeth. In a low 
voice, no more than a whisper, he first described how he had failed at his 
meditation in the glade, then the incident that poisoned his heart like a 
viper coiled in his chest: his blessing. 


Arya released his arm and clutched at the root of the Menoa tree, as if 
to steady herself. “Barzil.” The dwarf curse alarmed him; he had never 
heard her use profanity before, and this one was particularly apt, for it 
meant ill fate. “I knew of your act in Farthen Dar, for sure, but I never 
thought... I never suspected that such a thing could occur. I cry your par- 


290 


don, Eragon, for forcing you to leave your rooms tonight. I did not com- 
prehend your discomfort. You must want to be alone.” 


“No,” he said. “No, I appreciate the company and the things you've 
shown me.” He smiled at her, and after a moment, she smiled back. To- 
gether they sat small and still at the base of the ancient tree and watched 
the moon arch high over the peaceful forest before it hid behind the 
gathering clouds. “I only wonder what will become of the child.” 


High above their heads, Blagden ruffled his bone-white feathers and 
shrieked, “Wyrda!” 


291 


A MAZE OF OPPOSITION 





Nasuada crossed her arms without bothering to conceal her impatience 
as she examined the two men before her. 


The one on the right had a neck so thick, it forced his head to jut for- 
ward at nearly right angles to his shoulders, giving him a stubborn, dim- 
witted appearance. This was intensified by his heavy brow with its two 
cliffs of matted hair—almost long enough to pull over his eyes—and bul- 
bous lips that remained puckered into a pink mushroom, even when he 
spoke. She knew better than to put stock in his repulsive looks, though. 
No matter its rough housing, his tongue was as clever as a jester’s. 


The only identifying feature of the second man was his pale skin, which 
refused to darken under Surda’s relentless sun, even though the Varden 
had been in Aberon, the capital, for some weeks now. From his coloring, 
Nasuada guessed he had been born in the northern reaches of the Empire. 
He held a knit wool cap that he wrung into a hard rope between his 
hands. 


“You,” she said, pointing at him. “How many of your chickens did he 
kill again?” 


“Thirteen, Ma’am.” 


Nasuada returned her attention to the ugly man. “An unlucky number, 
by all accounts, Master Gamble. And so it has proved for you. You are 
guilty of both theft and destroying someone else’s property without of- 
fering proper recompense.” 


“T never denied it.” 


“I only wonder how you ate thirteen chickens in four days. Are you 
ever full, Master Gamble?” 


He gave her a jocular grin and scratched the side of his face. The rasp of 
his untrimmed fingernails over his stubble annoyed her, and it was only 
with an effort of will that she kept from asking him to stop. “Well, not to 
be disrespectful, Ma’am, but filling my stomach wouldn't be a problem if 
you fed us properly, what with all the work we do. I’m a large man, an’ I 
need a bit o’ meat in my belly after half a day breaking rocks with a mat- 
tock. I did my best to resist temptation, I did. But three weeks of short 
rations and watching these farmers drive around fat livestock they 


292 


wouldn't share even if a body were starving... Well, I'll admit, it broke 
me. I’m not a strong man when it comes to food. I like it hot and I like 
plenty of it. An’ I don’t fancy I’m the only one willing to help himself.” 


And that’s the heart of the problem, reflected Nasuada. The Varden 
could not afford to feed its members, not even with Surda’s king, Orrin, 
helping. Orrin had opened his treasury to them, but he had refused to 
behave as Galbatorix was wont to do when moving his army across the 
Empire, which was to appropriate supplies from his countrymen without 
paying for them. A noble sentiment, but one that only makes my task 
harder. Still, she knew that acts like those were what separated her, 
Orrin, Hrothgar, and Islanzadi from Galbatorix’s despotism. It would be so 
easy to cross that divide without noticing it. 


“I understand your reasons, Master Gamble. However, although the 
Varden aren’t a country and we answer to no one’s authority but our 
own, that does not give you or anyone else leave to ignore the rule of law 
as laid down by my predecessors or as it’s observed here in Surda. There- 
fore, I order you to pay a copper for each chicken you stole.” 


Gamble surprised her by acceding without protest. “As you wish, 
Ma’am,” he said. 


“That’s it?” exclaimed the pale man. He wrung his cap even tighter. 
“That’s no fair price. If I sold them in any market, they’>d—’ 


She could not contain herself any longer. “Yes! You'd get more. But I 
happen to know that Master Gamble cannot afford to give you the 
chickens’ full price, as I’m the one who provides his salary! As I do yours. 
You forget that if I decided to acquire your poultry for the good of the 
Varden, you'd get no more than a copper a chicken and be lucky at that. 
Am I understood?” 


“He can’t—’” 

“Am I understood?” 

After a moment, the pale man subsided and muttered, “Yes, Ma’am.” 

“Very well. You're both dismissed.” With an expression of sardonic 
admiration, Gamble touched his brow and bowed to Nasuada before 


backing out of the stone room with his sullen opponent. “You too,” she 
said to the guards on either side of the door. 


293 


As soon as they were gone, she slumped in her chair with an exhausted 
sigh and reached for her fan, batting it over her face in a futile attempt to 
dissipate the pinpricks of sweat that accumulated on her forehead. The 
constant heat drained her strength and made even the smallest task ardu- 
ous. 


She suspected she would feel tired even if it were winter. Familiar as 
she was with the innermost secrets of the Varden, it still had taken more 
work than she expected to transport the entire organization from Farthen 
Dar, through the Beor Mountains, and deliver them to Surda and 
Aberon. She shuddered, remembering long, uncomfortable days spent in 
the saddle. Planning and executing their departure had been exceedingly 
difficult, as was integrating the Varden into their new surroundings while 
simultaneously preparing for an attack on the Empire. I don’t have enough 
time each day to solve all these problems, she lamented. 


Finally, she dropped the fan and rang the bellpull, summoning her 
handmaid, Farica. The banner hanging to the right of the cherrywood 
desk rippled as the door hidden behind it opened. Farica slipped out to 
stand with downcast eyes by Nasuada’s elbow. 


“Are there any more?” asked Nasuada. 
“No, Ma’am.” 


She tried not to let her relief show. Once a week, she held an open 
court to resolve the Varden’s various disputes. Anyone who felt that they 
had been wronged could seek an audience with her and ask for her judg- 
ment. She could not imagine a more difficult and thankless chore. As her 
father had often said after negotiating with Hrothgar, “A good compro- 
mise leaves everyone angry.” And so it seemed. 


Returning her attention to the matter at hand, she told Farica, “I want 
that Gamble reassigned. Give him a job where his talent with words will 
be of some use. Quartermaster, perhaps, just so long as it’s a job where 
he'll get full rations. I don’t want to see him before me for stealing again.” 

Farica nodded and went to the desk, where she recorded Nasuada’s in- 
structions on a parchment scroll. That skill alone made her invaluable. 
Farica asked, “Where can I find him?” 

“One of the work gangs in the quarry.” 


“Yes, Ma’am. Oh, while you were occupied, King Orrin asked that you 


294 


join him in his laboratory.” 


“What has he done in there now, blind himself?” Nasuada washed her 
wrists and neck with lavender water, then checked her hair in the mirror 
of polished silver that Orrin had given her and tugged on her overgown 
until the sleeves were straight. 


Satisfied with her appearance, she swept out of her chambers with 
Farica in tow. The sun was so bright today that no torches were needed 
to illuminate the inside of Borromeo Castle, nor could their added 
warmth have been tolerated. Shafts of light fell through the crossletted 
arrow slits and glowed upon the inner wall of the corridor, striping the 
air with bars of golden dust at regular intervals. Nasuada looked out one 
embrasure toward the barbican, where thirty or so of Orrin’s orange-clad 
cavalry soldiers were setting forth on another of their ceaseless rounds of 
patrols in the countryside surrounding Aberon. 


Not that they could do much good if Galbatorix decided to attack us him- 
self, she thought bitterly. Their only protection against that was Galba- 
torix’s pride and, she hoped, his fear of Eragon. All leaders were aware of 
the risk of usurpation, but usurpers themselves were doubly afraid of the 
threat that a single determined individual could pose. Nasuada knew that 
she was playing an exceedingly dangerous game with the most powerful 
madman in Alagaésia. If she misjudged how far she could push him, she 
and the rest of the Varden would be destroyed, along with any hope of 
ending Galbatorix’s reign. 


The clean smell of the castle reminded her of the times she had stayed 
there as a child, back when Orrin’s father, King Larkin, still ruled. She 
never saw much of Orrin then. He was five years older than her and al- 
ready occupied with his duties as a prince. Nowadays, though, she often 
felt as if she were the elder one. 


At the door to Orrin’s laboratory, she had to stop and wait for his 
bodyguards, who were always posted outside, to announce her presence 
to the king. Soon Orrin’s voice boomed out into the stairwell: “Lady 
Nasuada! I’m so glad you came. I have something to show you.” 


Mentally bracing herself, she entered the laboratory with Farica. A 
maze of tables laden with a fantastic array of alembics, beakers, and re- 
torts confronted them, like a glass thicket waiting to snag their dresses on 
any one of its myriad fragile branches. The heavy odor of metallic vapors 
made Nasuada’s eyes water. Lifting their hems off the floor, she and 
Farica wended their way in single file toward the back of the room, past 


295 


hourglasses and scales, arcane tomes bound with black iron, dwarven as- 
trolabes, and piles of phosphorescent crystal prisms that produced fitful 
blue flashes. 


They met Orrin by a marble-topped bench, where he stirred a crucible 
of quicksilver with a glass tube that was closed at one end, open at the 
other, and must have measured at least three feet in length, although it 
was only a quarter of an inch thick. 


“Sire,” said Nasuada. As befitted one of equal rank to the king, she re- 
mained upright while Farica curtsied. “You seem to have recovered from 
the explosion last week.” 


Orrin grimaced good-naturedly. “I learned that it’s not wise to combine 
phosphorus and water in an enclosed space. The result can be quite vio- 
lent.” 


“Has all of your hearing returned?” 


“Not entirely, but...” Grinning like a boy with his first dagger, he lit a 
taper with the coals from a brazier, which she could not fathom how he 
endured in the stifling weather, carried the flaming brand back to the 
bench, and used it to start a pipe packed with cardus weed. 


“I didn’t know that you smoked.” 


“I don't really,” he confessed, “except that I found that since my ear- 
drum hasn't completely sealed up yet, I can do this...” Drawing on the 
pipe, he puffed out his cheeks until a tendril of smoke issued from his 
left ear, like a snake leaving its den, and coiled up the side of his head. It 
was so unexpected, Nasuada burst out laughing, and after a moment, 
Orrin joined her, releasing a plume of smoke from his mouth. “It’s the 
most peculiar sensation,” he confided. “Tickles like crazy on the way out.” 


Growing serious again, Nasuada asked, “Was there something else that 
you wished to discuss with me, Sire?” 


He snapped his fingers. “Of course.” Dipping his long glass tube in the 
crucible, he filled it with quicksilver, then capped the open end with one 
finger and showed the whole thing to her. “Would you agree that the 


only thing in this tube is quicksilver?” 


“I would.” Is this why he wanted to see me? 


296 


“And what about now?” With a quick movement, he inverted the tube 
and planted the open end inside the crucible, removing his finger. Instead 
of all pouring out, as Nasuada expected, the quicksilver in the tube 
dropped about halfway, then stopped and held its position. Orrin pointed 
to the empty section above the suspended metal. He asked, “What occu- 
pies that space?” 


“It must be air,” asserted Nasuada. 


Orrin grinned and shook his head. “If that were true, how would the air 
bypass the quicksilver or diffuse through the glass? No routes are avail- 
able by which the atmosphere can gain admission.” He gestured at Farica. 
“What's your opinion, maid?” 


Farica stared at the tube, then shrugged and said, “It can’t be nothing, 
Sire.” 


“Ah, but that’s exactly what I think it is: nothing. I believe that I’ve 
solved one of the oldest conundrums of natural philosophy by creating 
and proving the existence of a vacuum! It completely invalidates Va- 
cher’s theories and means that Ladin was actually a genius. Blasted elves 
always seem to be right.” 


Nasuada struggled to remain cordial as she asked, “What purpose does 
it serve, though?” 


“Purpose?” Orrin looked at her with genuine astonishment. “None, of 
course. At least not that I can think of. However, this will help us to un- 
derstand the mechanics of our world, how and why things happen. It’s a 
wondrous discovery. Who knows what else it might lead to?” While he 
spoke, he emptied the tube and carefully placed it in a velvet-padded 
box that held similar delicate instruments. “The prospect that truly ex- 
cites me, though, is of using magic to ferret out nature’s secrets. Why, 
just yesterday, with a single spell, Trianna helped me to discover two en- 
tirely new gases. Imagine what could be learned if magic were systemati- 
cally applied to the disciplines of natural philosophy. I’m considering 
learning magic myself, if I have the talent for it, and if I can convince 
some magic users to divulge their knowledge. It’s a pity that your Dragon 
Rider, Eragon, didn’t accompany you here; I’m sure that he could help 


” 


me. 
Looking at Farica, Nasuada said, “Wait for me outside.” The woman 


curtsied and then departed. Once Nasuada heard the door to the labora- 
tory close, she said, “Orrin. Have you taken leave of your senses?” 


297 


“Whatever do you mean?” 


“While you spend your time locked in here conducting experiments 
that no one understands—endangering your well-being in the process— 
your country totters on the brink of war. A myriad issues await your de- 
cision, and you stand here blowing smoke and playing with quicksilver?” 


His face hardened. “I am quite aware of my duties, Nasuada. You may 
lead the Varden, but I’m still king of Surda, and you would do well to re- 
call that before you speak so disrespectfully. Need I remind you that your 
sanctuary here depends on my continued goodwill?” 


She knew it was an idle threat; many of the Surdan people had relatives 
in the Varden, and vice versa. They were too closely linked for either of 
them to abandon the other. No, the real reason that Orrin had taken of- 
fense was the question of authority. Since it was nigh impossible to keep 
large groups of armed warriors at the ready over extended periods of 
time—as Nasuada had learned, feeding that many inactive people was a 
logistical nightmare—the Varden had begun taking jobs, starting farms, 
and otherwise assimilating into their host country. Where will that leave 
me eventually? As the leader of a nonexistent army? A general or councilor 
under Orrin? Her position was precarious. If she moved too quickly or 
with too much initiative, Orrin would perceive it as a threat and turn 
against her, especially now that she was cloaked in the glamour of the 
Varden’s victory in Farthen Dar. But if she waited too long, they would 
lose their chance to exploit Galbatorix’s momentary weakness. Her only 
advantage over the maze of opposition was her command of the one 
element that had instigated this act of the play: Eragon and Saphira. 


She said, “I don’t seek to undermine your command, Orrin. That was 
never my intention, and I apologize if it appeared that way.” He bowed 
his neck with a stiff bob. Unsure of how to continue, she leaned on her 
fingertips against the lip of the bench. “It’s only... so many things must be 
done. I work night and day—I keep a tablet beside my bed for notes— 
and yet I never catch up; I feel as if we are always balanced on the brink 
of disaster.” 


Orrin picked up a pestle stained black from use and rolled it between 
his palms with a steady, hypnotic rhythm. “Before you came here... No, 
that’s not right. Before your Rider materialized fully formed from the 
ethers like Moratensis from his fountain, I expected to live my life as my 
father and grandfather before me. That is, opposing Galbatorix in secret. 
You must excuse me if it takes a while to accustom myself to this new 


298 


reality.” 
It was as much contrition as she could expect in return. “I understand.” 


He stopped the pestle in its path for a brief moment. “You are newly 
come to your power, whereas I have held mine for a number of years. If I 
may be arrogant enough to offer advice, I’ve found that it’s essential for 
my sanity to allocate a certain portion of the day for my own interests.” 


“I couldn't do that,” objected Nasuada. “Every moment I waste might 
be the moment of effort that’s needed to defeat Galbatorix.” 


The pestle paused again. “You do the Varden a disservice if you insist 
on overworking yourself. No one can function properly without occa- 
sional peace and quiet. They don’t have to be long breaks, just five or ten 
minutes. You could even practice your archery, and then you would still 
serve your goals, albeit in a different mannert.... That’s why I had this labo- 
ratory constructed in the first place. That’s why I blow smoke and play 
with quicksilver, as you put it—so that I don’t scream with frustration 
throughout the rest of the day.” 


Despite her reluctance to surrender her view of Orrin as a feckless lay- 
about, Nasuada could not help but acknowledge the validity of his argu- 
ment. “I will keep your recommendation in mind.” 


Some of his former levity returned as he smiled. “That’s all I ask.” 


Walking to the window, she pushed the shutters farther open and 
gazed down upon Aberon, with its cries of quick-fingered merchants 
hawking their wares to unsuspecting customers, the clotted yellow dust 
blowing from the western road as a caravan approached the city gates, 
the air that shimmered over clay tile roofs and carried the scent of cardus 
weed and incense from the marble temples, and the fields that sur- 
rounded Aberon like the outstretched petals of a flower. 


Without turning around, she asked, “Have you received copies of our 
latest reports from the Empire?” 


“I have.” He joined her at the window. 
“What’s your opinion of them? 


“That they’re too meager and incomplete to extract any meaningful 
conclusions.” 


299 


“They’re the best we have, though. Give me your suspicions and your 
hunches. Extrapolate from the known facts like you would if this were 
one of your experiments.” She smiled to herself. “I promise that I won’t 
attach meaning to what you say.” 


She had to wait for his reply, and when it came, it was with the dolor- 
ous weight of a doomsday prophecy. “Increased taxes, emptied garrisons, 
horses and oxen confiscated throughout the Empire... It seems that Gal- 
batorix gathers his forces in preparation to confront us, though I cannot 
tell whether he means to do it in offense or defense.” Revolving shadows 
cooled their faces as a cloud of starlings whirled across the sun. “The 
question that weighs upon my mind now is, how long will it take him to 
mobilize? For that will determine the course of our strategies.” 


“Weeks. Months. Years. I cannot predict his actions.” 
He nodded. “Have your agents continued to spread tidings of Eragon?” 


“It has become increasingly dangerous, but yes. My hope is that if we 
inundate cities like Dras-Leona with rumors of Eragon’s prowess, when 
we actually reach the city and they see him, they will join us of their own 
accord and we can avoid a siege.” 


“War is rarely so easy.” 


She let the comment pass uncontested. “And how fares the mobiliza- 
tion of your own army? The Varden, as always, are ready to fight.” 


Orrin spread his hands in a placating gesture. “It’s difficult to rouse a na- 
tion, Nasuada. There are nobles who I must convince to back me, armor 
and weapons to be constructed, supplies to be gathered...” 


“And in the meantime, how do I feed my people? We need more land 
than you allotted us—” 


“Well, I know it,” he said. 


“—and we'll only get it by invading the Empire, unless you fancy mak- 
ing the Varden a permanent addition to Surda. If so, you'll have to find 
homes for the thousands of people I brought from Farthen Dtr, which 
wont please your existing citizens. Whatever your choice, choose 
quickly, because I fear that if you continue to procrastinate, the Varden 
will disintegrate into an uncontrollable horde.” She tried not to make it 


300 


sound like a threat. 


Nevertheless, Orrin obviously did not appreciate the insinuation. His 
upper lip curled and he said, “Your father never let his men get out of 
hand. I trust you won't either, if you expect to remain leader of the 
Varden. As for our preparations, there’s a limit to what we can do in so 
short a time; you'll just have to wait until we are ready.” 


She gripped the windowsill until veins stood out on her wrists and her 
fingernails sank into the crevices between the stones, yet she allowed 
none of her anger to color her voice: “In that case, will you lend the 
Varden more gold for food?” 


“No. I’ve given you all the money I can spare.” 
“How will we eat, then?” 
“I would suggest that you raise the funds yourself.” 


Furious, she gave him her widest, brightest smile—holding it long 
enough to make him shift with unease—and then curtsied as deeply as a 
servant, never letting her demented grimace waver. “Farewell then, Sire. I 
hope that the rest of your day is as enjoyable as our conversation was.” 


Orrin muttered an unintelligible response as she swept back to the 
laboratory’s entrance. In her anger, Nasuada caught her right sleeve on a 
jade bottle and knocked it over, cracking the stone and releasing a flood 
of yellow liquid that splattered her sleeve and soaked her skirt. She 
flicked her wrist in annoyance without stopping. 


Farica rejoined her in the stairwell, and together they traversed the 
warren of passageways to Nasuada’s chambers. 


301 


